CSO 

    [Text] In the 20th Century, except for World War II, 
there has been no major event of more far-reaching impact on the 
world than the breakup of the Soviet Union, which both 
politically and militarily marked the end of an era, indicating 
that the "Cold War" between the two great camps and military 
blocs was over. 
  But while this bloc confrontation was over, the world was 
not 
yet peaceful. Just as people of goodwill were breaking free 
from the dark clouds of "nuclear war," the Gulf War broke out on 
17 January 1991, bringing the nightmare of war to rouse us once 
again from our sound sleep. As we all know, while this 43-day 
regional war by multinational forces led by the United States 
undoubtedly won a military victory, it did not win peace. 
  Not only was the Gulf War a warning, but it also clearly 
brought home the point to many statesmen and strategists about 
the complicated and confusing post-Cold War military order, so 
that they seized the time to quickly revise their strategies. 
  This is the threat of regional [diquxing] and local 
[jubuxing] wars. 
  Statistics show that in 1992 alone, over 30 local wars and 
armed conflicts of varying size broke out throughout the world. 
  The regional distribution of these wars and conflicts was 
three in the Balkans, 10 in the former Soviet Union, five in 
South and West Asia, four in the Mideast, seven in Africa, and 
one in Latin America. 
  As to the intensity of these wars and conflicts, the larger, 
longer, and wider-impact ones included mainly Bosnia-Herzegovina 
in the Balkans, South Ossetia in Georgia, along the banks of the 
Dniester River in Moldova, the Naikar Region in Azerbaijan, 
Afghanistan in Southwest Asia, Lebanon in the Mideast, and 
Angola and Mozambique in Africa. 
  As to the nature of these wars and conflicts, 25 were civil 
wars, and five were wars between nations. 
  While the incidence of local wars and armed conflicts 
throughout the world averaged only three per year in the 1970s 
and 1980s, six occurred in the first year of the 1990s, another 
six broke out in 1991, and this number rose sharply to 30 in 
1992; such an alarming rate! 
  Moreover, the Gulf War showed that contemporary local and 
regional wars are characterized particularly by high intensity, 
efficiency, and technology. Their combat input and great 
destructiveness both leave one speechless. Taking the Gulf War 
for instance, 29 countries were directly involved. The United 
States spent $61.1 billion (of which $54.649 billion was paid by 
other countries), sent in more troops than in either the Korean 
or Vietnam wars, and used high-tech weaponry of the 1980s and 
1990s, such as satellites, the C[.sup]3[/]I system, "patriot" 
missiles, and stealth bombers, causing direct damage to Iraq of 
more than $200 billion in a short 43 days. The widespread use 
of modern high-tech weaponry has brought great change to combat 
style and tactics, with the trend being toward multi-dimensional 
and combined service arm coordination, omni-directional attack, 
and troop transfers across large areas. 
  So to adapt to these developing circumstances, all major 
countries throughout the world have clearly speeded up their 
pace of military adjustment. It could be held that this is the 
single most significant and far-reaching strategic postwar 
adjustment, involving all areas such as military strategy, 
force-building principles, weaponry, and development policies of 
all countries. 
  As to military strategy, all major countries throughout the 
world are putting more emphasis on countering regional armed 
conflicts and local wars. For instance, the United States has 
shifted its defense priority to preventing the rise of regional 
powers, to deal with regional crises and wars. The White House 
plans to complete in five years a sharp cutback of its global 
strategic deployment, reducing its troop strength from the 
current 2.06 million to 1.65 million, as well as dismantling and 
closing nearly 30 percent of its overseas military bases. 
Based on this, its combat plans are focused on set ideas, such 
as fighting Iraq, North Korea, China, Iran, or Russia, 
intervening in coups in the Philippines, countering terrorist 
attacks against its allies, and coping with wars of aggression 
launched by new global enemies. 
  As to force-building principles, all major countries 
throughout the world are putting their military-development 
priority on reinforcing their rapid-reaction [kuaisu fanying] 
troops and raising their contingency combat capability, making 
this the first link in their quality force-building. So while 
the United States is cutting 25 percent of its troop strength, 
it is raising the percentage of its rapid-reaction troops from 
20 percent to 40 percent by raising troop strength from 230,000 
to 550,000. The Pentagon has also set up a special 
"contingency command" to control all rapid-reaction troops on 
its territory. The French Army, whose rapid-reaction troops 
originally had over 47,000 troops in five divisions, has now 
decided to add one or two new such divisions, to be used to 
reinforce its overseas intervention capability and take part in 
allied "frontline combat." The German Army, while maintaining 
its six mobile-deployment brigades, is in the process of 
organizing two special divisions. Britain has turned its 24th 
mobile brigade into a rapid-reaction troop and is preparing to 
add another rapid-reaction army. 
  As to weaponry development, all major countries throughout 
the world are focusing their financial and material resources on 
developing high-tech, high-quality, and high-performance 
weaponry, to raise their mobile-combat command efficiency, 
mobile capability, and comprehensive strikeforce. The 
C[.sup]3[/]I system is in widespread use by all countries' 
military commands, with the prediction being that by the end of 
the century, it will combine diversified land, sea, air, and 
outer space reconnaissance methods, to form an all-year, 
all-weather, all-directional three-dimensional decision- making 
and command network, thus ensuring that commanders-in-chief and 
commanders at all levels can respond sensitively to all complex, 
explosive events. The mobile-capability development direction 
is toward large-scale air and sea transport, to ensure the 
deployment in the minimum time of rapid-response troops to any 
place on the globe. The U.S. military can now move in 48 hours 
brigade-size troops by air to any crisis point in the world, as 
well as flying six divisions to European battlefields in 10 
days. The development of a comprehensive strikeforce gives 
primary emphasis to airstrike capability, and secondarily to 
areas such as the development of advanced armored weaponry, 
high-precision guns, anti-armor weaponry, individual (plane, 
ship, and tank) night vision, friend-and-foe recognition 
systems, and terminal equipment. 
  Up to this point, we have roughly sketched the general 
outline and development direction of the military trends in 
today's world. Quite obviously, since the old world order of 
military balance was broken, we have begun to enter a "Spring 
and Autumn and Warring States Age" of disputes among all with 
separatist fiefdoms. Strategists generally hold that this order 
will last for 10-15 years. In other words, from the end of this 
century to the beginning of the next, the principal theme of 
world military confrontation will be local or regional wars 
throughout the globe. Thus, whoever gains the initiative in this 
transition period will get the decisive seat in the future 
military order. 
  The Italian strategist Niccolo Machiavelli made the famous 
statement that: "All [nations] with military prophets triumph, 
and all without fall." 
  In which case, what kind of wars will the Chinese Army face? 
And can the Chinese Army win local wars? These are questions 
that we need to analyze systematically and demonstrate fully. 
<H5>  I. LOCAL WARS THAT CHINA WILL FACE </H5>
  As far as the Chinese Army was concerned, 1993 was a very 
unusual year. The Central Military Commission, which had just 
been reorganized, held an enlarged session at the beginning of 
the year in Beijing. At this meeting, the Central Military 
Commission made crucial post-Cold War decisions on matters such 
as the Chinese Army's force-building guiding ideology, strategic 
principles, and training direction. After the large 
million-troop cutback and shift of force-building guiding 
ideology to a modern track in 1985, this was another crucial 
strategic reorganization for the Chinese Army. 
  At this meeting, Military Commission Chairman Jiang Zemin 
stated clearly that "we certainly will win high-tech local wars 
on contemporary terms!" 
  It was decided at this meeting that the overall number of 
troops would not be cut back further and that the quality 
force-building priority would be placed on adjusting the 
established system and developing and upgrading weaponry. 
  The conference gave crucial strategic place to intensified 
education and training to improve the army's mobile-response 
capability to cope with sudden incidents [tufa shijian] on 
modern terms.... 
  The world's military intelligence experts well know the 
significance of such a series of crucial decisions made at this 
time by this military superpower with a population of 1.1 
billion and an army of 3 million. It may be said that before the 
breakup of the Soviet Union, the Chinese Army still regarded the 
Mideast, Falkland Islands, and Afghanistan wars as a particular 
type of combat to be understood and studied, or that it had made 
only an insignificant strategic adjustment because of them. 
But after the breakup of the Soviet Union, since the Gulf War 
in particular, the Chinese Army now takes local and regional 
wars as a real threat and a future key combat style to be 
studied and demonstrated, as well as having raised the nature of 
the matter from a campaign scale to a strategic level. It may 
thus be inferred that this crucial adjustment had long since 
been an established general plan in the minds of the commanders 
that was just waiting to be called out, or a carefully 
considered option. It shows that the Chinese Army is making 
active preparations for coming local or regional wars. 
  Considered from its deeper immediate setting, this 
adjustment 
has clear aims. That is, in the complicated and confusing 
military order, the Chinese Army has faced up to its overt and 
potential adversaries. The hotspots where local wars or armed 
conflicts might break out are growing gradually more evident, in 
some cases even deteriorating steadily. 
<H5>  The Overt Adversary -- The World's Top Military Power, the </H5>
United States 
  While the conflict of strategic interests between China and 
the United States was overshadowed for a time by the "tripartite 
great-power" relationship, it is now surfacing steadily since 
the breakup of the Soviet Union. As grave antagonisms and 
differences exist between China and the United States in areas 
such as ideology, social system, and foreign policy, it has been 
impossible for Sino-U.S. relations to essentially improve for 
quite some time, with a duality beginning to exist. That is, 
along with mutual cooperation and advantage, a state of mutual 
wariness exists. While China cannot yet pose an immediate 
strategic threat to the United States, the United States has 
still included China in its "regional defense strategy" as an 
anticipated target of operations. 
  The United States is now adjusting its deployment in the 
Asia-Pacific region, in which the adjusted deployment will form 
a "fan-shaped strategic structure," with U.S. territory as the 
"base of the fan," and the U.S.-Japan-South Korea alliance as 
the fan's key ribs. Its frontline deployment will change from 
South Korea, Japan, and the Philippines to Alaska, South Korea, 
Japan, and Guam. While the U.S. plans to cut its overall troop 
strength in the Asia-Pacific region from 200,000 to 180,000 in 
five years, as well as closing 34 bases and adjusting 48 others, 
as to its key direction in Northeast Asia, the United States is 
going to keep and consolidate 16 bases in Japan and 15 in South 
Korea. So while the adjustment will reduce the U.S. military's 
overall troop strength in the Asia-Pacific region, leaving it 
without a large-scale regional combat capability, it will have a 
limited naval and airstrike capability, which supported by 
strategic mobile forces on U.S. territory will give it more than 
enough capability to fight a medium-scale local war. 
  After the year 2000, the Asia-Pacific region is likely to 
gradually become a U.S. strategic priority. A concerned U.S. 
figure notes that: "The evolving global economic and S&amp;T 
development trend is shifting the economic focus from Europe to 
the Pacific region, with an accompanying shift in the global 
political focus. East Asia is going to become the heartland of 
world economics and S&amp;T. By the 21st century, whoever 
controls 
East Asia will control the world." So as to U.S. global-strategy 
considerations, the United States absolutely cannot tolerate the 
rise of a powerful adversary in East Asia. In 1992, the U.S. 
military's Asia-Pacific general headquarters held a special 
forum on the implementation of "a new military strategy" for the 
Asia-Pacific region, pointing out that: "The Chinese Army's 
ever-growing overall might is having a severe impact on the 
military balance in the Asia-Pacific region. The Asia-Pacific 
region now has more than 10 local-conflict hotspots and many 
border disputes, with a great possibility of touching off future 
local wars. The U.S. military stationed in the Asia-Pacific 
region, in addition to remaining vigilant against the Russian 
Army, also regards China, North Korea, and Vietnam as key 
operational targets. The U.S. Seventh Fleet sees the rapidly 
growing Chinese Navy as one of the key adversaries posing a 
significant threat to the United States in the region." 
  Aimed at the U.S. strategic deployment and the increasingly 
tense situation in the South China Sea, China is correspondingly 
adjusting its maritime defense and naval development strategy, 
substituting a "sweeping maritime strategy" for its accustomed 
"offshore defensive strategy." Its focus is on the mid-range 
maritime space beyond 200 nautical miles, to ensure the security 
of its 200 nautical miles of territorial waters. So the Chinese 
Navy has been equipped in recent years with a number of 
highly-automated special craft with advanced technology, such as 
new ships, long-range bombers, and anti-sub patrol boats. It is 
predicted that within five years, China will have an 
aircraft-carrier formation. Meanwhile, China's publication and 
application of a new generation of training laws and regulations 
represented by the new "Naval Affairs Training Regulations" are 
bringing its naval operations closer to an integrated sea, air, 
and land combat level. In 1991, 451 Chinese naval vessels took 
part in long-range navigation drills, more than half of which 
were conducted in the Pacific Ocean. Chinese nuclear submarines 
not only have carried out 90 round-the-clock days of 
self-sufficiency assessment long-range drills, but also have 
completed their first out-of-island long-range drills. So it 
can be visualized that the Chinese Navy will acquire a carrier 
formation before long to achieve its goal of a "sweeping 
maritime strategy." 
  An overall analysis of the military antagonism between China 
and the United States could lead to the following basic 
conclusions: 
  1. China and the United States, focused on their respective 
economic and political interests in the Asia-Pacific region, 
will remain in a sustained state of confrontation. 
  2. For quite a long period of time, this confrontation will 
be in the state of a strong U.S. and a weak China, with quite a 
large gap in comparative might. 
  3. While there is litle possibility of direct warfare 
between 
the two armies, there are a great many indirect-engagement 
factors and timespaces, mainly problem spots such as Korea, 
Taiwan, Hong Kong, the South China Sea islands, and Tibet. 
  4. There is little possibility of a large or medium-sized 
land war breaking out between China and the United States, with 
indirect clashes being mainly naval and air operations. 
  5. The factors that might set off changes in this state of 
confrontation are: a) The Russian Army's stand, being the one 
most likely to impact a change of status. b) Whether the ASEAN 
countries might form a joint military force. Such an alliance 
directed against China would be even more disadvantageous to 
China. But if such an alliance does not happen or is directed 
at the United States, while it could not essentially reverse the 
state of affairs, it would be much more favorable to China. c) 
The stand of Japan and South Korea. While Japan and South 
Korea are now U.S. military allies, we cannot exclude the 
possibility of certain changes due to ever-sharpening economic 
conflicts. Even if these two countries remained neutral, that 
would affect the achievement of U.S. strategic objectives. d) 
Taiwan. If Taiwan and Mainland China could reach a foreign 
policy consensus on upholding our territorial sovereignty, the 
situation would be somewhat different. 
<H5>  A Comeback by a Powerful Adversary -- Japan </H5>
  Quite obviously, the Japan of today cannot be called a 
military power. The internationally recognized evaluation 
criteria for a so-called military power require four generally 
essential factors: the possession of overall national might and 
combat potential exceeding ordinary countries; the possession of 
active-service military personnel and advanced offensive 
weaponry exceeding that of ordinary countries; military might 
exceeding defensive needs, with the military means to pursue 
national intentions; the existence and operation of military 
might that can have a significant impact on one's region and 
even on the world military order. Of these four generally 
essential factors, Japan is not equipped with at least two, the 
second and third. 
  But in a local war, Japan could still be regarded as a 
powerful adversary. Moreover, as time passes, it would certainly 
not be hard for this nationality that is very good at doing 
others in to replay its powerful bushido style and 
become a military superpower in one leap. 
  Since the 1980's, Japan has carried out a series of crucial 
adjustments in its military strategy, cautiously approaching its 
objective of becoming a political and military power. 
  In 1980, Japan formally set forth its "comprehensive 
security-guarantee strategy," openly including for the first 
time military-force development in its national security 
strategy. 
  In 1981, it set forth for the first time its "forward 
defense 
strategy," holding that "as soon as an enemy approaches to 
attack," it "will be annihilated at sea," which was a crucial 
shift from "territorial defense" to "oceangoing defense." 
  In 1987, Japan went on to propose an "at-sea air defense," 
showing signs of an oceangoing triphibious defense system. 
  And in 1991, a Japanese "defense white paper" implied that 
"military might is the ultimate guarantee of national-security." 
Not long afterwards, the Japanese Diet forced through a "Bill 
on Cooperative Action in UN Peacekeeping," which was a first 
step in breaking with its postwar constitution. 
  In national-defense force-building, the development route 
that Japan is taking is one of "small size but high quality." 
Japan now has 151,000 troops in its land self-defense force, 
with 13 divisions and 1,230 tanks; 43,000 troops in its naval 
self-defense force, with 326,000-ton naval vessels, including 58 
corvettes and 14 submarines; 46,000 troops in its air 
self-defense force, with 430 combat aircraft, including 261 
fighters and 74 ground attack planes. It needs to be noted that 
the Japanese military has always seen its air force as a 
strategic strike force to be given priority development. While 
its combat aircraft may be few in number, they are certainly 
high in quality. For instance, its major fighter, the F-15J, 
is currently the world's most advanced fighter. Since the Gulf 
War, Japan has made plans to purchase 20 KC-10 tankers, as well 
as buying E-3A airborne warning and control aircraft, 
super-long-distance radar, and "patriot" missiles. Once equipped 
with these, the Japanese Airforce will have the capability to 
strike targets thousands of km away, covering Russia's Far East 
coastal zone, the Korean Peninsula, and China's southeast 
coastal zone, thus making the transition from a defensive to a 
combined offensive-defensive strategy. 
  Japan's military might can be summed up as more than enough 
for territorial defense, but still not enough for independent 
overseas involvement. Restricted by a number of factors, for 
some time to come the Japanese military will not have the 
independent might for external combat but will continue to rely 
on a joint Japanese-U.S. defense for joint combat. 
  So while there is quite obviously not much possibility in 
the 
short term of a direct military conflict breaking out between 
China and Japan, incidents in the South China Sea islands and on 
the Korean Peninsula might touch off local firefights between 
the two sides. At such a time, the problem for the Chinese 
Army would be how to cope with the Japanese air force. 
<H5>  An Unpredictable Super Assassin -- Vietnam </H5>
  From 1986 to 1991, Vietnam completed a four-year 
"retrenchment" strategy of major adjustment. It cut its troops 
by 600,000, reducing its military spending from $2 billion to 
$1.3 billion. The reorganized Vietnamese military has 
generally shifted from strategic offense to strategic defense, 
as well as having formed a more rational defense system. But 
from an analysis of its parts, the retrenchment includes some 
expansion, with a clear feature of this Vietnamese military 
adjustment being "army cutbacks with naval advances." While 
cutting back its army, the Vietnamese military rebuilt its 937th 
air regiment and its 126th naval-marine brigade. It totally 
reassigned its 372nd army division, 954th naval-air regiment, 
and 172nd naval-vessel brigade to Da Nang in central Vietnam, 
strengthening its naval-strike and anti-submarine capability. 
The Vietnamese Communist Party's "Sixth Congress" declared 
that "defending our maritime territory and marine resources has 
become the major substance of our two great strategic missions 
in the new era of national defense and economic development." So 
for now and some time to come, the Vietnamese military will make 
its navy and airforce its development priorities, to speed up 
its maritime expansion. 
  The Vietnamese Navy now has 40,000 troops, with 103 combat 
ships, including eight corvettes, eight guided-missile ships, 16 
torpedo boats, and three tank-landing craft, in addition to 
almost 1,000 auxilliary ships and armed fishing boats. Its 
airforce has over 400 aircraft of various types, including 270 
combat aircraft, of which 10 are the more advanced Su-22s. 
  Since the breakup of the Soviet Union, while Sino-Vietnamese 
relations have normalized, the major conflict over the Spratly 
Islands has certainly heated up steadily. Since China published 
its "Territorial Sea Law" in February 1992, it has given sharp 
attention by the countries bordering the South China Sea, with 
the first to be affected being Vietnam, which has the most to 
gain in the South China Sea. Vietnam not only has sent more 
ships to patrol and guard the Spratlys, speeding up the 
renovation of all of its occupied-island defense works and 
permanent-residence sites, but also has ordered from Russia a 
number of guided-missile corvettes and fighter planes. And it 
has sought to buy from Western countries, such as the United 
States, F-16 fighters and small naval vessels that can be used 
for offshore combat. Meanwhile, it has conducted repeated 
anti-landing and anti-naval strike military exercises targeted 
at the Chinese Navy, with its posture being one of great 
determination, "vowing to defend the Spratlys to the death." 
  If the Vietnamese authorities do not make any concessions on 
the Spratlys, a Sino-Vietnamese war is inevitable. As to 
might, while the Vietnamese military is not yet up to 
independent combat with the Chinese Navy and Air Force, this 
"superkiller" can certainly play a desperado role in the course 
of resolving the Spratlys problem by acting most aggressively 
against China. As to China, the great distance and our lack of 
a carrier formation mean that while it would certainly not be 
too hard for us to recover the Spratlys, it would certainly be 
very difficult for us to defend them. But one very clear point 
is that the Chinese Army does not have much time to resolve the 
Spratlys problem. 
<H5>  The Potentially Greatest Threat -- India </H5>
  In 1986, India paid a very high price to buy one of 
Britain's 
largest aircraft carriers, the Hermes, making the Indian Navy 
the only one in Asia to have two carriers. This put India on 
the throne as Asia's first military power. 
  This was the result of nearly three decades of self-imposed 
hardships by India to wipe out its national humiliation of 1962. 
Since the Sino-Indian War, India had shifted its 
national-defense strategy from peaceful coexistence to a focus 
on arms development, trying to gain great-nation status in 
international affairs through steadily increasing its military 
might. In this nearly three decades, except for a local armed 
conflict with Pakistan in the early 1970s, as India had suffered 
almost no major domestic troubles or foreign invasions, its 
military strength had grown steadily, sharply raising its 
overall combat capability. The Indian military now has 1.3 
million troops, over 700 combat planes, more than 100 naval 
ships, 3,000-plus tanks, and the capability to develop and 
produce medium-range guided missiles and nuclear missiles. 
Quantitatively, while the Indian military is not yet up to the 
size of the Chinese Army, it has certainly outdone us 
qualitatively, particularly having clearly surpassed China in 
areas such as naval and air force equipment, oceangoing combat 
capability, and border-position construction. As the Indian 
military has repeatedly threatened, "the Indian Army of today is 
no longer what it was in 1962." 
  At present, the major direct threats to China by the Indian 
military are medium-range missiles and more advanced fighter 
planes. In February 1988, India launched its first cruise 
missile with a range of 240 km and a payload of 1,000 kg. In May 
1989, it fired another rocket-type medium-range missile [Agni], 
with a payload of 1,000 kg and a range of 1,500-2,400 km. This 
made India the seventh country to have cruise missiles, and the 
sixth to have medium-range missiles. The rocket-type missile 
in particular has an advanced guidance system with high target 
accuracy, capable of delivering nuclear warheads to southern 
China and all of Pakistan. In addition, India's possession of 
the capabililty to produce nuclear missiles with "rocket"-type 
guidance is a threat of concern to the whole world. Since the 
1980s, the Indian Air Force has become the fourth most powerful 
in the world, having a reputation as "South Asia's iron fist," 
of which the major signs are its third- and fourth-generation 
aircraft on active duty. Its major aircraft types are the MiG 
0-23MF, the MiG-29 and Mirage-2000 fighters, the MiG-23BN, the 
MiG-27, and the American Tiger fighter-bomber. Meanwhile, since 
1985, India has begun to acquire airborne warning and control 
aircraft. So the Indian Air Force has all-weather and 
long-distance air-combat and ground-strike capability, having 
made the transition from air-defense to a combination of offense 
and defense. 
  We see India as a potential adversary mainly because India's 
strategic focus remains on the Indian Ocean and Southeast Asia. 
But while India has never changed its territorial demands 
against China, still forcibly occupying a large piece of China's 
southwestern border territory, India does not yet have the 
overall national and military might for a large-scale invasion 
of Tibet or a deep incursion into our hinterland. If India sets 
its strategic targets at a limited depth of charges into our 
positions of 100 or 200 km, while it might reach these strategic 
targets, the loss would outweigh the gain, and it would 
ultimately not be able to hold them. Meanwhile, China has not 
taken back our lost territory by force because "while we could 
win, we could not hold." In which case, we can draw the 
following conclusions: 
  1. There is little possibility of a large-scale military 
conflict or local war breaking out between China and India in 
the short term. The shape of the antagonism will be mainly 
friction surrounding the Tibet problem. 
  2. Once a war does break out between China and India, its 
intensity and impact will be no less than medium-scale. 
<H5>  A Still-Imposing Deterrent Force -- Russia </H5>
  As the successor to the former Soviet Union, while Russia 
has 
lost its superpower status as an equal to the United States, it 
remains a world military power with the largest territory in the 
world, rich S&amp;T forces, and enormous military potential. As 
to 
military confrontation, for now and quite a long time to come, 
except for the United States, there still will be no other 
country in the world that is its equal. 
  Russia now has 2.8 million troops, 75 percent that of the 
former Soviet Union which, even when reduced as planned, will 
remain at a size of 1.5 million. Meanwhile, Russia possesses 
over 80 percent of the former Soviet Union's nuclear weapons, 
with conventional weapons also about the same as the United 
States overall. The second nuclear disarmament treaty signed by 
the United States and Russia in early 1992 will reduce both 
sides' strategic nuclear warheads by two-thirds within a decade, 
cutting the United States' back from 12,000 to 3,500, and 
Russia's from 10,800 to 3,000, sharply reducing both sides' 
first-strike nuclear capability and danger for the first time. 
But despite this, as both sides will still retain enough nuclear 
warheads for "mutual destruction," it is easy to see Russia's 
might. 
  On 16 March 1992, Yeltsin signed a presidential order, 
deciding to establish a Russian Federation national-defense 
force. Then on 7 April, Yeltsin also announced to the Russian 
Congress that Russia was immediately beginning to reorganize 
Russia's military, which was the start of Russia's 
force-building process, as well as an adjustment of its 
force-building ideology and strategic theory. 
  It has been disclosed that Russia's new military strategy is 
composed of four essential elements: 1) The fundamental 
military strategy proposition. Russia holds that the 
Russian military's future basic mission will be to ensure the 
inviolability of Russia's sovereignty, territory, and borders. 
2) The basic military strategy substance. Russia sees 
its neighboring countries as its major combat targets, regarding 
war with neighboring countries as the basic grounds for its 
combat preparations. 3) The fundamental military strategy 
principle. While Russia has made not taking the initiative 
to launch attacks against its neighboring countries its key 
military-strategy principle, it also emphasizes that defense 
means an active initiative and that its operational aim is 
firmly and clearly to "not allow war to move onto Russian 
territory" and to "be capable of inflicting such heavy losses on 
enemies that it will be hard for them to recover." And in 
order to achieve this operational aim, the Russian military 
needs to "have powerful combat capability and mobility." 4) 
The basic estimate of the future-war form. Russia 
holds that there is very little possibility of a nuclear war 
breaking out in the world in the future, so that conventional 
war will be the basic form of future wars. 
  Russia is the strongest of all countries bordering China, 
being the country that occupies the most Chinese territory, and 
the one with the most complex historical entanglements with 
China, with many border points still disputed by both sides. But 
while Russia's reorganized military will pose a direct threat to 
China, the current outlook is that Russia's domestic and foreign 
affairs have not been finalized, with quite grim economic 
conditions, and very sharp conflicts among nationalities and 
with other CIS countries, so that for the next decade, Russia 
will be too busy to pay attention to the east, still doing as 
much as possible diplomatically to cooperate better with the 
Asia-Pacific region. So while there is very little possibility 
that Russia will use military force against the Asia-Pacific 
region, it needs to be pointed out that as a militarily great 
nation, Russia's existence per se has an indispensable impact on 
the world order, with Russia's every word and deed remaining of 
great nation significance. 
<H5>  A Constantly Heating-Up Periphery -- Hotspots That Could </H5>
Touch Off Local Wars 
  In the two-plus years since the breakup of the Soviet Union, 
the Asia-Pacific region has been calm and tranquil, a scene of 
prosperity, and highly unique in the midst of the sharp 
turbulence in the world order, with an air of "prospects being 
uniquely good in this area." It almost seems that in the 
replacement of the old order with the new, the Asia-Pacific 
region has only opportunities but no challenges. In which case, 
how might this situation change in the future? For China in 
particular, as the key "strong point" in Asia's political and 
military struggles, what will the situation be like? 
  The Central Military Commission's judgment is that the 
situation will be exceptionally grim. 
  There are now eight hotspots directly threatening China's 
security, unity, and territorial integrity, which might touch 
off local armed conflicts or even wars. 
<H5>  The Ever-Sharpening South China Sea Conflict </H5>
  In May 1992, the China Maritime Petroleum Company signed an 
oil contract in Beijing with the U.S. Crestone Energy Corp. for 
the Vanguard Bank in the Nansha [Spratly] Islands. This brought 
an immediate reaction from several Southeast Asian countries, 
the strongest one coming from Vietnam. Vu Ngoc Hai, Vietnamese 
Communist Party Central Committee member and Minister of Energy 
Resources, said insolently at a high-level Vietnamese Communist 
Party meeting that: While China needs Vietnam to help it cope 
with U.S. peaceful evolution, it still collaborates with the 
United States in development right under Vietnam's nose (on 
Vietnam's continental shelf), showing that China's ultimate 
target remains the collapse of Vietnam. Just as Vietnam resisted 
France for eight decades and the United States for two decades, 
we should be prepared now to resist China for 10 decades! This 
signaled another heating up of the Nansha Islands problem on the 
heels of China's publication in February [1992] of its 
"Territorial Sea Law." 
  Since the 1970s, most of China's island reefs and maritime 
space in the Nansha Islands has been swallowed and carved up by 
certain peripheral countries, with the current state being one 
of six countries in seven parts in rivalry and tripartite 
confrontation. While the countries directly involved in the 
dispute constitute six countries and seven sides, that is China, 
China Taiwan, the Philippines, Malaysia, Vietnam, Indonesia, and 
Brunei, the division of interests is tripartite, with one being 
China and China Taiwan, another Vietnam, and the third the four 
countries of the Philippines, Malaysia, Indonesia, and Brunei. 
The Nansha Islands include over 230 island reefs of varying 
size, with an island area of 20,000 sq km, and a maritime space 
of 820,000 [as published] sq km. At present, except for six 
reefs, such as Taiping Dao [Itu Aba Island] and Yongshu Jiao 
[Fiery Cross Reef], all of the rest are occupied by neighboring 
countries. The occupied maritime space is over 1.8 million sq 
km, including 510,000 sq km of basin area, with oil and gas 
reserves topping 10 billion tons. 
  Vietnam has the biggest appetite, occupying 23 island reefs, 
as well as stationing troops on 10, and building permanent 
defense works. It has the most vested interests in the Nansha 
Islands, as well as posing the greatest threat to China. Since 
1978, Vietnam has cooperated with Western oil companies, 
drilling eight oil and gas wells in China's traditional maritime 
space in the South China Sea and stealing over 2 million tons of 
oil per year. The Philippines was the first country to get 
involved in the Nansha Islands, starting in May 1971, first 
illegally occupying eight islands, such as Zhongye Dao [Thitu 
Island], Xiyue Dao [West York Island], Nanyue Dao [Loaita 
Island], Beizi Dao [Northeast Cay], Nanshan Dao [Mahuan Island], 
and Feixin Dao [Flat Island], and seizing the two large 
oil-storage basins of Le Bank and northwest Balawang, for an 
area of 36,000 sq km. In 1978, the Philippines announced that 
it was including some Nansha Island reefs in the Philippines 
territory, with the included maritime space reaching 410,000 sq 
km. Beginning in 1983, Malaysia has sent troops to seize 
island reefs such as Danwan Jiao [Swallow Reef], Xingzai, and 
Nanhai Jiao [Mariveles Reef], as well as including 270,000 sq km 
of maritime space in its national territory. Indonesia has cut 
out 40,000-50,000 sq km of China's traditional territorial seas, 
with Brunei demanding to extend its continental shelf into the 
South China Sea, to take over about 3,000 sq km of China's 
traditional territorial seas. In addition, Japan, South Korea, 
and the United States have made their own respective plans for 
the South China Sea. 
  At present, as the former Soviet Navy has withdrawn from Cam 
Ranh Bay, the various Southeast Asian countries have begun to 
show signs of forming an alliance against China. Once China uses 
force to protect its national sovereignty in that area, a quite 
large-scale local war will be unavoidable, at which time the 
South China Sea will become a second Persian Gulf! 
<H5>  In Case South Korea Announces the Use of Force Against North </H5>
Korea 
  Since North Korea announced that the state of "nationwide 
war" was over, while all have breathed a little easier, this 
"state of nationwide war" in North Korea aimed at the joint 
U.S.-South Korean military exercises seems to be a warning that 
the hopes for peaceful reunification of Korea are even more 
remote. While North and South Korea have intensified contacts 
in recent years, conducting repeated talks on peaceful 
reunification, their sharp ideological standoff and huge gap in 
economic might, plus U.S. influence, pose many difficulties to 
the unification progress. 
  Concerned figures hold that peaceful reunification of Korea 
would very possibly end up just as the reunification of East and 
West Germany, with one side wiping out the other. As to Kim Il 
Sung who is accustomed to a "family-type" rule, this would in 
any case be something that he would not like to see occur. As 
the announcement of a "nationwide state of war" shows North 
Korea's absolutely uncompromising hardline stand, the use of 
force by South Korea to achieve reunification is certainly not 
an impossibility. 
  If a Korean war broke out, strategic interests would make it 
very hard for China and the United States to look on 
unconcerned. As to China, North Korea's existence is a buffer 
zone in the Sino-U.S. confrontation, with room for advantage. 
But if North Korea was lost, the U.S. strategic frontline, 
through a U.S.-Korean alliance, would press right up against the 
Yalu River, posing an understandable threat to China. This 
shows that a deterioration of the situation on the Korean 
Peninsula would very likely touch off a large-scale local war 
similar to that of the 1950s. 
<H5>  Confrontation on the Roof of the World </H5>
  In 1988, a Chinese military officer who had taken part in 
the 
mission to fortify our border against India said that: "It seems 
that the Indian Army wants to fight sooner or later." 
  Ever since the 1950s, territorial disputes have existed 
between China and India, with a nine-sq-km piece of Chinese 
territory still occupied by India. The two sides fought a 
medium-scale local war in 1962, resulting in a crushing defeat 
for India. But after 26 years of development, India has become 
an Asian military power in one leap, with its expansionary 
ambitions heating up again, so that it renewed its territorial 
demands on China in 1988, threatening to "avenge its humiliation 
of 1962," pushing both sides for a time to the verge of war. In 
the last two years, as the Indian Government has adjusted its 
policy, while Sino-Indian relations have eased somewhat, it 
remains hard to predict whether border disputes can be resolved 
peacefully. 
<H5>  A Territorial Rift of 9.6 Million Sq Km </H5>
  In addition to peripheral hotspots, China's internal 
separatist tendencies similarly threaten our national security 
and territorial integrity, also being likely to touch off local 
armed conflicts and wars. So both ethnic and regional 
divisions are generally subject to meddling by outside forces, 
meaning that if a conflict broke out, outside armed intervention 
and even military support would be hard to avoid. This faces the 
Chinese Army with a very immediate and pressing mission of 
anti-separatism. 
  Taiwan. This island that has been under KMT 
control for over four decades has always been clouded by 
"Taiwanese independence." The U.S.'s regard for and emphasis on 
Taiwan as its ideal "strategic platform" in the Western Pacific 
has provided strong backing for "Taiwanese independence" forces. 
Since the breakup of the Soviet Union, to maintain U.S. 
strategic interests in the Asia-Pacific region, the United 
States has brazenly broken a "commandment" by selling F-16 
fighters to Taiwan, making great waves. Shortly afterwards, 
France sold Mirage-2000 fighters to Taiwan, adding fuel to the 
flames. The Netherlands, Britain, and Germany were hurrying to 
catch up, stopping only when they saw the strong response from 
the mainland Chinese Government. While this disturbance has 
not touched off a military conflict, it has created greater 
obstacles for peaceful reunification across the Taiwan Strait. 
But if the "Taiwanese independence" forces were to evolve to the 
point where Taiwan declared independence, that would very likely 
force the mainland to use military force, inevitably bringing 
the flames of war to the Taiwan Strait. 
  Hong Kong. The Hong Kong matter became a focus of 
discussion by all of the delegates to the Eighth NPC in 1993 [as 
published]. While the mainland criticism was apparently 
directed at Hong Kong Governor Chris Patten, it was actually a 
case of "beating the dog to pay back its master," as a warning 
to Britain and the United States. With the approach of 1997, 
when the mainland will exercise sovereignty over Hong Kong and 
the mainland army will be stationed in Hong Kong, Britain and 
the United States are absolutely unreconciled to giving up in 
vain. So Britain and the United States are generally doing all 
they can to create obstacles and chaos, holding that further 
meddling in Hong Kong's affairs will pave the way for 
interference in China's internal affairs. This means that we 
cannot exclude the possibility of Hong Kong becoming the fuse of 
a local confict in the transition period. 
  Tibet. Ever since the founding of the PRC, Tibet 
has contained separatist forces that have worked in concert with 
the Dalai Lama's group of internal and external forces in exile 
to repeatedly create tensions in Tibet. In recent years, 
incited by Western hostile elements, Tibetan separatists have 
become more active, bringing signs of more tension to the 
situation. The Tibet matter is not only a priority of Western 
nations to incite rebellion, but is also a key pretext on which 
Indian expansionary forces rely, so that if the situation 
deteriorates, the struggle will be exceptionally sharp and 
complicated. 
  Xinjiang. The death of Wang Zhen [then PRC Vice 
President] in March 1993 lost China its senior commander with 
the most influence on the great northwest. While Xinjiang 
independence forces never got very far for four decades or more 
during Wang Zhen's lifetime, they now have an opportunity to 
raise their heads. In addition, since the breakup of the Soviet 
Union, Kazakhstan has become independent, having already made 
territorial demands on the Chinese Government, which have been 
echoed both internally and externally, being a bad omen for the 
Xinjiang situation. 
  Inner Mongolia. Concerned figures have disclosed 
that in the last two years, a few Inner Mongolian separatists 
have made three separate contacts with Outer Mongolian officials 
and are making surreptitious plans for the establishment of a 
"Greater Mongolian Republic." But these separatists have been 
proceeding very cautiously, due mainly to the changing Russian 
situation. If Russia remains stable and reinforces its 
cooperative relations with China, a wave of Mongolian separatism 
would be a very dangerous option. But if Russia continues in 
upheaval, or surreptiously supports Inner Mongolian separatists, 
the situation will deteriorate sharply. 
  Analyzed according to the fundamental viewpoint of McKinny's 
geopolitical theory, in international competition, the fewer 
neighboring countries the better, and the more neighboring 
countries, particularly bordering ones, the worse. China is 
located in the center of the Asia-Pacific region, with over 
40,000 km of borders on its periphery, including more than 
18,000 km of coastal defense line and more than 22,000 km of 
land borders, bordering on 12 countries and in sight of others 
across seas. This particular and crucial geographic position 
makes it very easy for China to become the focus of much 
conflict in international competition and very apt to be drawn 
into local disputes of one nature or another. This is a very 
adverse aspect that China will have to face up to in its future 
development, as well as an even more severe test facing the 
Chinese military. 
  In which case, the matter of concern is: Does the Chinese 
Army have the capability and assurance to win the local wars 
that it will face? 
  Before beginning this analysis, let us first give a brief 
summary: 
  Through nearly 66 years of force-building history, the 
Chinese Army has indisputably become a military force in today's 
world on an initial modernization scale, holding a decisive 
position in the world military order. As to its capability in 
local warfare, the Chinese Army has had a series of brilliant 
military successes. 
  In the 1950s, the young Chinese Army was first drawn into 
the 
largest-scale local war since World War II. Despite its 
inferior equipment, it still carried out a fearless battle 
against the world's top military power, the United States, 
giving the insufferably arrogant United States a crushing defeat. 
  In the early 1960s, the Chinese Army conducted a 
self-defensive counterattack against India under rare 
high-altitude conditions, in which the valiant and indomitable 
Chinese Army directly targeted the Indian capital of New Delhi, 
knocking down the Indian military's arrogance and ensuring 
almost three decades of peace on the Sino-Indian border. 
  In the late 1960s, the Chinese Army had a confrontation on 
its northern border with a military superpower, the former 
Soviet Union, conducting a self-defense counterattack on Zhenbao 
Island, upholding our national dignity and territorial integrity. 
  In the mid 1970s, the young Chinese Navy carried out a test 
of strength with a great disparity of might against Vietnam in 
the Paracel Islands, giving a deserved return blow to Vietnam's 
hegemonist ambitions. 
  In the late 1970s, the Chinese Army operated beyond our 
borders for the first time, carrying out a limited strategic 
strike to penalize Vietnam, which was a severe blow to the 
little tyrant. 
  In the late 1980s, China and Vietnam had another clash in 
the 
Spratlys, in which the Chinese Navy took only 28 minutes to 
inflict heavy losses on the Vietnamese military, fighting a 
"clean, neat, and very brilliant" battle. 
  These operational examples certainly show the Chinese 
Government's solemn and just stand in defending national 
sovereignty and capability in settling local conflicts. While 
this shows that the Chinese Army has accumulated certain 
experiences in fighting local wars, it needs to be noted that 
these wars were still "yesterday's wars," greatly different from 
today's high-tech local wars under modern conditions. So for the 
Chinese Army, fighting a high-tech local war on modern terms 
remains a brand-new problem, being an unprecedented test. Of 
course, the Chinese Army's advantages and disadvantages and 
strengths and weaknesses in future local wars are certainly not 
unmeasurable unknowns. We can now evaluate them as follows: 
  Strengths: 1) The Chinese Army has a quite 
powerful nuclear backing. As for local wars, its nuclear force 
is a nuclear threat to contain adversaries. 2) The Chinese Army 
has a quite strong missile-strike capability, with almost all 
countries on its periphery within its range of coverage. 3) As 
the local wars that the Chinese Army will face are "on its 
doorstep," it has geographic and popular advantages. 4) The 
Chinese Army has always maintained a huge superiority in 
conventional weapons. 5) The Chinese Army has first-rate and 
good-quality officers and men. 
  Weaknesses. 1) The Chinese Army has not yet been 
able to establish an advantage in its "soft casualty-infliction" 
capability. 2) Our command and advance-warning system remains 
quite backward and inefficient. 3) Our naval and air force 
equipment remains quite weak, leaving our triphibious-warfare 
capability falling short of our ambitions. 4) The Chinese Army 
still does not have a large-scale tactical rapid-mobility 
capability, making it quite hard to achieve strategic surprise. 
  It is thus obvious that in future local wars, the key to 
success will be how well the Chinese Army plays its strengths up 
and weaknesses down, in quest of the best strategic and tactical 
means suited to its particular features. 
<H5>  II. A STRONG BUT IMPOVERISHED MILITARY FORCE </H5>
  It has been revealed by persons in the know that not long 
ago, a team of high-ranking specialists and technicians from 
China made three secret visits to the Ukraine. The purpose of 
these visits was to check out the Ukraine attack carrier of the 
"Varyag Class." This ship has a displacement of 67,000 tons. It 
can carry 24 Su-27 bombers [as published] and MiG-29 fighters. 
It can control 50 times as much water area as a destroyer. If 
China is able to purchase this carrier, it will be able to 
offset 500 Taiwanese, Vietnamese, Philippines, Indian or 
Malaysian aircraft .... 
<H5>  Chinese Military's Dream of an Aircraft Carrier Dashed Once </H5>
More 
  The Chinese military has dreamed of an aircraft carrier for 
half a century. The strategic locations for world struggles in 
the future are the oceans. In recent years, one of the major 
reasons for a number of failures in China's dealings with 
foreign countries has been that its naval assault force is too 
weak. It has already been 10 years since Deng Xiaoping proposed 
that the Chinese Navy switch its strategic philosophy from one 
of "coastal defense" to one of "offshore defense." However, 
China still does not have this sort of offshore defense 
capability. Therefore, effective offshore defense must rely 
on an ocean-going control force and deterrent force. Currently, 
China must rely on a few dozen "old and weak" destroyers, 
escorts, and a hundred or so submarines. With this equipment 
and the quality of its men, in combat capability, the best China 
can do is maintain equality with Taiwan, the Philippines, 
Indonesia, Malaysia, and Vietnam. It does not have any great 
superiority. Therefore, if China wants to control the South 
China Sea and recover the tens of billions of tons of petroleum 
reserves there, it must have an aircraft carrier. 
  "How much more money do we need?" a military officer asked 
out loud. 
  "Just for the carrier, it would take almost all of our 
military expenses for a year. But this is just for the floating 
hull. To fully equip it with aircraft, VTOL command systems, 
electronic early warning systems, weapons systems, 
communications systems, and command and coordination systems and 
to give it conventional maintenance and repair capabilities, 
every year it would also take all of our military expenses for a 
year," replied the experts. 
  Mao Zedong said that China should have her own aircraft 
carrier. That was 20 years ago. Denq Xiaoping also said that 
China should have her own aircraft carrier. That was 10 years 
ago. However, because China is poor, she does not yet have her 
own aircraft carrier. 
  Aircraft carrier, aircraft carrier, without an aircraft 
carrier our military development cannot be considered to have 
achieved modernization. Without an aircraft carrier we cannot 
really be considered a military power. Without a strong naval 
force, we are unable to play the same role in international 
affairs as the major nations. These are strong cries from the 
hearts of the Chinese military men. 
<H5>  China's Military Expenditures Are Pitifully Small </H5>
  In a press conference with foreign reporters in 1993, 
Foreign Minister Qian Qichen stated, "China's military 
expenditures as a percentage of the gross national product were 
2.2 percent in 1985. Last year they were 1.6 percent. This year 
they are estimated to be 1.5 percent. Military expenditures per 
capita are about six dollars. In the United States it is 
$1,100, and in Japan it is $300. This year China's military 
expenditures budget comes out to $7.3 billion. That of the 
United States is $274.3 billion, and Japan's is $3.37 billion. 
England and France spend about that much as well. Calculated 
per person in the military, the average for China is $2,291, one 
eighty-seventh of what the United States spends and one 
fifty-fifth of what Japan spends and one fifty-fourth of what 
England spends. There are also inflation factors. In 1980 
China's military expenditures were 18 billion yuan, and in 1993 
42.5 billion. Military expenditures only rose 116 percent while 
inflation rose 130 percent. 
  From this data we can see that China's military expenditure 
per person is only one two-hundredth that of the United States. 
It is only one-fiftieth that of Japan. In Taiwan, when an 
enlisted man retires, he can receive enough resettlement 
expenses to open a small shop. A colonel on the mainland would 
not receive enough to buy commercial housing the size of a bed. 
Because China is poor, the book Garland at the Foot of 
the Mountain revealed to the people of the country a list 
of bills owed by a martyr, stirring up quite a reaction around 
the country. Because China is poor, it has carried out a number 
of reductions in force, but the living expenses of the units 
are already very low, so the clothing and food expenses saved by 
the reductions in force are not enough to meet inflation. If 
they do not reduce the size of the military they are poor, and 
if they reduce the military they are still poor. 
<H5>  The Chinese Army, Navy, and Air Force </H5>
<H5>  The Chinese Army </H5>
  Without a doubt, the Army is the pride of the Chinese armed 
forces. Both in the past and in the present, it has always 
maintained its position as the strongest of all the branches in 
the Chinese military forces. It has world famous 
accomplishments in battle. Today, it not only still ranks as 
the largest in the world in numbers, but in conventional weapons 
and equipment it ranks among the best in the world. It almost 
has no match in Asia. 
  The population of China is 1,024,900. The regular armed 
forces have 4.45 million men (including the Railway Construction 
Corps). The length of service is three years for the army, four 
years for the air force and army technical personnel, and five 
years for the navy (technical personnel may volunteer for up to 
15 years). 
  Army: Size is 3.6 million men. 
  Main force units (field armies): 
  About 305 armies, each army is usually composed of three 
divisions. The entire Army includes 11 armored divisions, 118 
infantry divisions and 40 field artillery, anti-tank artillery 
and anti-aircraft artillery divisions. There are also 16 
Railway Construction Corps and Construction Engineering 
Divisions and 50 independent divisions under the direct command 
of the central government. 
  Local units (deployed in the 29 provinces, cities, 
autonomous regions; each administrative district having two to 
three divisions). 
  Eighty-five infantry divisions and 130 independent 
regiments (including border defense forces). 
  The weapons and equipment of the Army include former Soviet 
Union LS-2 heavy tanks, T-34 and China-produced 59-type 
medium-sized tanks, totalling 11,000 tanks. There are also 600 
of the model 60 and model 63 amphibious tanks and model 62 light 
tanks. There are 2,000 model 531, 55, and 56 armored personnel 
carriers. There are 16,000 guns and howitzers which are 76-mm, 
85-mm, 100-mm, 122-mm, 130-mm, and 152-mm. These include the 
Soviet-made Su-76, Su-85, Su-100, Su-l22 and Su-152, as well as 
the China made K-76 model 122-mm advanced guns of various 
models. There are Frog surface-to-surface missiles, 32,000 
mortars of 60 mm, 82 mm, 120 mm, and 160 mm. There are 3,500 
field rocket launchers of 107 mm, 130 mm, 140 mm, and 180 mm. 
There are 57-mm, 75-mm, and 82-mm recoilless rifles. There are 
76-mm, 85-mm, and 100-mm anti-tank guns. There are Pur-64 
Firebox anti-tank missiles. There are model 58 and 56 14.5-mm 
anti-aircraft machine guns and 37-mm, 57-mm, 85-mm, and 100-mm 
anti-aircraft guns. 
  Force deployment: 
  China has eight military regions. They are made up of the 
29 individual military districts. The main force units are 
deployed in the military regions. However, they are still 
commanded and assigned by the Central Military Commission. 
China's Army Divisions are divided into A class (first-line 
units), B class (these only have a small number of tanks and 
some of the transportation is done using horses) and C class 
(smaller number of tanks, guns, equipment, and men). The local 
unit divisions are all C class divisions. 
  The main force units and the local units are distributed 
roughly as shown below (not including artillery forces and 
engineering forces): 
  Northeast: Shenyang units, subordinates are the 
Heilongjiang, Jilin and Liaoning Military Districts. Possesses 
three armored divisions, 18 infantry divisions and 17 local 
divisions including two to three divisions of border defense 
units. 
  North China: Beijing units, subordinates are the Hebei and 
Shandong Military Districts. Possesses five armored divisions, 
28 infantry divisions and 12 local divisions. 
  Northwest China: Lanzhou units, subordinates are the Gansu, 
Ningxia, Qinghai and Shaanxi Military Districts. Possesses one 
armored division, eight infantry divisions, and four local 
divisions, including two to three divisions of border defense 
forces. 
  Xinjiang: Urumqi units, subordinates are Eastern, Northern 
and Southern Xinjiang Military Districts. Possesses six 
infantry divisions and eight local divisions, including two to 
three divisions of border defense units. 
  Southwest: Chengdu units, subordinates are Sichuan and the 
Tibet, Guizhou, and Yunnan Military Districts. Possesses 15 
infantry divisions and 11 local divisions, including two to 
three divisions of border defense forces. 
  Guangzhou units, subordinates are the Guangdong, Guangxi, 
Hainandao, and Hunan Military Districts. Possesses 12 infantry 
divisions and 11 local divisions, including two to three 
divisions of border defense forces. 
  Central China: Wuhan units, subordinates are the Henan 
and Hubei Military Districts. Possesses 11 infantry divisions 
and three paratroop divisions and seven local divisions. 
  East China: Jinan units, subordinate is the Shandong 
Military District. Possesses one armored division, eight 
infantry divisions, and three local divisions. 
  Nanjing Units, subordinates are the Anhui, Jiangsu, and 
Zhejiang Military Districts. Possesses one armored division, 
six infantry divisions and six local divisions. 
  Fuzhou Units, subordinates are the Fujian and Jiangxi 
Military Districts. Possesses six infantry divisions and six 
local divisions. 
  Within the ground forces there also several million 
reserves. The Chinese Militia' is divided into two classes. The 
first is the backbone militia, with members from 16 to 30 years 
old. They have served their military service or are about to 
enter the military. They form an armed militia. There are 
around five million men forming 75 backbone militia and 2,000 
regiments. The other class is the ordinary militia. The 
members are from 17 to 48 years old. There are several million 
of these, including urban militia. They receive a certain amount 
of basic training, but usually are not issued weapons. Some 
militia are assigned air defense missions. 
  Civil Production and Construction Corps, about four million 
men. They are organized like military units and work in border 
regions. 
  What does the army rely upon to protect this wide beautiful 
country of ours? Three treasures -- tanks, missiles, and 
infantry. 
  Tanks: The new model 80 main battle tanks stretch from the 
mountains to the sea in combat exercises. 
  Tanks are the "kings of ground warfare." The model 80 tank 
is a third generation tank. It is one of the best in the world. 
China already has the capability for large batch production of 
these tanks. However, because of budgetary restrictions, this 
new model 80 main battle tank (four different model numbers) as 
well as a new armored combat vehicle developed jointly with 
foreign cooperation is only supplied in small numbers to our 
units and for export. Most other new model armored equipment is 
also only issued to a small number of group armies. 
  Rocket launchers stand like forests and the rockets like 
sharp arrows pointed at the blue sky. China's combat readiness 
units and missile attack forces, are primarily the Second 
Artillery Forces, the Air Force and defense forces. 
  Equipment of the Second Artillery Forces: 
  Intercontinental Ballistic Missiles: Four CSS-3 missiles 
with 
a range of 7,000 kilometers, and a one- to three-megaton 
warhead. It is believed that the CSS-4 is already under 
production. It has a range of 13,000 kilometers and a warhead 
of five to ten megatons. 
  Intermediate Range Ballistic Missiles: From 65 to 85 CSS-2 
missiles with a range of 2,500 kilometers and a yield of one to 
three megatons. 
  Secondary Intermediate Range Missiles: About 50 CSS-1 
missiles with a range of 180 kilometers and a yield of 15,000 
tons. 
  China has already newly copied and domestically produced 
portable air defense missiles, HT system anti-tank missiles, and 
it also possesses HQ, HN, FM, RF, and PL system intermediate- 
and short-range surface-to-air defense missiles. These allow 
Chinese ground forces to begin moving toward modernization. 
  Air Force Equipment: Three air regiments with a total of 
90 B-6 medium bombers. 
  Defense Forces: 1. Ballistic missile warning phased array 
radar set up in West China. 2. Air Force defense system: 
Provides limited defense for major cities and industrial areas, 
military facilities and military industries. There are around 
4,000 Navy and Air Force fighters, about 85 Red Flag 2 
surface-to-air missiles and more than 10,000 anti-aircraft guns 
tasked with this mission. 3. In Beijing and other major cities 
there are shelters and dispersal systems. These were built 
during the Cultural Revolution. 
  China's rapid-reaction forces, should they ever be needed, 
can assemble at any location in China within a very short time. 
Also, the Army's newly established Army Air Corps can, 
according to the plan, equip each group army with a helicopter 
regiment. In combat they can provide air mobility, support, 
combat command and casualty transport. There is no denial that 
there have already been some major changes in high mobility and 
integrated combat capabilities, command capabilities and 
strategy and tactics. 
<H5>  The Chinese Navy </H5>
  Back in the early 1970's, the Chinese Navy had already 
begun to draw up an offshore defensive strategy. 
  The Navy has a total of 360,000 men, including 38,000 in 
the Naval Air Force and 38,000 in the coastal Defense Units. It 
has 55 main surface combatants and 100 attack submarines. 
  1. Submarines: Two Han class nuclear powered fleet 
submarines, one G class missile conventional submarine, and 97 
conventional powered submarines. These include 74 R class 
submarines, 20 W class submarines, two Ming class submarines 
and one 5-1 class submarine. 
  2. Surface ships: Eighteen destroyers, all armed with 
ship-to-ship missiles, including 14 domestically produced Liuda 
class and four refitted Soviet Gordy class Anshan model 
destroyers. 
  Twenty-seven escort ships, including fourteen domestically 
produced Jianghu class armed with ship-to-ship missiles, four 
refitted Soviet Riga class Chengdu models, and four Jiangdong 
class armed with ship-to-air missiles, and five Jiangnan class. 
  Ten old model escort ships, built by Japan, England and 
Australia. 
  There are 182 attack launches armed with ship-to-ship 
missiles. These include 90 domestically produced Soviet-type 
Huangfeng class, 90 Soviet-type Wenzi class and domestically 
produced Hekou class, one Henan class and one Hema class. There 
are 46 submarine chasers, including 25 Hainan class, 20 
Kronshtadt class and one U.S.-built 173 foot model. 
  There are 398 gun patrol boats including 15 Shanghai-I, 350 
Shanghai-II, six Hekou class, 25 Shantou class and two Shandong 
class hydrofoils. 
  There are 225 torpedo launches, including 70 P-6, 130 
Huchuan class hydrofoils, and 25 P-4 (there are also 40 in 
reserve). 
  There are about 100 coastal and river patrol boats. 
  There are 17 T-43 class ocean radar boats. 
  There are 15 U.S- built 511-1152 LSTs, 17 mechanized 
landing ships, 16 infantry landing ships, about 300 universal 
landing craft and 150 mechanized craft. 
  There are 500 small coastal and river defense boats. 
  Naval deployment and bases: 
  North Sea Fleet: About 500 ships and boats, including two 
submarine squadrons defending the area from the mouth of the 
Yalu south to Lianyungang. The headquarters is at Qingdao. 
Other bases are Luda, Huludao, Weihai and Chengshan. 
  East Sea Fleet: About 750 ships and boats with authority 
over waters north to Lianyungang and south to Dongshandao. The 
headquarters is in Shanghai. Other bases are Zhoushan, Xiamen, 
Fuzhou and Dachendao. 
  South Sea Fleet: About 600 ships and boats defending the 
area from Dongshandao to the border with Vietnam. It has a 
submarine squadron. The headquarters is at Zhanjiang, and 
other bases include Shantou, Guangzhou, Haikou and Yulin. 
  There are 38,000 men in the Naval Air Force. Equipment 
includes about 800 combat aircraft based along the coast. It 
has three bomber divisions and six interceptor divisions. Its 
equipment and aircraft include 150 B-5 torpedo bombers and 
Soviet Tu-2 light bombers, about 600 fighters which include F-5, 
F-6, F-7, A-5 and Soviet MIG-19 fighters as well as Jianzhen-6 
reconnaissance aircraft. It has 20 Soviet Be-6 hydroplanes, 40 
Zhi-5 helicopters and about 60 light transport aircraft. The 
Navy's fighters are assigned to the air defense system. 
  In order to meet naval combat requirements, in the 1980's 
the new models of missile escorts and destroyers with which the 
units were equipped began to appear along China's coast. A 
number of long ocean-going cruises were conducted in the 
Pacific, to Antarctica and the Indian Ocean. 
  The new 3500-ton missile destroyer. This destroyer is 
equipped with the Haiying-2 ship-to-ship missile, the latest 
anti-submarine systems and a satellite navigation system as well 
as an armed helicopter pad which can accommodate Zhi-9 take offs 
and landings. It is expected that the new generation larger 
destroyer will be launched by the end of this century. 
  The 053HZ missile escorts deployed in 1986: There are two 
models of this vessel. This model carries the SY-l ship-to-ship 
missile and one 100-mm gun. It also has eight C-801 systems. 
  The other model of the 053HZ is equipped with an eight tube 
Ocean Sidewinder ship-to-air missile launcher. This new model 
escort is also equipped with a six-tube chaff propulsion 
apparatus, and anti-submarine deep water mines, anti-submarine 
torpedo tubes and tow-type array sonar. 
  Another new model escort: This has also added China's 
first vertical launch system and a new model ship-to-air fire 
control system as well as new air search radar. This allows for 
a marked improvement in the degree of automation of the vessel's 
electronic equipment and power system. 
  Because the Chinese Navy is responsible for protecting 
ocean trade and ocean transport routes and special economic 
zones as well as maintaining a balance of naval power with other 
areas, since the 1980's, it has begun to emphasize the 
development of large fleets and long-range deployment and has 
conducted amphibious landing combat exercises. 
  The superiority of the Chinese Navy lies in its submarine 
fleet. 
  The submarine fleet has always been the pride of the 
Chinese Navy. China now ranks third in the world in the number 
of submarines, second only to the United States and the former 
Soviet Union. It has more than 100 conventionally powered 
submarines, second in the world. 
  China's nuclear submarines and patrol missile submarines. 
These can carry 12 nuclear ballistic missiles with yields from 
200 to 5,000. They can attack most targets in the world and can 
cruise for long periods of time under the ocean. This is part 
of China's nuclear deterrent forces. 
  The submarines currently in service in China's Navy are of 
many types. They number among the most in the world. However, 
in level of submarine design and construction, China cannot 
compare with the United States and Europe. China does, however, 
possess a complete research and production system which does not 
require any outside assistance. This is the motive power which 
will allow for the development of even newer models of surface 
and underwater combat vessels in the future. Therefore, China 
pays special attention to its submarine forces, especially its 
missile submarine forces, which are a key element of the PLA 
Navy. 
  The submarines currently in service in the Chinese Navy are: 
  1. The W class. The first submarine China built on its own 
was the Soviet W (Whiskey) class submarine. This class was 
based on a modification of a German U-2l submarine captured 
during World War II. 
  2. The R class. The R (Romeo) class is the backbone of 
China's submarine forces. Those built earlier were called the 
031 model ES3B. Those built later were the 033 models. The R 
class is slightly larger than the W class submarines and is more 
streamlined. There was also some improvement of the conning 
tower, which is slightly smaller than that of the W class. The 
overall length is 76.8 meters, and it is 7.3 meters across the 
beam. The displacement is about 1400 tons on the surface and 
1800 tons submerged. It has a continuous cruise time of 60 
days. It can operate in a fixed position for ten days. Its 
combat radius is 1800 nautical miles, and its cruising speed is 
nine knots. Maximum cruise distance is 9,000 nautical miles. 
  3. The Wuhan class 
  In 1981, China completed refitting the 033 model 
submarines, adding anti-ship missiles. These were given the 
designator ES5G, and were also called the Wuhan class. The 
major difference in the Wuhan class is installation of C-801 
model missiles inside the cowling bulging along the side of the 
ship on either side of the conning tower. The submarine must 
first surface and raise the launcher before it can launch. Its 
external dimensions are similar to those of the 033 model. 
However, it is heavier than the 033 model, with a displacement 
of 1650 tons on the surface and 2100 tons submerged. The power 
equipment is also the same as that of the 033 model. 
  4. The G Class 
  China's first guided missile submarine was the Soviet G 
(Golf) class guided missile submarine. Its serial number is 
200. Its keel was laid in 1962, and it was completed and 
launched in 1964. 
  The G class submarine is 98 meters long and 8.5 meters 
across the beam. It has a displacement of 2350 tons on the 
surface and 2950 tons submerged. It is powered by 6,000 
horsepower, and it cruises at 17 knots on the surface and 13 
knots submerged. It has a combat radius of 20,000 nautical 
miles. 
  5. The Ming class 
  The Ming class is a modification of the 033 model. It was 
used to replace the 033 model submarines. It is called the 035 
model. The external shape is similar to that of the 033 model, 
although it is just slightly smaller and heavier. The first 
three of these submarines were of the ES5C/D class and were 
completed between 1971 and 1979. After 1987, modifications were 
the ES5E class, which were slightly larger. 
  6. The Han class 
  The Han class is China's first generation nuclear powered 
submarine. China began developing a nuclear powered submarine 
in the late 1950's. Construction work on the first nuclear 
powered submarine began in November of 1968. It was launched on 
26 December, 1970. Following launching it went though more than 
200 tests in the category of dock tests, surface tests, shallow 
water tests and deep water tests. All together it sailed 20 
times over 6,000 nautical miles before completing these tests. 
In was placed in service on 1 August 1974. It is called the 
Changjiang I, and it marked China's entry into the nuclear 
submarine age. 
  7. The Xia class 
  The Xia class is China's first nuclear powered strategic 
missile submarine. Work on its construction began in 1978, and 
it was launched in April 1981. It was placed in service in 
1987. It has been claimed that the second of this class 
submarines was launched in 1982. 
  China really needs an aircraft carrier. However, because 
of the lack of finances, she is not able to build or buy one. 
To construct a 30,000 to 40,000 ton class aircraft carrier 
would require at least 2 to 5 billion yuan. Lack of finances not 
only block aircraft carrier plans, China does not even have the 
capability to build a cruiser or a VTOL fighter. Supplemental 
support facilities for this carrier would cost another one 
billion yuan. 
  In Huangpu in Guangzhou, there is an old dilapidated 
aircraft carrier. It looks like a dock. It just floats there. 
People with nothing to do walk in small groups across its 
massive deck. 
  This goes back to 1989, when the Chinese Navy purchased 
this carrier from Australia to dismantle. Because it is a 
decommissioned aircraft carrier, China bought it for the price 
of a scrap vessel and placed it here for reference. For Chinese 
scientific personnel who have only seen an aircraft carrier on 
paper, having first hand material when beginning from scratch is 
of the utmost importance. These few years, the Chinese naval 
design personnel have looked at it and studied it, and there are 
often large groups of scientists of different specialties and 
from different agencies who will draw up blueprints, study it 
and look at it. 
  China's simulation flight deck was done using the deck of 
this aircraft carrier. 
  Now, that aircraft carrier which was used for drafting and 
observation is still there for people to make use of. 
  This is still China's only aircraft carrier. 
  Another area where China's navy has superiority is its 
marine forces. Most of the personnel come from the Army. This 
branch has the capability of amphibious combat and high 
mobility. It will play an extremely major role in placing 
military forces ashore in combat. Currently, although the 
Chinese Marine Force is not large, the Chinese Navy has a strong 
transport capability, and based on China's original battle order 
deployment, most of the vessels would be concentrated in the 
North Sea Fleet and East Sea Fleet, but the South Sea Fleet has 
recently been equipped with two Yukang class LSTs (China has a 
total of three) and in the 1980's, the newly-built Jingsha class 
amphibious troop transports. It is not difficult to see that at 
the present time, the situation in the Nansha Islands is forcing 
China to begin to consider providing necessary support for naval 
battles such as providing air support. 
  According to statistics, the Chinese Navy has more than 60 
large landing ships which in the middle 1990's will be able to 
transport 75,000 troops and 400 tanks and armored personnel 
carriers to locations several hundred kilometers within 60 to 90 
days. This does not include the vessels belonging to eight 
reserve divisions and several mobile air transport divisions. It 
can requisition 460 vessels of 1000-ton class or larger, with 
310 to 315 as dry cargo vessels as well as civilian boats which 
can supplement personnel supply. 
  China has also built new model intelligence gathering 
boats. In recent years China has built a series of intelligence 
gathering boats based on research vessels and ice breakers which 
China currently possesses. The largest of these is the 
Xiangyanghong-9. Another large intelligence gathering boat is 
the Dadi class. This class of vessel was designed to track task 
fleets. It has an ingenious prow and is capable of fairly high 
speeds. China's defensive strategy is currently in transition 
toward a deep water defensive strategy. However, this 
strategy only calls for conducting combat on an effective scale 
several hundred kilometers from land, and not several thousand 
kilometers. 
  Foreign military experts predict that by early in the next 
century, the Chinese Navy will emphasize construction of large 
combat ships with advanced equipment. Next, by the year 2020, 
it will construct two to three light aircraft carriers with a 
displacement of 20,000 to 30,000 tons. It will build or 
purchase VTOL fighter aircraft for aircraft carrier use. It 
will also purchase or build a batch of ships to form a carrier 
group. By the year 2040 it will have achieved or approached 
the combat capabilities of the United States, and will be able 
to go any place in the world to conduct missions. 
  This is a difficult challenge facing the Chinese Navy. 
India has already purchased two British-built aircraft carriers 
and is preparing to buy another and to build three of its own. 
The Japanese Naval Self Defense Force already has more 
destroyers and escort ships than China or India. Focusing on 
Chinese superiority in submarines over India, Japan has 
developed a first rate anti-submarine force. It recently passed 
a law to allow for forces to be sent outside of Japan. Actually, 
it already ranks sixth in the world. 
<H5>  The Chinese Air Force </H5>
  On the eve of the establishment of the New China, the 
PLA only had one air squadron and eight field anti-aircraft 
artillery regiments responsible for air defense combat. After 
the formal establishment of the Air Force in November of 1949, 
organic units were assigned from the Army, and the backbone 
cadre was made up of outstanding officers and men, some 
intellectuals and technical personnel from the former 
Nationalist Air Force. First of all, they established some 
flight schools and then set up units. By 1956, they had already 
formed a large batch of air divisions. After 1957, the air 
defense forces and air forces combined, and the Air Force added 
anti-aircraft artillery forces, search light forces, radar 
forces and ground-to-air missile forces. Since 1978, Air Force 
units have phased out old equipment, improved the manning 
system, and added combat personnel, resulting in a more 
professional and ideal organization. By the 1980's, the PLA Air 
Force had become a modernized combat force capable of 
independently conducting the air defense mission over national 
territory, and also capable of coordinated land, sea and air 
combat. 
  The more than 40 years of its development can be divided 
into three major stages. The first stage is from 1949 to 1953 
which was the tempering stage of its establishment and the 
Korean War. This was followed by the overall construction and 
development stage of 1954 to 1976. The third stage was the new 
stage ushering in an entirely new era. Our Air Force now has 
air forces, anti-aircraft artillery forces, ground-to-air 
missile forces, radar forces and communication forces. These 
are the primary forces used by our Air Force in aerial combat 
and to attack surface targets from the air. 
  The Air Force currently has 590,000 men, including 220,000 
in strategic units with 5,200 combat aircraft. 
  China is divided up into ten military air districts. Its 
headquarters is in Beijing. There are a number of air 
divisions, with each division having three air regiments and 
each regiment having three squadrons. They are equipped with the 
following types of aircraft: 
  Medium bombers: 95 B-6 and a small number of Soviet Tu-4 
aircraft. 
  Light bombers: About 450 B-5 and Soviet Tu-2 aircraft. 
  Fighter bombers: About 500 MiG-15 and A-5 aircraft. 
  Fighters: About 3,900 F-5, F-6 and F-7 aircraft. 
  Reconnaissance aircraft: About 130 Jiancha-6 and Hongcha-5 
aircraft. 
  Transport aircraft: About 550 fixed-wing aircraft including 
about 300 Y-5/AN-2 aircraft, about 100 Soviet-type aircraft 
including Li-2 aircraft, and 50 1-4 and 1-18 aircraft. There are 
also some An-12, An-24, An-6 and Tu-18 aircraft, 18 British 
Tridents and some DC-3 and C-46 aircraft. When necessary, Air 
Force transport units can obtain support from China Civil 
Aviation Administration. That administration possesses about 
500 aircraft, including some 150 large transport aircraft. 
  Helicopters: 350, including Zhi-5/Mi-4 AND Zhi-6/Mi-8, l3 
French Super Wasps and 15 French Skylarks. 
  Trainers: These include Chujiao-5 and 6, MiG-I5UTI, FT-5 
and FT-6 aircraft. 
  The air-to-air missiles used by the Air Force are similar 
to Soviet AA-2 Atoll weapons. In China they are called 
Sidewinders. The Air Force also has three airborne divisions. 
  Prior to the 1980's, the Air Force was poorly equipped. In 
March of 1980, in order to meet the requirements of Deng 
Xiaoping's directive that "in future wars, being backward will 
mean that one will be passive and will be beaten," the Air Force 
drafted a "Five Year Plan for Major Equipment for the Air Force" 
and "Some Ideas on Developing Major Equipment for the Air Force 
in Ten Years." Based on these ideas, beginning in 1980, the 
equipment with which our Air Force has been equipped include the 
interceptors the F-7II, F-7IIH, F-8, F-8I, F-8III, and F-8II. 
Ground attack aircraft have included the A-5I and the A-5II. 
Bombers include the B-6 equipped with second generation 
navigation, bombing and gun systems. Transport aircraft include 
the Y-8 and the Tu-154M. Helicopters include the Zhi-9, the 
Blackhawk and the Super Puma. There are also several types of 
drone aircraft. These aircraft have such equipment and weapons 
as air-to-air missiles, airborne radar, fire control systems, 
communications and guidance equipment and flight control 
systems, all of which are greatly improved. In 1986 the A-5 
series aircraft flew over the reviewing stand at Tiananmen at 
the ceremonies celebrating the 35th anniversary of National Day, 
amazing people around the world. 
  At a major foreign air show in 1988, the A-5 smartly 
performed acrobatic maneuvers. When the aircraft flew upside 
down at 80 meters in front of the reviewing stand, a general 
from a certain friendly nation remarked to the delegation from 
China, "This is something for you to be proud of, and is 
something for us to be proud of." 
  This was China's supersonic ground attack aircraft which 
attracted a tremendous amount of attention at the 37th World Air 
Show in 1987. However, it is now out of date, and has become a 
trainer aircraft for basic flight schools. 
  In October of 1986, an imported Blackhawk made its first 
flight successfully to Motuo in Tibet, attracting worldwide 
attention. A night flight exercise by the Super Puma helicopter 
excited the officers and men of the Air Force. 
  The F-8III aircraft is even better liked. It is equipped 
with a 500-mm antenna fire control radar, optic nerve fire 
control system, externally hung missiles, rockets, a new 
Wopen-15 engine, canon-launched ejection equipment and strange 
shaped large fuel tanks. It has all weather combat capability. 
  In 1993, China purchased 20 of the newest Su-27 modernized 
fighters from Russia. 
  This is the aircraft that was the star of the 1989 World 
Air Show. At that time, when the military experts of the United 
States and its allies saw that aircraft, they were amazed, and 
said that "After seeing the Su-27 made by the Soviets, we no 
longer feel that Western military aviation technology is as far 
ahead as we first believed." No wonder that later when the 
United States sold F-16 fighters to Taiwan they frankly stated 
that "in consideration of the recent purchase of a group of 
advanced fighter aircraft by China from Russia, we have come to 
this decision in order to maintain the balance of power on 
either side of the Straits." 
  China's Air Force equipment is overall about 15 years 
behind the level of the West. In 1989, the Western arms embargo 
against China has had an effect on China's purchase of combat 
aircraft and spare parts. However, the A-5M improved 
electronics eguipmient, the K-8 joint research, the A-7M export 
model impoved electronics system and the improved missile 
attack system of the Hong twin-engine bomber as well as the 
Y7-2000 pressurized aircraft research have all proceeded 
smoothly. It is worth mentioning that in order to allow the 
Chinese Air Force and Navy to develop toward long range and blue 
water, China has obtained U.S-built Beech aerial refueling pods 
and bolt type refueling hoses. This has allowed China to obtain 
aerial refueling methods. At the same time, the Chinese Air 
Force is continuing to search for a suitable aerial early 
warning system. It has purchased a British built Liemi [3756 
6617] early warning system and Suo'en [4792 1869] super 
detection level search radar and circumference steering radar. 
This may be installed on the Y-8 and Y-12 to make them early 
warning planes. In addition, the Chinese Air Force is importing 
and copying more advanced missile technology so these can be 
produced in China. The new Thunderbolt short range air-to-air 
combat missiles will allow the Chinese Air Force to markedly 
improve its short range aerial combat capabilities. 
  After the Gulf War, China accelerated the pace of 
development of new model aircraft. The purpose was to put 
direct pressure on the United States. While the United States 
was embroiled in the Gulf War and getting effective bombing from 
its F-117 fighter bombers, in the fall of 1992, an imitation 
which was an even superior fighter bomber was made at a certain 
location in Southwest China. 
  This was a ray of 21st century light shining on the Chinese 
Air Force. 
<H5>  First Rate Officers and Men </H5>
  A British general who had been in the Korean War stated 
that "I have been a soldier all my life, and I have fought the 
Germans and I have fought the Chinese. I have seen U.S. and 
Soviet forces fight. German Troops are very good, but the best 
in my opinion are the Chinese troops. I really admire them." 
  The Chinese Revolutionary Military Museum. The Chinese 
People's Liberation Army was founded on 1 August 1927 in the 
Nanchang Uprising. It has fought numerous battles through land 
reform, the war against Japan, the war of liberation, the Korean 
War, and in protecting its borders. This is a history of blood 
and fire. This is a history of development from nothing into 
something, from small to large, and from weak to strong. Here 
in this museum there is a special display for each historical 
era. No one who visits here will ever forget those historical 
objects soaked in gun smoke, blood, and sweat. 
  The old Mauser pistol that was first fired by He Long is 
here. It was this pistol that aroused the powerful army from its 
sleep. 
  The red flag from Jinggangshan is here. It ignited the 
fierce fire of China's revolutionary rural villages that 
surrounded the cities. 
  There are grass sandals from the Long March here. They are 
a silent record of the songs of victory of a generation of 
heroes. 
  There are swords here which were snatched from the hands of 
the Japanese Bandits. One wonders how many Chinese compatriots 
died under those swords. And finally, the Eighth Route Army 
held that sword against the throats of the Japanese Bandits. 
  There are fragments of a U.S. U-2 plane here. It was shot 
down by our People's Air Force from 20,000 meters in Chinese 
territorial air space shortly after the founding of our nation. 
Before these historical objects, before all these battle flags, 
everyone who visits is filled with emotion, thoughts and 
imaginations. Perhaps you would also feel something, and 
suddenly raise your hand and shout: "No one has ever been able 
to defeat the PLA." This is true. This is not a moot point; it 
is a fact. This is not hope; it is history. 
  It was this impoverished army which once relied on knives 
and spears to do battle with Nationalist regulars, to do battle 
with the most barbaric Japanese imperialists, with the U.S. 
imperialists who were armed to the teeth, with the bearded 
invaders from India, the tanks of the Soviets who invaded 
Chinese Zhenbaodao, and the ungrateful students of China from 
Vietnam who invaded. No matter who they fought, they were never 
defeated. 
  It was this impoverished army that used knives and spears 
in a struggle against the enemy with rifles and guns, that wore 
grass sandals on their feet in a race with enemy trucks, that 
used small caliber weapons against modernized aircraft cannons. 
With a difference in weaponry that is impossible to imagine, 
they fought the enemy with unimaginable boldness and tactics, 
and as a result they won victories that many people found 
unimaginable. 
  In their progress toward modernization, Chinese military 
personnel are aiming at the commanding ground of science and 
technology in future wars. It is accelerating the process of 
changing over to a military which is more specialized, more 
educated and younger. In almost 14 years time, the percentage of 
general ranking officers with a college degree has increased 
from l0 to 70 percent. It has implemented a system where 
military officers are given basic, intermediate and high level 
officers training on a periodic basis. This has allowed 90 
percent of military officers in military and political command 
positions to maintain a grasp of combat command under modern 
conditions. The Chinese military personnel are now moving 
toward future battlefields with a brand new appearance. 
<H5>  III: HOW CAN MILITARY FORCE BE USED TO RECOVER TAIWAN </H5>
<H5>  The Historical Footnote of the "Taiwan Independence" Movement </H5>
  9 December 1991. Taoyuan Airport, Taiwan. A middle-aged man 
in a western suit had just gotten off a 747 which had arrived 
from Los Angeles and was heading for the exit. 
  The girl at the Customs desk politely asked him for his 
passport. This man with a scar across the left side of his face 
and a cigar hanging out of his mouth arrogantly pulled out his 
blue passport and gave it to her. She looked at the picture of 
this man called Li Decai. The picture did not show any scar. 
She looked at the man again, and he reminded her of someone. 
  "Would you come with me, please." She led the middle-aged 
man into the Customs Inspection Office. 
  There, even though this man who called himself Li Decai was 
very calm and answered all questions smoothly, he had been 
caught with a fake passport. Actually, this man was Zhangxian 
Hongjin, the "Chairman of the Taiwan Independence League" for 
whom an arrest warrant had been issued l4 years ago by the 
Taiwanese "Garrison Command" and the "Procuracy of the Supreme 
Court" for the crime of insurrection. 
  The headquarters of the "Taiwan Independence League" had 
always been in Los Angeles. For the past several years it had 
claimed that it was going to "move the League back to Taiwan." 
  "Excuse me, sir, but aren't you the Chairman of the Taiwan 
Independence League, Zhangxian Hongjin?" 
  "Yes, I am Zhangxian Hongjin." 
  Seeing that his fake passport had been detected, there was 
nothing for him to do but tell the truth. "I'm sorry, but you 
are under arrest!" An officer in police uniform came out from 
an inner office and brought out a warrant for his arrest. He 
looked as if he had been waiting for this for a long time. 
  "Excuse me, but are there any members of the Democratic 
Progressive Party here?" asked Zhangxian Hongjin looking at the 
officer with the warrant, as if this were part of a plan. 
"Please do not do anything that would harm Taiwan. You should 
act in the best interest of Taiwan. My purpose for coming to 
Taiwan is to establish the `Independent Nation of Taiwan' with 
my brothers and sisters in Taiwan." 
  "You are not mistaken, otherwise, we would not have been 
here to meet you. You ride in my car," said the policeman very 
politely and humorously. 
  On January 17, 1992, Taiwan Police Headquarters charged him 
with "plotting insurrection" and arrested him on that day. The 
charges were that while he was chairman of the Taiwan 
Independence League, Zhangxian Hongjin had ordered others to 
mail letter bombs and carry out violent activities, and that he 
was guilty of being the mastermind behind these activities. 
  At his trial, Zhang did not admit any guilt. However, he 
did not express any anger. He maintained himself as a proud 
general unflinching in a crisis. He asked, "Do you people have 
no regard for public opinion?" 
  That is true, over the past several years, Taiwan 
Independence activities have become more and more expansive. 
  Since February of 1991, there has been an increase in 
Taiwan Independence activities. These activities have shifted 
from covert to overt actions and from independent action to 
concerted actions. The "Committee for the Campaign for Taiwanese 
Sovereignty and Independence" of the Democratic Progressive 
Party has been coming out with all sorts of propaganda materials 
such as English and Chinese language literature and video tapes 
and has been trying to sell such Taiwan Independence materials 
abroad as "Taiwan is independent and is not part of the 
People's Republic of China which has its capital in Beijing" and 
"Our country's sovereignty does not include the Chinese mainland 
and Inner Mongolia." They have also attempted to "align with 
blocs in Taiwan and overseas who support this political 
platform" to "work together to promote this campaign." 
  In May of 1991, authorities in Taiwan announced that "the 
period of mobilization for the suppression of insurrection" 
would come to an end as of 1 May. On this basis, they attempted 
to achieve a position of equality with us as an equal political 
body," and used this to promote "flexibility in diplomatic 
affairs" and "expand space for survival in international 
affairs." They fantasized about using the "Taiwan experience" 
for the "peaceful transition on the mainland." They called for 
such things as one country "two capitals" and "mutual 
recognition," which are nothing more than insisting on two 
Chinas, one Taiwan, one China. 
  In September of 1991, several people advocating Taiwan 
Independence held a so-called "Peoples Constitutional 
Conference" which passed a "Draft of a Taiwan Constitution" 
which publicly called the name of its country "The Republic of 
Taiwan." A number of people advocating Taiwan independence got 
together and in two days time they had a short debate, and with 
only half of the people present casting votes, they hastily 
passed the so-called draft of the constitution. How can this be 
called representative of the will of the people? This is a 
serious incident splitting up the nation, splitting up the 
people and seriously trampling the will of the people on both 
sides of the Straits. 
  Around 13 September 1991, there were more than 50 
businessmen in Taiwan who went to the United States to 
demonstrate for Taiwan's entry into the United Nations. A 
spokesman for our Foreign Ministry said that "Taiwan's attempts 
at joining the United Nations are absurd and futile." 
  On 4 October 1991, several prominent members of Taiwan's 
Democratic Progressive Party spoke at a number of different 
gatherings claiming that "The Republic of Taiwan" had been 
placed into the party platform of the Democratic Progressive 
Party. They claimed that this was a forgone conclusion and 
publicly announced that the Democratic Progressive Party was the 
party of "Taiwan Independence." 
  This must have been what Zhangxian Hongjin was referring to 
as public opinion, especially this announcement by the 
Democratic Progressive Party. Since the decision of the 
"Taiwanese Independence League" to "move the League back to 
Taiwan," Taiwan's Democratic Progressive Party has actually 
established a "support committee" for the return of the 
Taiwanese Independence League back to Taiwan. After Zhang's 
arrest, the Democratic Progressive Party has issued a call for 
leniency in his case. 
  However, the judge asked him if he would like to hear what 
public opinion was following the Democratic Progressive Party 
writing the "Taiwanese Independence Movement" into their 
platform. 
  Then, witnesses read materials attacking this action which 
had been received by the Democratic Progressive Party following 
this action, and of the results of polls. 
  At a roundtable discussion held on 29 September, a 
businessman in industry stated directly that the people in 
industry and commerce find the "demands" for Taiwanese 
Independence "unacceptable." 
  A large number of political and legal scholars on Taiwan 
all pointed out that risking the security of the people of 
Taiwan in such a manner is an irresponsible and dangerous 
action. Fu Kuncheng, professor of law at National Taiwan 
University, stated that an opposition party, no matter what its 
political stand, must have the concept of the same nation. The 
advocacy by the Democratic Progressive Party for "an independent 
Taiwan" is very dangerous and is irresponsible. 
  An editorial in Taiwan's UNITED DAILY NEWS stated that "the 
Democratic Progressive Party had better stop before it's too 
late." The editorial also stated that the reason the people 
oppose Taiwan independence is that it is a dead end. Also, it 
is a risk filled with many dangers. It is taking a political 
risk gambling the welfare of 20 million people. 
  The editorial also asked if the authorities on Taiwan could 
treat with appeasement and accommodation a traitorous clique 
like the Taiwan Independence Party which publicly claims its 
intention of fostering rebellion, and allow it to get away with 
whatever it wants. 
  On 14 October, on the mainland, Tang Shubei, a spokesman 
for the State Council Taiwan Affairs Office, expressed serious 
concern over the actions toward splitting the country by the 
Democratic Progressive Party. The Chinese Government has warned 
on a number of occasions that the government of China will not 
sit idly by if they continue to pay no heed and act on their 
own, continuing to act to divide the people and sell out 
national territory. 
  On 14 October in Taiwan, a spokesman for the Nationalist 
Party Central Committee expressed his disappointment with the 
new party platform of the Democratic Progressive Party, stating 
that the Nationalist Party would strongly denounce this action. 
  The Supreme Procurorate in Taiwan stated that it would wait 
until evidence was gathered by its investigative bureau before 
it could determine whether specific facts warranted charging 
anyone with the crimes of insurrection. 
  The opinion in Hong Kong was that it was not clear yet 
whether or not these actions constituted anything to fear. The 
headlines in Hong Kong's ECONOMIC DAILY read "Taiwan 
Independence Opportunism is a Reckless Gamble Doomed to Fail." 
  The Hong Kong TIANTIAN DAILY ran the headline "Taiwan 
Independence Party Is Cutting Its Own Throat." 
  The Hong Kong NANBAO ran the headline "Democratic 
Progressive Party Is Instigating Insurrection in Taiwan." 
  The Hong Kong OVERSEAS CHINESE DAILY ran the headline 
"Democratic Progressive Party and Taiwan Independence are 
Committing Suicide Together." 
  The Hong Kong XINBAO and XINGDAOBAO also ran articles 
harshly criticizing the Democratic Progressive Party for 
ignoring the interests of the nation and the people and for 
cutting the legs out from under the Nationalist Party. 
  An article in Taiwan's GONGSHANG SHIBAO under the banner of 
"We Strongly Denounce the Democratic Progressive Party's 
Advocacy of Taiwan Independence," stated that this action by the 
Democratic Progressive Party was "the ravings of a madman and 
has already reached a point where it is totally unreasonable." 
  These extremists "are counter to the will of the people, 
this 
is an extremely frightening attitude." 
  The Taiwan XINSHENG RIBAO stated that "The tactics by the 
Taiwan Independence movement are to gradually spread the demands 
for an independent Taiwan through making them public, making 
them part of society and making them international. They are 
taking advantage of loopholes in freedom of speech for actions 
aimed at Taiwan independence." 
  Finally, during the trial, the judge also quoted what Zhang 
had said in "Work and Direction of the Taiwan Independence 
Movement in the Present Stage." This article stressed that "If 
we are going to achieve a successful model for Taiwan 
Independence, we must use planned mass riots." The court decided 
that based on this evidence, the defendant "clearly" intended 
using force to promote "Taiwan Independence," "usurp national 
territory," and that he had taken action toward that goal. 
  This is the small footnote to the Taiwan Independence 
incidents in the early 1990's. 
  It is worth adding that when making this small historical 
footnote, in addition to the generations of hard work on both 
sides of the Straits and the exchanges between the two sides 
over the past several years, there are also the cherished hopes 
of Chiang Kaishek and his son. 
  Look at the following materials: 
  In an item from Hong Kong on 14 September 1979, according 
to statistics of the Taiwan Ministry of Interior, in that year 
there were 163,102 persons who went to the mainland to visit 
relatives, and there were 2,628 persons who went to Taiwan from 
the mainland. 
  From January through August of 1989, there were 370,000 
persons from Taiwan who visited the mainland to see relatives. 
In 1988 there were 300,000. Since November 1988, more than 
2,100 people have been granted permission to go to Taiwan to 
visit sick relatives or attend funerals. 
  In 1989, the Taiwan Sports Delegation made its first visit 
to Beijing. 
  From January through June 1989, trade between the two 
totalled $1.74 billion, a 57-percent increase over the same 
period in 1988. Taiwanese investment on the mainland continues 
to grow, and from January through June, 135 joint ventures were 
approved in the province of Fujian alone, with a joint venture 
investment of $124 million. 
  As of February 1991, the number of compatriots from Taiwan 
who had gone to the mainland to visit relatives, as tourists, on 
tours and to do business had reached one million. The total 
amount of indirect trade between the two sides had grown from 
$80 million in 1979 to more than $4 billion. 
  By 1992 more than 2,857 Taiwan businesses had invested in 
the mainland. The total investments were $3.6 billion (actually 
$20 billion). Seventy percent of this was concentrated in 
Guangdong and Fujian provinces. The other 30 percent was in 
other places such as Jiangsu, Shandong, Anhui, Beijing, 
Zhejiang, Sichuan, Liaoning, Jiangxi and Hainan. The primary 
projects were such labor intensive industries as raising eels, 
lumber processing, shoe manufacturing, umbrella manufacturing, 
clothing, chemical industries, electronics and textiles. 
  On 26 September 1991, when some people on the island of 
Taiwan began to deny that they were Chinese, Jiang Weiguo 
published an article in the United States stating that "Some 
people have fabricated the concept which separates the regional 
interests of Taiwan from the overall interests of China into two 
opposing factions. They claim that this is the universal common 
demand of the people living on Taiwan. They state that attempts 
to unify China are abandoning the wishes of 20 million people on 
Taiwan." Jiang Weiguo continued to criticize this. He said that 
the mainland and Taiwan are intimately tied together, and that 
"united they enjoy common prosperity and peace, and divided both 
sides are in danger and in difficulties." He felt that "those 
who are advocating splitting are laying the way for major powers 
(to invade China)." 
  He hoped that "all Chinese at home and overseas will not 
divide themselves by provinces, not divide themselves by 
political factions, but should, based on the fact that we are 
all Chinese, work to promote the giant undertaking of uniting 
China." 
  He felt that all Chinese on either side of the Straits and 
all over the world have three common desires. First is that 
Chinese people can only be peaceful at home and strong in 
foreign affairs if there is one single China. Second is that 
they all hope that they can have a good life. Third is that they 
can gain the respect of the entire world. 
  While making this small historical footnote, the Taiwan 
Nationalists authorities admit that "the unification of China is 
the common aspiration of all the Chinese people. It is also the 
best way of uniting all Chinese people to work together for the 
advancement of the Chinese race and a strong country." 
<H5>  "Taiwan Independence" Would Be the Fuse for "Recovery by </H5>
Force" 
<H5>  Taking Back Jinmen, With a Salute to the Spirits of its </H5>
Heroes 
  [Page 25 of original missing] 
  The most important thing in this offensive struggle was to 
have boats. There had to be boats. The key to victory or defeat 
was whether or not the boats, which could only transport the 
first echelon forces, would be able to return quickly after 
transporting the first echelon units and quickly carry the 
second echelon units. In order to accomplish this objective, 
three staff officers from the army headquarters were to be sent 
out with the first echelon units. Their mission was to be 
responsible for supervising and speeding up the return trip. 
However, because they had not been completely right about the 
sea conditions, the three staff officers tell a rough story. 
  The story of Staff Officer Li, who had accompanied the 
244th Regiment: Until the landing forces had secured a position 
on the beachhead, the fire was too fierce, and the workers on 
the boats all lay down to dodge the bullets, and it was 
impossible to organize the ships for the return trip. When the 
units had established a position on the beachhead, and when the 
tide had gone down to expose an additional 10 m of beach, all of 
the boats had run aground. The 244th Regiment could only keep 
on attacking, there was no hope of any help from protective 
forces. All Li could do was take it on his own to order the 
boat workers to do their best to free the boats. They only 
pushed off a few wooden boats, because they could not budge the 
motorized boats. A mortar shell came flying in, blowing Li to 
bits, and of the boats which had been freed, only two made the 
return trip to Lianhua harbor. No one knows what happened to 
the others. 
  The story of Staff Officer Lin who accompanied the 251st 
Regiment: Fortunately, he noticed that the tide was receding 
rapidly, and as soon as they reached the shore, he immediately 
ordered the ships to return, making the soldiers wade ashore. 
One third of the boats, twenty of them, stayed in the water and 
did not become grounded. However, just after these boats had 
left Jinmen, they were intercepted by two Nationalist gunboats. 
The boats did not have any protective weapons, and in the 
battle, staff officer Lin tried to protect the boats. After 
turning over command to the senior man, he took over one of the 
boats and rammed one of the gunboats, taking it to the bottom 
with him. 
  Many of the boats carrying the 259th Regiment also became 
grounded because it took more time to accomplish their landing. 
However, staff officer Wang pointed his pistol at the head of 
one of the battalion commanders, making him assign a company to 
push the grounded boats back into the water. More of this 
regiment's boats were saved than any of the other's. If these 
boats had been able to return without any problems, it is 
possible that the outcome of the battle would have been 
different. However, these boats became lost and sailed into 
Nationalist controlled waters, and were mistaken for Nationalist 
support boats by our long range artillery and all of them were 
sunk. Staff officer Wang was able to use his pistol to force 
the commander of the 3rd Battalion to send troops to help free 
the boats, and he used similar methods to force six soldiers to 
remain on the boats to protect them on their way back, but he 
was unable to signal the coastal artillery that they were 
friendly forces. Regrettably, he was killed by fire from his 
own forces. 
  With the second echelon forces unable to follow, the three 
regiments could only fight on their own. The bloody battle 
lasted three days and nights. The brave PLA landing forces had 
no supply and had no support. Under extremely difficult 
conditions, the isolated forces fought a bloody fight, causing 
heavy casualties among the Nationalist forces. During these 
three days and nights, it was almost one bloody battle after 
another. Each engagement was worse than the one before. This 
kept up until they ran out of ammunition and lost their 
position, and almost all the 10,000 heroic soldiers died bravely 
in the battle. Some jumped into the ocean and drowned, and some 
of the wounded were taken prisoner. 
  However, the Jinmen campaign was a defeat. This is one of 
the few mistakes in the general's life. It is also something he 
has regretted his entire life. 
  The next battle of Jinmen is perhaps not worth mentioning, 
not worth fighting. This battle is after all the first step on 
the way to Taiwan. This step will be taken by salvoes by the 
coastal artillery. However, these salvoes will not be like 
the conventional guns and "propaganda guns," but will be small 
homing missiles. Each missile will seek out the combat 
headquarters on Jinmen. They will all be aimed at the artillery 
placements and combat vessels on Jinmen. They will all hit 
their targets, and each will cause a great deal of damage. They 
will give no heed to ordinary battleworks, scattered troops or 
light weapons. They will hit only key places, a strike of 
several hours could paralyze the nerve network on the island, 
and the naval force would be able to mop up with no trouble at 
all. 
<H5>  Will the Primary Battle To Recover Taiwan Be Fought on </H5>
Taiwan? 
  Taiwan is situated more than 100 kilometers off the 
southeast 
coast of the Chinese mainland. The Pacific Ocean is to its 
East, and it is surrounded by the Penghu Islands, Diaoyu 
Islands, the Chiwei Islands, the Pengyu, Lanyu, and Huoshao 
Island. It covers 30,000 square kilometers and has a population 
of 20 million. The size of the Taiwan Straights is just enough 
to fit the island of Taiwan. The city of Xiamen is 170 nautical 
miles from Kaohsiung on the southern end of the island. The 
city of Fuzhou is 150 nautical miles from the port of Jilong on 
the northern end of the island. 
  The beautiful island of Taiwan, it has been the sacred 
territory of China since ancient times. In 1624 and in 1626, 
the Dutch and the Spanish colonialists invaded Tainan and 
Jilong, and from these two areas, expanded their invasion. At 
the end of the Ming Dynasty, in 1661 Chinese hero Zheng 
Chenggong led a large force which recovered Taiwan. Following 
the Sino-Japanese War in 1891, Taiwan was forcibly occupied by 
the Japanese invaders. During the miserable years of colonial 
rule under occupation by the Japanese Imperialists, the struggle 
of the compatriots on Taiwan to return to the embrace of the 
motherland never ceased. Including the Taiwan aborigine 
uprising in Taichung, there were more than 20 fairly large-scale 
battles, and as many as 100,000 people were killed. Following 
the end of World War II in 1945, according to the Cairo 
Declaration and the Potsdam Agreement, suzerainty over Taiwan 
was restored to China. Taiwan had been returned to the bosom of 
China. When the mainland was liberated in 1949, the Chiang 
Kai-shek clique fled to Taiwan, and in 1950, the United States 
imperialists used armed force to invade our sacred territory of 
Taiwan. 
  Taiwan has a history of being invaded, and the Chinese 
people on both sides of the Straits have no further desire for 
the fire and smoke of battle. 
  War means destruction. Whether armed might is used to 
recover Taiwan or whether peaceful reunification methods are 
used, the final goal of the mainland is to unite the people and 
material resources of the Chinese people, to vigorously develop 
the economy of China and to make the Chinese race stronger. 
Based on this principle, the recovery of Taiwan must not damage 
the economic structure of Taiwan. Therefore, no matter what the 
circumstances, a destructive recovery of Taiwan cannot be 
undertaken. It is possible to foresee that the main 
battlefields will not be on the island. The main battle may 
take place in the waters not far offshore from Taiwan. It is 
predicted that it would be in the waters near the Penghu 
Archipelago. 
  Naturally, the final decisive fighting will still have to 
be a struggle for each individual mountain, city or village. 
However, in the bloody fighting, neither nuclear weapons nor 
chemical weapons will be used, but only conventional weapons. 
As an old teacher once said, "This fight is with our own 
people, so there should be limits. Some way should be found to 
avoid a lot of killing." 
  The Taiwanese are even less willing to see the destruction 
of the battle in their own backyards. With the assistance of 
the United States, they want to fight a "battle of extinction" 
on the ocean. They want to wipe out the Communist Navy in the 
Taiwan Straits. 
  Thus, the will of both sides has determined that the battle 
for the recovery of Taiwan will be fought at.... 
<H5>  The Taiwan Strait Would Be an Integrated Test of Naval and </H5>
Air Forces 
  Imagine this: The fierce battle is a naval and air battle in 
the Taiwan Straits. This would be a battle pitting warships 
against aircraft. At such a time, the South Sea Fleet and the 
West Branch of the East Sea Fleet would be the first echelon 
units. The plan would be to join up at the Penghu Gulf. They 
would not want the Nationalists to use that old tactic of theirs 
again, "get the fighting over with before the second echelon of 
Communist forces can arrive." 
  Therefore, formations of squadron after squadron of F-14 
Tomcat fighters and bombers with F-16 fighters flying cover 
could swarm like bees toward the fleets. The bombs would fall 
like rain. The thousands of guns in our Navy Fleet would lay a 
dense barrage of tens of thousands of rounds per minute. The 
sky would be filled with yellow nitrate smoke. The exploding 
fragments would fall like hail from the sky raising ripples all 
over the surface of the water. The enemy aircraft would dive as 
if hit in a mad attack of the fleet. Some planes would trail 
plumes of smoke on their way to plunge into the ocean. But as 
one echelon goes past, it would be followed up by another 
echelon right behind it. Two of our transport ships have been 
hit. One is already closing the three sealed hatches and on the 
other ships, the soldiers are using their field packs to try to 
stop the water from pouring in. There in the hold of the ship, 
they would be helpless and curse the admirals. This "general" is 
really too much, for all these years he has just been a synonym 
for the Nationalists. 
  Puff after puff of black smoke would dot the decks of the 
cruisers and destroyers leaving dents and holes behind them. 
  Imagination, after all, is only imagination. What would 
the reality look like? 
  As one of the "Four Tigers" of Asia, Taiwan not only has 
strong economic might, but it also has a fairly respectable 
military strength. Its equipment and technologies are mostly 
superior to those of the mainland, mostly advanced U.S. 
equipment. After diplomatic relations between the United States 
and Taiwan came to an end, because of its considerations for the 
establishment of an "independent defense" system, under the 
guiding philosophy of the Taiwanese military to "substitute for 
time with quality," military expenditures grew every year. These 
expenditures have grown from $278.4 million in 1979 to $1.1 
billion in 1993. It has emphasized its Air Force and Navy. 
  Taiwan has 248 primary combat aircraft, the main force of 
which are the F-5E and the F-l04G interceptors. These are 
second generation fighters. Their combat capabilities are not 
quite as good as the F-8. Their overall combat strength is less 
than that of the mainland. However, after their imported 150 
F-16 and 60 Mirage fighters and their additionally planned 130 
self-designed IDF aircraft are used to equip their units, their 
Air Force will overall be better and will be of a new generation 
of aircraft. At such time, the Taiwan forces will possess 350 
third generation new all-weather combat aircraft. This will 
make it even more difficult for the mainland to win and maintain 
air superiority over the straits. 
  Taiwan forces currently have more than 300 combat vessels, 
its main force combat ships are patrol boats, guided missile 
boats, destroyers, guided missile escorts, submarines, LSTs, 
mine sweepers and supply boats. Its overall combat capabilities 
are greater than one of the mainland fleets, but less than two 
of the mainland fleets. It has fewer submarines than the 
mainland and does not have a nuclear submarine. 
  We can see from the above that the various forces do not 
have the strategic capability of conducting an attack on the 
mainland. This fact is an integral part of the long term guiding 
philosophy of the various forces of "a strategy to maintain the 
status quo" and defensive warfare. However, from the combat 
regions in the Taiwan Straits, the Taiwan military has a fairly 
high density of weapons to use to defend against an attack from 
the mainland, and these weapons are fairly modern. Within a 
limited period of time, it will be difficult break down the 
defenses of the Taiwanese forces. Therefore, this engagement in 
the Taiwan Straits would be a fierce modernized battle. 
<H5>  How Large of a Force Will China Use? </H5>
  Air Forces: There are a total of 490,000 men and about 5,200 
combat aircraft in the Chinese Air Force. If the 38,000 men and 
the 800 land based combat aircraft of the Naval Air Force are 
included, the air supremacy force would be 6,000 aircraft. 
Since this is no longer the 1950's when the talk was to push 
old Chiang Kai-shek "into the ocean," these aircraft should be 
enough to recover Taiwan. If Taiwan threw 80 percent of its 
combat aircraft into the battle, this would be 280 advanced 
third generation fighters. Then, for the mainland to take and 
maintain air superiority, it would have to use at least 40 
percent of its aircraft, deploying almost 2,400 aircraft along 
the Southeastern coast. From sheer numbers alone, this would be 
a ten-to-one margin, and would assemble a force of absolute 
superiority. However, from the viewpoint of quality, at least 40 
percent of China's Air Forces would have to be third generation 
aircraft. 
  China would have to use at least 1,000 fighters, at least 
400 of which would have to be F-8 aircraft. 
  At the same time, they could also deploy around 600 bombers 
including around 80 B-6 medium bombers, around 250 B-5 light 
bombers and around 300 fighter bombers to be used for an attack 
on Taiwan forces' positions on the beachheads. In addition, 
there should also a certain number of Jiancha-6 reconnaissance 
aircraft, Be-6 seaplanes, Zhi-5 helicopters and some transport 
aircraft. 
  Navy: At a minimum, the North and South Sea Fleets would 
have to be used with an independent submarine squadron with 
almost 750 combat vessels and more than 100 landing craft. The 
landing units would be 100,000 men. In their deployment, 
consideration should be given to a pincer attack from two 
different directions as well as preventing the U.S. Seventh 
Fleet from providing assistance. 
  Attention should be given to the fact that making the best 
use of submarine superiority is the key to victory in a battle 
in the Straits. It is also the most effective means for the 
mainland to deliver a crushing blow against the Taiwan Navy. 
Furthermore, the surface vessels of the mainland's Navy will 
mainly conduct a containment attack against the Taiwan Navy, and 
an even larger force will be used in support fighting and in the 
landing combat. In this way, it would be easier to gain control 
of the initiative in combat as quickly as possible. 
  China currently has more submarines than all other nations 
except for the United States and the former Soviet Union, third 
in the world. It currently has more than 100 conventionally 
powered submarines, second in the world. 
  China's submarine forces were built up fairly early. 
  Back when the former Soviet Union Pacific Fleet was using 
the port of Lushun, they began to train China's submarine 
student classes. On 20 August, 1953, China established a 
submarine school in Qingdao and asked the Soviets for an old C 
class submarine. This was the first submarine in China's Navy. 
  On 19 June 1954, China established an independent submarine 
Dadui in Qinghai with four submarines transferred over from the 
Soviets. Two of these were S (Stalinetz) class offshore 
submarines and two were M (Malodaki) class coastal submarines. 
Later, the Soviets continued to deliver a number of submarines, 
until China's Navy had four 5-I submarines, four Shchuka model 
submarines and four M-12 Submarines, as well as one M-IV and M-V 
submarines. During this time, the Soviets supplied 
technology on pressurized hulls, propellers and air defense 
systems. China began to develop its own submarines. So far, 
China has built a fairly large number of Soviet type submarines 
and has designed three types on her own, including two types of 
nuclear submarines. 
  In a battle using armed force to recover Taiwan, all of 
China's submarines would be used. These include the W class, the 
R class, the Wuhan class, the G class, the Ming class and the 
Xia class submarines. 
  The W class submarine is 76 meters long and 6.5 meters 
wide. It has a displacement of 1,080 on the surface and 1,320 
submerged. It can carry 14 torpedoes or 24 mines. It has 4,000 
horsepower, and maximum surface speed is 18 knots. Submerged, it 
uses two electric motors, 2700 horsepower, for a maximum speed 
of 14 knots. Its combat radius is 1,800 nautical miles with a 
maximum range of as much as 2,400 nautical miies. 
  Up until the mid 1980's, the W class submarines patrolled 
the waters of the Xisha [Paracel] Islands periodically. These 
submarines are still used for training. 
  The R class is slightly larger than the W class and it is 
more streamlined. The conning tower is also improved, slightly 
smaller than on the W class. This submarine is 76.8 meters long 
and 7.3 meters wide. It has a surface displacement of 1,400 
tons and a submerged displacement of 1,800 tons. At speeds of 
nine Knots it has a maximum cruising range of 9,000 nautical 
miles. The 033 model of this submarine is armed with 28 mines 
or 16 torpedoes. Its electronic equipment is fairly advanced. 
Some of the 033 models can be equipped panoramic sonar systems 
including passive sonar rangers and cyclic vision sonar 
listening devices which can detect all sonar transmissions 
within the two to fifteen kilohertz range. They can also track 
three targets at the same time within a 120 degree sector. In 
1980 during a visit to Shanghai by the British Navy, some 
personnel toured a 033 model submarine. They noticed that the 
ship had a large number of machine guns, which were said to be 
for use in offshore naval patrols. 
  The greatest difference in the Wuhan class is that there 
are C-801 missiles installed in the bulging cowlings on either 
side of the conning tower. To launch these missiles, the 
submarine must first come to the surface and raise the missile 
launcher before the missiles can be launched. The external 
dimensions are about the same as those of the 033 model, but it 
is heavier than the 033 model, with a surface displacement of 
1,650 tons and a submerged displacement of 2,100 tons. The 
power equipment is also similar to that of the 033 model. 
  The C-801 is also called the Yingji (YJ-l) model. It is a 
high subsonic speed low altitude sea sweeping multiple use 
anti-ship missile. It is China's newest anti-ship missile. It 
uses inertial mid flight guidance and active monopulse radar 
terminal guidance. When it approaches the target, it dives to 
attack it, and hits the target near the water line. Launch 
range is 8 to 40 kilometers. There is now an improved model, 
the C-802, which has a solid state booster and replaces the 
original solid state engine with a turbojet engine, so an air 
intake has been added to the missile. There has been no change 
in the type of guidance or in the flight altitude. Minimum and 
maximum launch ranges are 15 and 150 kilometers respectively. 
  According to materials made public by China, the Wuhan 
class has a crew of 53 men. It can submerge to 200 meters and 
has a continuous cruise capability of 45 days. At speeds of 
nine knots it can travel 14,000 kilometers. 
  The G class submarine is 98 meters long and 8.5 meters 
wide. It has a surface displacement of 2,350 tons and a 
submerged displacement of 2,950 tons. It has 6,000 horsepower 
which can drive the submarine at 17 knots on the surface and 13 
knots submerged. Combat radius is 20,000 nautical miles. 
  Because it is equipped with the CSS-N3 Julang (JL-l) 
missile developed by China on her own which is larger in 
diameter than the SSN-4, there are only two missile launchers in 
the conning tower. 
  The Julang-1 model missile is the only underwater launched 
missile the outside world is aware that China possesses. 
Supposedly it is a modified version of the Dongfeng-3 or 
Dongfeng-4 land based missile. It has a two-stage solid fuel 
rocket, and the warhead has a yield of 2 megatons. Launch range 
is about 2,700 kilometers. In addition, the G class submarine 
can carry 12 torpedoes. 
  The Ming class shape lies somewhere in between the cigar 
shape of the 033 model and a teardrop shape. It is 76 meters 
long and 7.6 meters wide. It has a displacement of 1,584 tons on 
the surface and 2,113 tons submerged. The power system is 
similar to that of the 033 model. It has speeds of 15 knots on 
the surface and a maximum speed of 18 knots submerged. Cruising 
range is about 7,000 nautical miles. It can submerge to about 
300 meters. The crew size is 58 men. 
  It can carry 16 torpedoes or 28 mines. Its electronic 
equipment is similar to that of the 033 model, and includes a 
reconnaissance type or reconnaissance disc type horizon search 
radar, stopping lights and electronic support equipment and 
Atlas or Phoenix type active and passive sonar. The Ming class 
has good underwater capabilities, but is expensive to build. 
  The Han class submarine is shaped similarly to the U.S. 
SSN-671 Unicorn class submarine. Its teardrop shaped body is 
suited to high speed submerged cruising. It uses a cross-shaped 
rudder. It has a submerged displacement of about 5,000 tons. 
It is about 100 meters long and 11 meters wide. It has a 
pressurized water reactor pile, single shaft drive, and a 
maximum speed of 25 knots submerged and 30 knots on the surface. 
  The Xia class is about 120 meters long and about 10 meters 
wide. It has a submerged displacement of about 8,000 tons. It 
has a pressurized water reactor pile, and power is rated at 
about 90 Megawatts. It is a single shaft drive, and maximum 
submerged speed is about 22 knots. It has a crew of 84. It can 
submerge to a depth of 300 meters. 
  Its primary weaponry includes 12 CSS-N-3 JULANG missiles. 
These are two-stage solid fuel missiles. They may be in the 
midst of being replaced with multiple warhead CSS-N-4 missiles. 
There are also six 21-inch torpedo launch tubes in the nose of 
the submarine. 
  China cannot compare with the United States and European 
nations in the level of submarine design and construction. 
However, it does possess a complete research and production 
system which does not require any assistance from foreigners. 
Furthermore, this is precisely the motivation for future 
development of new underwater combat vessels. Therefore, China 
is paying special attention to its submarine forces, especially 
missile submarine forces which are the key branch of the PLA 
Navy. 
  The Second Artillery forces are a strategic attack force. 
They already have a certain number of intercontinental ballistic 
missiles, medium-range and sub-medium range missiles. Its 
intercontinental ballistic missiles include four CSS-3 missiles 
with a range of 6000 to 7000 kilometers and carry a warhead of 
from one to three megatons. It is believed that the CSS-4 has 
already gone into production. It has a range of 13,000 
kilometers and carries a five to 10 megaton warhead. The medium 
range missiles include 65 to 85 CSS-2 missiles with a range of 
2500 kilometers and carry a one to three megaton warhead. The 
sub-medium range missile is the CSS-1 of which they have about 
50. It has a range of 180 kilometers and carries a 1.5 kiloton 
warhead. 
<H5>  The Outlook Would Be Better If We Had an Aircraft Carrier </H5>
  In November of 1991, China's International Leading Edge 
Weapon Exposition was jointly hosted by the General Staff 
Department of the PLA and the Commission for Science and 
Industry in National Defense at the Military Museum. It was only 
open to persons in the military, industry and government. At 
the naval exhibition, the exhibit of a model of an aircraft 
carrier and an aircraft carrier task force by the Naval 
Development and Testing Center attracted a large group of 
Chinese men of vision. The spokesman explained in detail the 
dream and equipment of a future Chinese aircraft carrier. It 
was then that the listeners understood that building an aircraft 
carrier was not as simple as building a ship in the tens of 
thousands of tons class, but that it involved the national 
industrial level of a series of technologies as well as 
supplying it with a large amount of support systems. 
  In general, an aircraft carrier group has four major parts: 
1) The hull of the carrier. This is the sea and air mobile 
platform; 2) The various fighters, bombers, anti-submarine 
helicopters, AWACs and patrol and reconnaissance aircraft 
carried on the carrier; 3) The carrier's radar, missile, 
electronic warfare, guns and flight deck and take off and 
landing equipment as a single major system; 4) Support vessels, 
destroyers, escorts, submarines, landing craft, contingent of 
marines and supply and support vessels. 
  This conceptual synthesis is the proper concept of a 
carrier combat group. Only this type of carrier task force would 
have the assault force to control the seas and control the 
skies. 
  At this exhibition, the Deputy Commander of the Navy, Li 
Jing, the Commander of the Air Force Wang Hai, the chairman of 
the Commission for Science and Industry in National Defense Ding 
Henggao and his vice chairmen Xie Guang and Ye Zhengda remained 
at the carrier exhibit for a long time and provided a great deal 
of support. 
  People are aware that to build a carrier task force like 
the one described above the cost would be astronomical. 
  From what we have heard, early in the next century, the 
Chinese Navy plans to possess two carrier task forces. The 
carriers constructed would be 40,000 to 50,000-ton medium-sized 
aircraft carriers similar to the Soviet Kiev-class aircraft 
carriers. There would be 20 to 28 aircraft parked on the flight 
deck. The flight deck would be 70 meters long. It would use 
steam to launch the aircraft. Everything being equal, these two 
carrier task forces would cost an estimated 70 billion yuan. 
  There are three critical technologies in aircraft carriers. 
The first is the development of carrier aircraft and mastering 
take-off and landing technology. The second is the development 
of anti-submarine technology, solving the problem of underwater 
threats to the carrier. Secondary to this is the problem of task 
force air defense. This requires phased array radar technology. 
The third critical technology just happens to be a weakness of 
the Chinese Air Force. 
  Facing an increasingly serious situation in the Nansha 
Islands, the Chinese Navy has contacted a number of nations 
trying to find some way to solve the problem of beefing up their 
anti-submarine systems. In 1985, the Chinese Navy purchased a 
French Duux-5 sonar for the possible purpose of the 
anti-submarine research so urgently needed for missile nuclear 
submarines. It is estimated that there has been some progress 
made on this. In 1988, the Chinese Navy contacted the Italians 
expressing a great deal of interest in Italy's sonar combat 
systems and multifunctional control consoles. In addition, the 
Chinese Navy is also interested in the French PIVAIV stable 
anti-submarine equipment. They have already tested the French 
MINCIN inertial guidance systems on surface vessels. In 1986, 
the United States Navy agreed to sell towed phased array sonar 
equipment to China. 
  Research on carrier aircraft includes carrier fighters to 
gain control of the skies and providing air defense for the 
carrier force, carrier bombers to carry out bombing assault 
missions, and carrier AWACs to track enemy targets and to guide 
and control their aircraft to intercept and bomb targets. 
<H5>  Will the United States Become Involved? </H5>
  As the policeman of the world, the United States military 
acts as a nuclear umbrella for Taiwan. Should there ever be a 
military threat against Taiwan, they would never stand idly by, 
no matter what Taiwan's position might be in the fighting. 
They would certainly use such an opportunity to express their 
concern and support for Taiwan. 
  From considerations of global strategy, the United States 
would not allow a strong opponent to arise in East Asia. In 
1992, CINCPAC convened a special symposium on the problem of a 
"New Military Strategy" for the Pacific Region. It was pointed 
out at this symposium that "the overall strength of the Chinese 
military is continuing to grow and seriously affects the 
military balance in the Far East. There are currently more than 
10 regional confrontational hot spots and a number of border 
conflicts in the Far East with a high possibility of leading to 
local wars in the future. In addition to being on the alert to 
Russian forces, the U.S. forces stationed in the Far East will 
also have the Chinese, Koreans and Vietnamese as primary 
adversaries. At the same time, the U.S. Seventh Fleet will view 
the rapidly expanding Chinese Navy as one of the primary 
adversaries constituting the greatest threat in that region. But 
to what degree would the United States become involved? Simply 
the largest task force outside the country is responsible for 
the primary strategic mission in the Western Pacific. 
  The Seventh Fleet includes the task forces of the Seventh 
Fleet, the Carrier Strike Force, the Fifth Carrier Group, the 
Seventh Carrier Group and 60,000 Marines. It is the world's 
largest fleet deployed to the front, and it conducts its mission 
in the waters of the Western Pacific, South Pacific, Indian 
Ocean, and Arabian Sea 11,000 nautical miles from the U.S. 
coast. If reguired, it can also expand its scope from the 
Central Pacific to the African Coast and from the Kurile Islands 
to the North Pole. 
  It is made up of about 70 or 80 ships, including 50 ships 
which are based at facilities in Guam and Japan. These forward 
deployed units are the heart of the Fleet. They possess a great 
military strength and always maintain a high combat readiness 
posture. The other 20 ships in the Fleet are deployed at bases 
in Hawaii and on the West Coast. The Seventh Fleet is 
specifically equipped as shown below. 
  Ships: Two to three aircraft carriers, three to four 
cruisers, 18 to 20 destroyers and escorts, seven or eight 
submarines, one amphibious combat command ship and one fleet 
flag ship, five to eight amphibious landing ships and landing 
ships, 18 mobile supply ships and 16 advance assembly ships. 
  Naval Aircraft: 250 carrier-based and other ship-based 
aircraft, 10 land-based multiple use aircraft, and 160 to 170 
Marine aircraft. 
  Marines: Marine expeditionary forces include marine 
divisions, marine air regiments, marine expeditionary brigades, 
unit services, support groups and marine expeditionary forces. 
  On any given day of the year, 50 percent of the forces 
under the command of the Seventh Fleet are performing missions 
throughout the Western Pacific and the Indian Ocean. However, 
should the order ever be given, they could reach the waters of 
the Taiwan Strait in a very short time. 
  Yet, if the United States tried to use this opportunity to 
surgically remove the Chinese Navy or to carry out a plan of 
"plundering the Chinese Waters," we want to effectively warn 
them that they will have to have an even larger carrier fleet. 
<H5>  What Will Be the Final Outcome of the War? </H5>
  The key to what will determine the final outcome of an 
armed recovery of Taiwan will be the result of the confrontation 
between the armed forces from either side of the Taiwan Strait. 
If the Mainland is able to destroy the Taiwanese Navy and Air 
Force within the preset amount of time, then the authorities on 
Taiwan will give up trying to resist in order to avoid the 
destruction of war on their island. If the mainland is not able 
to destroy the main body of resistance of the Taiwanese forces, 
then they will not be able to conduct a landing, and the 
situation will be very grim. There is one other possible 
situation, where the mainland is only able to attack a portion 
of the targets in the preset period of time, and the defensive 
system of the Taiwanese forces is about to fall but has not 
completely fallen. At such a time, there could be strange and 
complex changes in the situation, and the United States and 
other external factors could generate a major influence on the 
situation. 
  In summary, the problem of the return of Taiwan is better 
resolved by peaceful means than by armed force. 
<H5>  IV: WILL WE BE ABLE TO REENACT THE GLORY OF 1962 </H5>
  History often repeats itself. However, in the face of the 
military power which has arisen in Asia -- India -- people 
cannot help having a certain reservation about this law of 
history always repeating itself. 
  Actually, looking over the more than 2,000 kilometer border 
between China and India, it is very easy for people to come to 
the conclusion that of the two sides opposing each other across 
this border, the Indian forces appear to have overwhelming 
superiority. At the first outpost at the Sino-Indian border 
there are two opposing fortifications, with the Chinese to the 
north and the Indians to the south, only 27 meters apart. Not 
far away there is a postal facility in the neutral zone. Every 
day, the surface mail between these two countries must be 
exchanged here. The border defense forces of the two countries 
must stand guard during the exchange of the mail. When this is 
done, the guards from both sides must enter the neutral zone 
where they almost come face to face. When relations between the 
two countries were normal, the troops from either side would 
often call out "hello, hello" to those on the other side and 
even exchange small gifts. 
  In the 1960's and 1970's, the Indian border troops gave the 
Chinese troops the impression of being poor and dirty, and they 
would take out a pack of cigarettes to give to them. After the 
1980's, the Chinese forces suddenly noticed that this batch of 
bearded soldiers had suddenly straightened up, changing into 
nylon uniforms which were all the same. The old clumsy former 
Soviet rifles they carried had been exchanged for impressive 
British arms. Looking further back into Indian territory, road 
after road stretched out, forming a modern transportation 
network. Every weekend, sedans would arrive one after another 
carrying the families of the troops to the front line. While 
they were enjoying themselves, the Chinese troops had to do 
without such pleasures. 
  When the Sino-Indian border heated up in 1989, Chinese 
units were rushed in to beef up defenses, and both sides were 
facing each other. Although no shots were fired, quite a few of 
the Chinese officers and men had to be taken to a field hospital 
to be treated for frost bite, but the Indian forces did not seem 
to be affected. 
  Naturally, the situation in the skies was even more tense, 
with the Indian's deploying almost 200 combat aircraft while the 
Chinese did not have any combat aircraft except for a few on 
standby. The air power ratio was 200 to none. This was an 
unthinkable situation. Imagine what would have happened to the 
Chinese front line defense units if the Indians had actually 
attacked over the entire front. 
  It goes without saying that the Chinese troops became aware 
that the old "feeling of superiority" was gone. 
  This is the current situation at the Indo-Chinese border. 
<H5>  A Historical Flashback </H5>
  Before we attempt to analyze the balance of forces for the 
next engagement between India and China, we should look back at 
the situation during the 1962 border war. 
  Historically, the Indo-Chinese border has never been 
formally delineated. However, over the long process of amicable 
coexistence between the peoples of the two countries, and in 
accordance with the scope of political control of both 
countries, a 2000-km commonly recognized boundary was formed. 
The western end started from the north in the Kunlun Mountains 
and ran south to where Ali in Tibet, Ladakh in Kashmir under 
actual Indian control, and India's Ximaxie'erbang [0823 7456 
0253 1422 1620] all come together. The middle section runs from 
this triangulation to where China, India, and Nepal all come 
together, generally following a line along the southern foot of 
the Himalaya Mountains and the plains along the northern bank of 
the Brahmaputra and east to where China, India, and Burma come 
together. 
  In 1944, the British Colonial planners convened a 
conference in Shimla in northern India. At the conference, the 
representative of the British government, Henry Macmahon, and 
the representative of the Tibetan authorities, Xiazha Bianjue 
Duoji [1115 2089 6708 6030 1122 0679], secretly exchanged notes 
without the knowledge of the Chinese central government 
representative, Chen Taifan, and created the "MacMahon line" 
which placed historical Chinese areas of Menou, Luoyu, and 
Xiachaou into British India, attempting to occupy 90,000 square 
kilometers of Chinese territory. 
  Although the notorious "Macmahon Line" has never been 
recognized by any Chinese government, it is the cause of the 
border dispute between China and India. 
  From 1951 to 1953, the authorities of independent India 
took advantage of the period when New China had just been 
established and while it was fighting the United States and not 
paying attention to its border with India to dispatch troops to 
control the south of the "Macmahon Line" and into what has been 
traditionally Chinese territory north of the traditionally 
customary boundary and revised the official maps of India at 
that time, indicating that the illegal "Macmahon Line" was an 
"accepted border," thus attempting to fix and legalize their 
occupation of Chinese territory. Later, the Indians continued 
to advance into Chinese territory on the eastern, central and 
western sectors, occupying a large amount of territory including 
Jianmani, Juwa, Qure, Shenbuqi Pass, Blinsanduo, Xiangli, 
Labudi, and Balijiasi in Tibet. 
  In a letter to premier Zhou Enlai on March 20, 1959, 
India's Premier Nehru made formal territorial demands against 
China totalling 125,000 square kilometers, approximately the 
size of the province of Fujian. Premier Zhou Enlai rejected 
these demands on behalf of the Chinese Government. Thereupon, 
the Indian Government began to use armed might to carry out its 
"policy of advancement" and began to make preparations for a 
large scale attack on China. That same year, the Indian 
Army took over the defense of the entire Indo-Chinese border 
region. 
  In October of 1962, the Indian Defense Ministry announced 
the establishment of a new army, the Fourth Army, and named Army 
Chief-of-Staff General Lahiri as the commander of the new army. 
  Prior to launching the assault, India had one brigade, six 
infantry battalions, one machine gun battalion and a number of 
detachments totalling more than 5,600 men on the Western sector 
of the border with China. Of these, 1,300 men were deployed in 
43 strongholds inside of Chinese territory. 
  The eastern sector was India's main direction of attack, 
and they had deployed four battalions of the Seventh Brigade and 
four battalions of the Fourth Artillery Brigade in Chinese 
territory north of the "Macmahon Line" at Kejielang, Bangshankou 
and south of there in Dawang and deploying the headquarters of 
the Fourth Army and the Fourth Division in Tisibuer, south of 
the traditional border. The total Indian force along the 
eastern sector was 16,000 men and the eastern and western 
sectors combined totalled 22,000 men. 
  On 17 and 18 October, the invading Indian forces launched a 
fierce artillery assault on the Chinese border defense units on 
the eastern and western sectors, unilaterally initiating a large 
scale armed conflict. 
  On October 20, the Indian forces launched an all-out attack 
on Chinese territory on the eastern and western sectors. On 
that day, border defense units in Tibet and Xinjiang received 
orders to counterattack, opening the curtain on the self-defense 
counterattack on the Indo-Chinese border. 
  The first stage of the counterattack lasted from 20 to 28 
October. Chinese border defense units separately launched all 
out counterattacks on the invading Indian army on the eastern 
and western sectors. They also concentrated a superior force 
along the primary direction. In just eight days, they had 
wiped out 86 percent of the army strongholds along the western 
sectors, and drove out the Indian forces which had invaded the 
Kelangjie and Dawang areas, killing some of them. 
  On 24 October, the Chinese government issued a three-point 
proposal to stop the fighting, to reopen peace talks, and for a 
peaceful solution to the Sino-Indian border question. At the 
same time, Premier Zhou Enlai sent a letter to Nehru, with the 
hopes that the Indian government would make a positive response 
to the three-point proposal. 
  On 28 October, the Chinese border defense units obeyed the 
call of the government and halted its counterattack against the 
invading Indian forces. 
  However, the Indian authorities publicly rejected the 
peaceful proposals of the Chinese Government and demanded that 
the situation at the border region be restored to what it was 
prior to 28 September 1962, with India occupying a large piece 
of Chinese territory. On 26 October, the Indian leaders 
announced a "state of emergency" for the entire nation, forming 
a cabinet to "cope with the emergency situation." Their 
determination was for a long war with China. 
  On 4 November, Premier Zhou Enlai sent one more letter to 
Nehru, hoping that the Indian government would consider the 
Chinese three-point proposal. However, on the same day, the 
Indian Government announced the establishment of a "national 
defense commission" and a "national defense production 
commission" to carry out mobilization for war and increase the 
number of forces at the Sino-Indian border areas. By the middle 
of November, the Indian Army had deployed a total of two 
divisions, nine brigades, and a large amount of artillery and 
armored forces in the border area, totalling 30,000 men. 
  On 14 and 16 November, the Indians once more conducted a 
fierce assault along the entire border. 
  From 16 to 21 November, the Chinese border defense forces 
conducted the second stage all-out counterattack against the 
invading Indian forces. In this battle, the Chinese border 
defense forces successfully utilized the concentration of a 
superior force to conduct a pincer movement and flanking attack, 
penetrating deep into the Indian forces, so that the Indian 
forces were being attacked at many points and could neither 
protect their front or rear. The Chinese forces smoothly 
achieved their objective of driving all the Indian forces out of 
their territory. 
  This 31-day local war ended at the tragic cost of the lives 
of 8,700 Indian troops. The perfected combat capabilities of 
the Chinese forces in traditional warfare and especially their 
abilities in hand-to-hand fighting and in night fighting amazed 
all the Indian troops. This attitude of awe remained in the 
hearts of the "bearded troops" for a very long time. 
<H5>  The Next War Will Not Be So Easy </H5>
  With the present state of the Chinese and Indian forces, in 
the next war the form and strength of both sides are nothing 
like they were in 1962, both sides are clear on this point. The 
war in the 1960's was typical traditional surface warfare. 
There was no sign of the Air Force on the battlefield, let 
alone missiles or even any armored forces worth mentioning. The 
primary weapons engaged were semi-automatic infantry rifles, 
assault guns, light and heavy machine guns, 60- and 80-mm 
mortars and 122-mm howitzers. The mobility of the units was 
mainly marching and running. 
  This combat form was no different in nature than the war 
against the Japanese or the Civil War. It could not even be 
compared to the Korean War of the 1950's. Under these 
conditions, the numbers of troops and the use of tactics were 
the key decisive factors. However, at that time, the Indians 
lost on both these counts, so they paid the price. 
  What, then, will he next war be like? People who 
understand the world military developments over the last 30 
years will all reach the following conclusion. The next war 
between China and India will be an air and land integrated war 
fought under conditions of a nuclear threat. 
  The so-called "air and land integrated" warfare is a joint 
battle conducted by all branches and forces of the military. It 
is a primary type of modernized military action. The branches 
of the military usually taking part in the combat are the Air 
Force, Army, Second Artillery (missile units) and the types of 
forces are the infantry, armor, artillery, communications, 
engineers, chemical defense, paratroops and special forces. 
  Based on the geographical conditions of the combat area, 
the branches and forces thrown into combat by both sides will be 
different. For instance, the border area of India is high 
plateaus and mountains, so there will commonly be used air 
forces, infantry, artillery, paratroopers and engineers, while 
it is difficult to make the best of the "king of ground 
battles", the tanks, in that type of terrain. However, in more 
open areas deep in either side, the armored forces might become 
primary assault forces. Both sides are nuclear powers, so while 
fighting a conventional war, the nuclear threat of the other 
side can never be eliminated. This is one of the major 
characteristics of modern warfare. 
  It is very obvious that both the Chinese and the Indians 
have the capability to conduct "air and land integrated" three 
dimensional warfare. In addition to the composition of their 
forces, both sides have the various branches and types of 
forces, in their strategy, they have both absorbed the essence 
of the "great depth" theory and the United States military air 
and land integrated combat" theory into their campaign theory. 
They have also long been using it in joint military training 
and in campaign exercises. 
  It is not difficult for us to suppose that in the next 
battle which might occur on the roof of the world there would 
appear various types of weapons and forces. 
  In the air: The air battle which will primarily be fought 
with such second and third generation aircraft as the F 8-II, 
F-10, MiG-29, Su-27, F-l6, and Mirage-2000 aircraft will be a 
dazzling engagement. Also, the B-6 and Jaguar high altitude 
bombers and fighter bombers will be responsible for conducting 
firepower assaults on targets deep in enemy territory. The 
short and medium range missiles and paratroop forces will become 
the primary forces for attacking fortifications and major 
targets deep in enemy territory. The air over the battlefield 
will be filled with high power multiple frequency band radio 
waves, to deal a fatal "soft kill" to the enemy. 
  On the Ground: New large caliber self-propelled guns and 
multiple barrel rocket guns such as the 152-mm self-propelled 
cannon, the 206-mm self-propelled mortar, the 130-mm 
self-propelled rocket gun will play a major role in suppression 
firepower. Flocks of armored helicopters will become the nemesis 
of close attack surface targets. Model 80 and T-72 main battle 
tanks will be responsible for defense in-depth and for carrying 
out high speed penetrations. Engineers with such advanced 
equipment as rocket mine laying vehicles will quickly be able to 
erect obstacles against the attacking enemy. Infantry forces 
will all use highly accurate, rapid firing light universal 
automatic weapons. They will also be equipped with one-man 
anti-tank missiles, recoilless rifles, mortars and night vision 
devices. We can see from the primary use of the weapons 
described above that the space taken up by the battlefield in a 
future war between China and India will be many times larger, 
perhaps as much as ten times larger, and the concentration of 
firepower and the destructive power will be as much as 100 
times greater. The switching back and forth from offensive to 
defensive will also be more rapid. Battlefield postures will 
change in an instant. Whichever side is victorious, the cost 
will be tremendous and tragic. It is just that the winner will 
receive some sort of compensation and the loser will lose any 
possibility of compensation. To sum it all up, the next war 
between China and India will not be an easy matter for either 
side. 
<H5>  When Might a War Between China and India Break Out </H5>
  Does India have the capability at the present time to 
launch an attack in-depth locally in China's Tibet and Xinjiang? 
Is it as some scholars maintain, that faced with the tremendous 
threat from India that China may have permanently lost 
suzerainty over some of its territory? 
  On the surface, the situation seems to have reached a 
crisis and reached a stage where "we have to fight." However, 
deeper analysis indicates that the situation is still far from 
such a stage. 
  As everyone knows, in both the past and present, anyone who 
presses the button of war will have to pay the price. 
Furthermore, this tremendous cost will undoubtedly be a burden 
passed on to the people of that country. It is very clear that 
India does not yet have the capability of paying that price. 
In the process of carrying out their "expansionist policies," 
the Indian authorities are actually facing a number of factors 
and obstacles which are keeping them from doing as they wish. 
  The first of these is their economic straits. If it can be 
stated that at the present time, India's military forces are 
comparable with China's, then in overall national strength, 
especially in economic competition, India has been left far 
behind by China, about 20 years behind. 
  In agriculture, from 1986 to 1992, India's grain production 
has increased at an annual rate of 2.4 percent. If we take 
annual grain production to be three percent and annual 
population increase to be two percent, then it will take at 
least 20 years for India to reach the level of 362 kilograms of 
grain per person per year. 
  In June 1991, India's foreign reserves were only about $1 
billion, only enough for two weeks' imports. Foreign debt, 
however, was more than $70 billion. It takes 30 percent of the 
income from exports to pay the capital and interest on this 
debt. They have a trade deficit of as much $5 billion. 
  The grim economic situation has forced the Indian 
Government to concentrate its main energies on improving the 
economy and working to reform the economy. However, from the 
degree and effectiveness of the reforms, the disparity between 
China and India will continue to grow. At the end of 1991, China 
had already accumulated in $120 billion worth of foreign 
exchange. Since 1984, India only had a total of less than $1 
billion. It is clear how difficult the steps of reform are for 
India. Therefore, for a fairly long time, for the next 15 to 20 
years, India's overall national strength will not be able to 
compete with that of China. 
  Next is strategic pressures. In the strategic posture of 
South Asia, India is caught between China and Pakistan. It is 
in a disadvantageous position of facing two fronts, one on the 
East and one on the West. Pakistan relies on support from China 
for its security, and China also hopes that Pakistan will 
restrain India. Therefore, after the breakdown of the Soviet 
Union, India's strategic intentions are to maintain military 
superiority and sufficient pressure over Pakistan and a defense 
against China. 
  In 1991, India deployed four armies, 10 infantry divisions 
and an additional armored division, 15 mechanized divisions and 
one infantry divisions to the India-Pakistan border at Kashmir 
to be responsible for strategic mobility against Pakistan. 
One-third of its air forces are also deployed against Pakistan. 
Along the border with China, however, there is one infantry 
division and one air wing on the western sector. On the eastern 
sector there are two mountain divisions and a small amount of 
air forces. Naturally, this is not to say that India sees 
Pakistan strategically as its primary enemy, but that it 
indicates that under pressure from different sides, India was 
forced to adopt its current "transitional" deployment. 
Therefore, with India's current strategic deployment being what 
it is, India does not have the capability of launching an attack 
on China. 
  Also, to achieve its "naval strategy" Indian forces have 
already used their primary financial resources on equipment for 
their navy and air forces, allowing for a rapid increase in its 
naval combat threat and basically establishing India in the 
position as "King" of the Indian Ocean. However, a war between 
China and India would be primarily fought on the ground. It 
will be very difficult for India to take any advantage of its 
naval superiority, and India does not have any clear superiority 
over China in ground warfare capabilities. Should war break 
out, the Indian forces are not very confident of winning. 
  We can imagine from this that in the next ten years or so, 
it is not very likely that a local war of any large scale will 
break out between China and India. The first ten years of the 
next century will be a more dangerous period. 
<H5>  What Kind of Attack Could the Indian Forces Launch? </H5>
  The cause of any border conflict between India and China 
would be the direct result of the territorial dispute. There 
will not be any major changes on this point for quite some time 
to come. Could the Tibetan problem which has attracted so much 
attention become a critical juncture? This is not a remote 
possibility. After they split off, India has been the only 
country on which the Tibetan splittist elements could depend. 
For the Indians, support of the Tibetan splittists could have 
even more benefits, so they are happy to do it. In addition to 
these two possibilities, any greedy attempts would be 
overstepping one's bounds. 
  From the angle of the Indian authorities, and an analysis 
based on general combat principles of modern limited war theory, 
India's combat objectives can be determined to be the 
destruction of major targets on the Tibetan border and the 
Chinese defense system so the Chinese forces would be unable to 
pose a threat to attack India, thus establishing clear military 
superiority within the Indo-Chinese border areas. This would 
both be both an advantageous and realistic combat objective. 
Its focus is on attacking the vital forces of the Chinese 
military and not on occupation. In this manner, after the 
attack has achieved its effect, the forces would withdraw from 
combat very quickly to avoid falling into a quagmire of 
prolonged combat. Also, they would not be burdened with 
occupying territory (unless the value of the territory was worth 
the price of the fighting). When the Chinese forces had once 
more assembled in Tibet and posed a threat to the border areas 
and influencing the superior position of the Indian forces, 
they would launch another attack. This is called a "pugilistic" 
strategy. It will become India's fundamental key in the next 
war. 
  Based on the strategy and tactics mentioned above, India 
will have to throw at least four to five mountain infantry 
divisions, more than two artillery divisions, two to three tank 
divisions, one to two airborne divisions and 500 combat aircraft 
into the battle, totalling around 200,000 men. It will naturally 
also require large numbers of medium and close range missiles 
and ground-to-air missiles. 
<H5>  What Will Be the Result of the Chinese Counterattack? </H5>
  For possible counterattacks against the Indian forces, some 
of the Chinese forces stationed in Tibet and Xinjiang will be 
far from enough. Therefore, within a number of weeks, the 
Chinese military will deploy two or more group armies to Tibet 
and southern Xinjiang. Using current mobile capabilities, it 
will take at least three weeks to complete emergency defensive 
deployment. However, it could first deploy one or two 
rapid-reaction divisions along the primary axis to stop the 
Indian advance. 
  By the time the Indian forces have completed preparations 
for assault, it is estimated that the Chinese military could 
assemble 80,000 to 100,000 men in Tibet and southern Xinjiang as 
well as more than 400 fighters. Long-range bombers may be 
deployed in the interior for direct support of combat zones in 
Tibet. Even if the Chinese forces are outnumbered, 
concentrating the force along the primary axis of attack will at 
least allow them to hold their own for a period of time, 
providing more time for reinforcement units. 
  Clearly, focussing on the strategic intentions and combat 
characteristics of the Indian forces, the Chinese forces will 
defensively concentrate on preventing the Indian forces from 
breaking through deeper into Chinese territory and maintaining 
major defensive positions on the front line and deeper back, 
forcing the Indian forces to fight in areas south of the border. 
  However, if the main force is deployed on the border front 
line, not only will it be difficult to support them there, but 
they could easily be surrounded and wiped out by the Indian 
forces. Therefore, the major foothold of Chinese forces in their 
defensive combat should be mobile attack defense, and not 
positional defense. That is, along the main axis of attack by 
the Indian forces to form an echelon deployment, and when the 
Indian forces break through a short distance into our territory, 
we should attack their flanks or rear follow-up units, and 
encircle and wipe them out before the Indian forces have a 
chance to gain a foothold. 
  The central factor which will determine the defensive and 
counterattack capabilities of the Chinese forces will not be the 
number of men or the strength of the force, but will be whether 
or not constant supply can be ensured. Similarly, the Indian 
forces will make attacking the Chinese rear supply bases and 
supply lines their primary objectives. 
  Most of the supplies to units stationed in Tibet travel 
over the Sichuan-Tibet road or the Qinghai-Tibet road, with some 
being air lifted. Troops, material and weapons all follow these 
three transport routes. Should these routes be cut off, the 
units in Tibet would be in dire straits. 
  In the early stages of the war, as the surface forces 
become engaged along the border, the Indian air forces and 
missile forces will launch a firepower assault on transport 
routes and primary airfields and bases in the rear in order to 
prevent the Chinese strategic mobility forces from assembling 
and to allow the Indian airborne assault forces and tank forces 
to go through breaches in the front lines and quickly penetrate 
and encircle major strongpoints in the rear. The Chinese forces 
in their defensive positions may ensure the major strongpoints 
and supply routes in the rear at the cost of losing front line 
positions. 
  The offensive and defensive fighting at this stage will 
primarily be fought in the air in an attempt to gain control of 
the air. Judging from the current strengths of the air forces 
of both sides, the Indian forces have more than 700 combat 
aircraft, most of which are second generation primary combat 
aircraft with a small number of third generation primary combat 
aircraft, but they have superiority in fighters and early 
warning and command. The Chinese have as many as 4,000 combat 
aircraft, with an even smaller proportion of third generation 
aircraft. They have superiority in bombers and total number of 
aircraft. 
  If war should break out, and there is no change in this 
ratio, then the Chinese forces would have to sacrifice numbers 
in exchange for control of the air. In this manner, the early 
stages of the war would center around the struggle over control 
of the air, and it would be a bitter and prolonged struggle. 
There would also be additional losses among the Chinese ground 
forces. Only after the Chinese had gained control of the air 
would there be any possibility of the Chinese forces being able 
to organize for a strategic counterattack, and the first stage 
would then be finished. 
  In the early stages of the war, the ground forces on both 
sides might launch attacks in areas 50 to 100 kilometers inside 
Tibet. Because the Indians would have lost control of the air, 
in order to ensure the air security of its ground forces, the 
Indian forces will primarily use surface-to-air missiles for an 
air defense umbrella. However, the artillery, tanks and 
helicopters would be primarily responsible for conducting 
firepower assaults on the ground. 
  During this period, whether or not the Chinese ground 
forces responsible for holding the major strongpoints behind the 
front lines would be able to hold back the Indian attack and 
gain time for the strategic counterattack is the key to overall 
victory or defeat. As is illustrated in the foregoing 
description of the infantry firepower of both sides we can see 
that China has as a slight superiority, especially in artillery, 
where the Chinese are not only superior to the Indians in 
technology, but in numbers as well. Therefore, the Chinese are 
fairly confident in the abilities of their forces to defend 
strongholds behind the front lines as well as make preparations 
for the strategic counterattack. 
  Attention must be paid to the fact that during their 
attack, the Indian forces will place a great deal of stress and 
possibly even too much reliance on firepower, and in addition to 
conducting a great deal of firepower preparations, there must be 
strong firepower support during the entire attack. Should the 
firepower cover ever be cut off, the attack would come to a 
halt. Conversely, for the Chinese forces, the most important 
mission in smashing the Indian attack would be to destroy the 
heavy firepower weapons and forces providing cover such as 
tanks, helicopter gunships, support artillery and heavy machine 
guns. Therefore, the Chinese ground forces must have sufficient 
one-man anti-tank missiles and surface-to-air missiles in 
addition to their current inventory as well as advanced personal 
night vision devices to enhance their night fighting 
capabilities. 
  In the later stages of the fighting, it will be up to the 
final strategic counterattack to completely crush the Indian 
assault. When the Chinese forces successfully assemble a force 
several times that of the Indian forces, and have a firm hold on 
air dominance, the time will be ripe for the strategic 
counterattack. At this time, the Chinese forces will have two 
options: The first option will be to break through the Indian 
frontal assault with the goal of routing the Indian forces. The 
second option will be to conduct a thrust or airborne actions 
behind Indian lines, including targets in India itself, and 
wiping out Indian forces there. Clearly, the second option 
falls in line with common combat principles. But the greatest 
danger is that it might lead to an escalation of the war. 
Whatever the choice, it must be made considering the situation 
at the time. Furthermore, one point is very clear. The final 
objective of the strategic counterattack will to be to end the 
ability of the Indian forces to pose a threat to China and to 
make the Indian authorities abandon their territorial demands 
against China. As for the number of enemy killed, this is only 
one condition necessary for achieving the strategic goal, "how 
excellent are forces which can conquer without fighting!" 
  In order to achieve the element of surprise in the 
counterattack and in order to achieve a rapid end to the 
fighting, the airborne actions will be coordinated with the 
attack on the front. This is a major tactic of counterattacking 
by the Chinese army. If the crack Indian divisions are 
surrounded and wiped out or suffer serious casualties, the 
situation will change very quickly. If the strategic 
counterattack is fought off by the Indian forces, the war will 
become mired down in a prolonged standoff. 
<H5>  Invisible Superiority Cannot Be Ignored </H5>
  It must be added that in space technology, the Chinese 
enjoy a clear superiority, and they may always have this 
superiority. India's space technology began in 1957. And while 
it has developed rapidly over the ensuing 30 plus years, its 
carrier rocket technology and its launch capability are still no 
match for China's. For example, India had only directly or 
indirectly launched l0 satellites by the end of 1989. Only two 
of these are still operating normally. The other eight have 
already become useless either because of malfunctions, or have 
reached the end of their time limits. It will take at least to 
the end of this century or the beginning of the next century for 
India to reach China's current level of space technology. By 
that time, China will already have begun to develop a space 
shuttle. The war in the Persian Gulf has made it clear that 
space technology has an important influence on wars. At the 
time, in order to monitor every move by Iraq and to determine 
the locations of major targets, the United States borrowed a 
number of satellites such as "Big Bird," "Lock Eyes" and "Hockey 
Ball" to provide the air forces and surface forces detailed 
intelligence information and so that Iraq was almost completely 
exposed to the eyes of the multinational force. We can see from 
this that in a war between China and India, superiority in space 
technology will allow the Chinese forces to be more effective 
and more precise in their force deployment, axis of attack and 
firepower. 
  In summation, can the Chinese forces repeat their glory of 
1962? Can they win a counterattack battle with India under 
modern conditions? The answer is affirmative. It is only that 
they will have to pay a higher price than in 1962. 
  It must be stressed that the consistent stand of the 
Chinese Government has always been that it will not make changes 
because its forces have become stronger, that it will primarily 
use peaceful means for a political settlement to resolve the 
territorial dispute. The Chinese Government has never provoked 
an armed conflict. Last year Premier Li Peng visited India, 
indicating that relations between China and India were moving 
toward a new stage. This illustrates the Chinese Government's 
honest intentions to actively develop friendly and cooperative 
relations with its bordering countries. It makes the statement 
to every Chinese soldier that war is a choice made only when it 
is forced upon us, and that best strategy is for a peaceful 
resolution of territorial disputes. 
<H5>  V: HOW TO COPE WITH THE THREAT FROM THE NORTH </H5>
  On a cold winter day 23 years ago, on the frozen ice of the 
Usuri River, there was an engagement between Chinese border 
defense forces and Soviet border defense forces, with a wide 
disparity in the size of forces. The Chinese forces which had 
never seen a T-62 new model tank relied on their spirit to 
"fight for the territorial integrity of the motherland," using 
82-mm recoilless rifles, 40-mm rocket launchers, infantry 
anti-tank mines in a life-and-death struggle with the Soviet 
forces. Although at the cost of over 100 lives, they fought 
back the Soviet provocation and captured a T-62 tank. The value 
of this tank is fully manifest in the later tank development in 
the Chinese forces. 
  At the time, while the Soviet General Staff was at a loss 
about what to do to get back the tanks which had been damaged, 
more startling news came in. During the assault, several dozen 
border defense soldiers had frozen to death in the snow. 
  Following a detailed investigation, they selected three 
divisions at random for an experiment in the snow. They quickly 
came to the conclusion that the reason these troops had frozen 
to death was that they had had no training on sleeping outside 
in below zero temperatures. Fortunately, several regular combat 
divisions were unable to reach the area by the time of the 
attack, or else even if the fighting had not escalated, the 
number of non-combat casualties would have reached four digits. 
  Both sides gained something and lost something in this 
fight. 
  Several months later, there was another clash between 
Chinese border defense forces and Soviet forces in the northwest 
border regions of Xinjiang. This time, the Soviets placed 
almost an entire battalion of regular combat elements into the 
battle, not border defense forces. The result was the death of 
an entire company of Chinese border defense forces. 
  This is from official records. There are some unofficial 
records, which are rumors and speculations which state that 
after this clash in Xinjiang, the Soviet forces intensified 
their forces and the forces breaking into Xinjiang territory 
reached an entire mechanized division. However, they were 
surprised by a huge mushroom shaped cloud which came down on 
their heads. After this, the Chinese Government announced that 
an atom bomb had been successfully exploded in western China. 
There was nothing the Soviet authorities could say. 
  Whether official records or unofficial records, it seems 
like it was only yesterday that it happened. 
<H5>  The Adversary Is Still Our "Older Brother" </H5>
  Even while the former Soviet Union was in ascendancy, 
China's forces were never really afraid of this military 
monster. This is the temperament of the Chinese people: never 
bow down to any outside pressure. Therefore, during the more 
than 20 years from the deterioration of relations between China 
and the Soviet Union to the break up of the Soviet Union, there 
were major forces facing each other across the Chinese Soviet 
border, ready to fight at the touch of a button. At that time, 
the Soviets had deployed one quarter of their combat units along 
their Far East border with China, and China deployed 75 percent 
of its forces to defend its Northern border. Although 
large-scale armed conflict or war never broke out, both sides 
paid a tremendous price for maintaining a combat readiness 
system and military balance to be able to "fight early, fight a 
large-scale war, and fight a nuclear war." 
  From conventional ammunition alone, it is possible to see 
the overall situation. Once China's vast military industrial 
production system had been turned up to high production to 
prepare for war with the Soviet forces, in a very short time of 
a few years, it allowed the 7.62-mm ammunition, various types of 
anti-tank rocket ammunition and bomb reserves of the Chinese 
military to reach a level where there was enough to fight a 
medium-scale war. There was more 7.62-mm ammunition alone than 
could be used in 10 years. This was a price to pay. Naturally, 
compared to the Soviet Union, the Chinese paid a much smaller 
price. 
  Today, the Soviet Union has been dismembered and the cold 
war is over. However, the greatest potential threat to China 
still comes from the north. The basic reason for this is that 
the Russians have inherited almost 80 percent of the military 
strength of the former Soviet Union. It is still the second 
strongest of the foremost military powers in the world. 
Furthermore, the Russians have a history of chauvinism. They 
are people with a strong expansionist nature. They will not be 
happy to be a second-class military power. In addition, 
Russia and China have historically "had border disputes," so 
just the existence of Russia alone is a great threat. The 
Russians are in the difficult position of internal struggles and 
economic straits. They are actively promoting peaceful 
diplomacy, and the military forces are undergoing a large-scale 
reduction. It looks as if they are nothing to be afraid of. 
However, when they are through this crisis and have escaped form 
the difficult conditions, they will begin recovery; it is hard 
to tell what the situation will be. 
  For China, the threat from the North underwent a basic 
change with the breakup of the Soviet Union. In addition to 
Russia, there are also Mongolia and Kazakhstan. Mongolia has a 
long land border with China. It also abuts Inner Mongolia. In 
January 1992, the Second Session of the 12th Mongolian Peoples' 
Congress passed a new constitution changing the name of the 
"Mongolian Peoples' Republic" to "Mongolia." The reason was 
primarily that Mongolia has a 2,200 year history, counting the 
785 years from the founding of Mongolia by Genghis Khan to the 
present day, and of these 785 years, the name of the country was 
Mongolia for 718 years. The name "Mongolians Peoples' Republic" 
is only 67 years old. We can see from this that Mongolia has 
begun its advance toward its goal of "Greater Mongolia." Such a 
result would directly lead to ripping Inner Mongolia from the 
map of China. Militarily, Mongolia is still no match for China 
on its own. There are only 24,500 Mongolian soldiers. It has 
21,000 men in the army with 650 tanks, 135 armored 
reconnaissance vehicles, 520 infantry combat vehicles, 450 
armored transport vehicles, 750 field pieces of various models, 
100 anti-aircraft guns, and 300 items of surface-to-air missile 
equipment. There are 3,500 men in the Air Force with more than 
30 fighters, 41 transports, and at least 10 helicopters. 
Obviously, Mongolia can only be considered to be a piddling 
country. Therefore, the only way it can achieve its goal of a 
"Greater Mongolia" is through stirring up sentiment for a racial 
division. 
  Kazakhstan has already had border territorial disputes with 
China. Most of what was once the western sector of the 
Sino-Soviet border is now the Sino- Kazakh border, which is more 
than 1,600 kilometers long. 
  In October 1991, the Kazakhstan Premier stated, while 
talking of the Sino-Soviet border dispute, "the way I see it, 
these lands were handed down to us generation after generation. 
We must not cede a single inch to any outsider." Beginning in 
the summer of 1991, the local governments of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan, for the purpose of "developing the economy on one 
hand and protecting national borders on the other," organized 
the herdsmen to go the borders to graze their herds there, 
disputing grazing facilities built in the area, seriously 
disrupting the situation along the Sino-Kazakh border and 
attracting the close scrutiny of the Chinese Government. Lying 
within the Republic of Kazakhstan is the Eastern Border Defense 
Military District, subordinate to the former Soviet Union 
National Security Council, and tasked with the responsibility 
for security on the Chinese border. The Republic of Kazakhstan 
does not currently have the ability to build an army of its own, 
so on one hand, it is calling for keeping a unified armed border 
force within the independent nations and on the other hand, is 
also calling for common control over the unified armed border 
forces. We can see from this that this Eastern Border Defense 
District could very possible become the basis for the 
Kazakhstanis to build their own army. 
  Both Mongolia and Kazakhstan could cause trouble for China, 
but neither is capable of doing anything militarily. The real 
threat is Russia. 
<H5>  Are the Russian Forces as Frightening as They Are Said To Be? </H5>
  Russia's military might is currently second in the world. 
This point is not to be doubted. However, occasionally there 
are a number of articles describing the Russian forces which 
miss the mark in quite a number of ways. In these articles, 
there is quite a bit of deliberately making them seem better 
than they really are. As for those who like to glorify data and 
use the names of weapons to scare people, if we had them go try 
to take on the Russians, they would be defeated and never know 
what had happened to them. The army of the former Soviet Union 
began in the thirties to use the "invisible" division type of 
structure. This system saved the Soviet Union, allowing it to 
escape defeat in World War II. They still use this system. At 
the beginning of World War II, one of the major errors of the 
German high command was in its calculations of the numbers of 
Soviet combat divisions. They had no understanding at all of the 
Soviet "Second Force." Therefore, they calculated 182 divisions 
according to the Soviet Union's conventional military 
establishment, while the Soviet Union actually had 303 
divisions. As a result, the German forces became mired down in 
a situation where "the more we fight the Soviet Red Army, the 
more of them there are." 
  The so-called "division system" is a double manning system. 
Each division commander has two deputy division commanders 
under him. One of these deputy commanders has a secret title, 
"commander of the second unit." Each regiment, battalion, and 
company works the same way. In this manner, when getting ready 
for war, one division can become two divisions overnight. 
  Similarly, during the cold war, the Soviet Union 
successfully used a series of tricks and deceptions to cover up 
its own weaknesses, and make it impossible for the United States 
to determine what was real and what was not. During the Cuban 
crisis, Khrushchev made the threat that with the push of a 
single button, capitalism will be blown to bits. When he made 
this statement, however, the Soviet rockets still had a major 
defect. The guidance system was completely unreliable and could 
not be deployed. When the United States began to deploy an 
anti-missile system, the Soviet Union had not considered this 
yet, but in a military parade, the Soviet Territorial Defense 
Forces displayed a huge rocket, making people believe it was an 
anti-missile missile. Actually, this rocket should have been 
with the Strategic Rocket Forces. There are any number of such 
deceptions. 
  There is a strategic deceptions bureau in the Soviet Army, 
whose function is to fabricate deceptions for security 
requirements. It has almost unlimited authority. It receives 
its orders from nowhere but the Kremlin. The misconceptions it 
creates last not for a few hours, but for a few years, for 
decades. 
  Early in the 1980's, a young German named Lewster flew a 
small civilian plane through the air defense network of the 
Warsaw pact with no problems at all and safely landed at the 
airport in Moscow. This not only shocked the authorities in the 
former Soviet Union, but also amazed the rest of the world. 
What had happened to the Russians' air defense system? Not 
long after that, the Soviets had announced that the Soviet 
Minister of Defense had been fired. This actually illustrates 
that there were frightening holes in the Soviet Union's air 
defense system. 
  In a large-scale exercise called "Lightning" in 1989, the 
battalion commander of a motorized battalion in the Soviet Army 
was relieved on the spot. The reason is silly and unbelievable. 
After this battalion commander received orders to "advance 
toward the assembly area," he did not take immediate action, but 
convened a battalion meeting to take a hand vote to see at 
exactly what time they should begin the advance. As a result, 
that battalion was two hours arriving at the assembly area. 
This incident, to a certain degree, reveals the problems in 
quality of some Soviet officers and problems with efficiency of 
military command. 
  As for weapons and equipment, the weapons of the various 
forces of the Soviet military have been far inferior to the 
Americans' for a long time. A small number of conventional 
weapons were not even as good as China's. Following the 
war in the Persian Gulf, China tackled the technology concerning 
a "stealth" bomber, and very quickly came out with her own 
model. This is something the Russians have never figured out. 
On the other hand, because of economic difficulties, a number of 
pieces of equipment they have been able to develop they have not 
been able to produce or use to equip the units. For example, the 
Yak-141 supersonic VTOL interceptor, which is best in the world, 
has been cancelled from the plans because of the poor economy. 
The Su-37 interceptor was only able to go into production after 
foreign cooperation. Because of the shortage of spare parts, 
the Air Force Tu-22 bomber has a readiness rate of only 30 to 40 
percent. Some have been grounded for more than six months. 
  From the late 1980's to the early 1990's, China enjoyed 
quite a few benefits in its flexible foreign policy. It was able 
to obtain advanced technology from the West, and coupled with 
low cost weapons from the Russians, they found it possible to 
upgrade the weapons and equipment of the Chinese forces into the 
next generation. Currently, the Chinese military forces are 
grasping the favorable opportunity when Russia has not yet 
"recovered" to accelerate the pace of advancing to next 
generation weapons and equipment, striving to reduce the degree 
by which it lags behind major military powers as quickly as 
possible. 
  Another factor worth noting is the serious amount of talent 
flow from the Soviet Union. This could have a fatal influence 
on future defense development in Russia. 
  Since the breakup of the former Soviet Union, more than 
70,000 top experts and technicians have already left the 
country, including 30,000 to the United States, 30,000 to 
Israel, 4,000 to Germany and 6,000 to France. These experts are 
a large part of the military's top technical people. Recently, 
the United States Strategic Defense Planning Agency drew up a 
plan to obtain as quickly as possible the scientific and 
technical personnel conducting the "Missile Defense Plan" for 
the former Soviet Union. Japan, Korea, Taiwan, and Libya are all 
doing all they can to obtain scientists and technicians from the 
former Soviet Union. We can see that because of political and 
economic difficulties, the flow of talent out of Russia is 
continuing. This will undoubtedly have a dampening effect on 
Russian military development which was not so great to start 
with. It may be believed that it will almost be impossible for 
the Russians to recapture their dream of being a military 
superpower. 
<H5>  Increasingly Less Pressure on Beijing </H5>
  During the time of the Sino-Soviet confrontation, there 
were a total of about 40 divisions of Soviet forces in the 
border region with China, called the million-man army. At that 
time, China estimated that there were nine axes along which the 
Soviet forces might break through. The one that worried China 
the most was a breakthrough along the China-Mongolia railroad 
where they would threaten China's heart, Beijing. This was 
because at the time the Soviets had as many as 180,000 troops 
stationed in Mongolia, constituting a direct threat to Beijing. 
  In 1981, the largest-scale live exercise in the history of 
its army was conducted in North China. This exercise was 
conducted with this strategic thought in mind. The area selected 
for the exercise was Zhangjiakou, northwest of Beijing. The 
exercise campaign was a campaign counterattack against a Soviet 
tank division and mechanized infantry forces which had broken 
through inside Chinese territory. In the exercise, they designed 
firepower assaults against temporary fortifications of 
concentrated tanks and mechanized infantry and infantry forces 
following tanks and combat vehicles on an assault on the enemy 
in makeshift defenses. They trained in coordinated combat 
between air forces, airborne forces, artillery forces, and 
infantry forces. 
  This large-scale military exercise reflected the concern of 
the Chinese over a Soviet attack on Beijing. 
  Following the breakup of the former Soviet Union, all of 
the Soviet forces in Mongolia withdrew, and one of the hidden 
dangers along the Sino-Mongolian border was eliminated. It was 
as if Beijing had been freed of a heavy burden. There were also 
major changes in the nine possible axes of breakthrough of the 
Soviet forces into China. Given the current status of the 
Russian military, it does not constitute a direct military 
pressure on China. The primary reason for this is that China's 
strategy has not constituted a direct threat to Russia, and 
correspondingly, Russia's strategic direction is not for the 
time being aimed at China. Secondly, the Russian armed forces 
are currently undergoing major restructuring and reform, and its 
peripheral forms are very complex. In addition to maintaining 
an alert to the West, it also wants to prevent the rise of the 
Ukraine as a political force. 
  From strategic considerations, the guiding philosophy of 
the Russians in building their army is "limited sufficiency," 
increasing its rapid-reaction capability to effectively resolve 
regional conflicts. Therefore, it will continue to reduce in 
total numbers its strategic military weapons and its 
conventional units, while maintaining a highly effective and 
highly capable strategic mobile force. 
  In strategic deployment, the Far East regions will not be 
weakened. However, the primary opponent will no longer be China 
alone, but will be a number of countries including the United 
States, Japan and Korea and China. Its primary defensive forces 
will be reduced in the western and central portions of Russia 
itself. Its combat strategy is "be capable of war outside the 
country, ensure territorial security." 
  In view of the situation described above, at the present 
time it is very difficult to predict what kind of war, on what 
kind of scale, along what kind of axis and in what area the 
Russian military might launch against China. Viewed from the 
present situation, China's Northeast is the primary sector where 
the two forces are facing each other. The largest and 
best-equipped military regions of both sides lie on either side 
of the border. The Russians have their Far East Military 
District with 22 mechanized divisions, two tank divisions, two 
artillery divisions, one airborne brigade, one campaign tactical 
rocket brigade and 585 combat aircraft. The Chinese have the 
Shenyang Military Region which has more men, tanks, armored 
vehicles, artillery of various types and its Air Force more 
combat aircraft than any other of China's military regions. 
Therefore, the possibility of a future armed conflict or local 
war between China and Russia is greatest for this region. 
<H5>  What Will We Use To Resist the Iron Forces of the Russians </H5>
  It is very difficult to imagine a future war between China 
and Russia. This is because of the multitude of changeable 
factors between these two countries, and the changes are very 
rapid, such as weapons upgrading, changes in combat concepts, 
use of new tactics, influences of political and diplomatic 
methods; all of these could cause the situation to change into 
something completely different, or the reverse might be true. 
However, when we place the object of our imagination outside of 
specific command warfare, it becomes of more practical value. 
  A war between China and Russia would be a three-dimensional 
war with coordination between all forces, with ground combat the 
primary method. There does not seem to be much dissent with 
this point. However, the important question is whether such a 
war between two nuclear powers would be fought without nuclear 
weapons. It is usually judged that the possibility of a nuclear 
war between two countries is extremely small, or nonexistent. 
  Although both countries lie within the nuclear strike zone 
of the other side, each has the capability of conducting 
destructive nuclear retaliation. However, the consequences of a 
major nuclear war would be "destroying the enemy and destroying 
oneself as well." However, this cannot eliminate the possibility 
of a nuclear shadow casting its pall over a conventional war. 
There are two prominent factors. One is the possibility that 
the Soviet forces could use tactical nuclear weapons to create a 
breach in our defenses. The second is the use of tactical 
nuclear weapons to stop an assault by the first echelon units or 
echelon formations which are attacking defenses in depth. This 
is a method which the Chinese forces could possibly use, 
especially on its own territory. Naturally, the Chinese 
government has stated time and again that it would never be the 
first to use nuclear weapons under any conditions. In other 
words, if the Russians do not use nuclear weapons in their 
attack, the Chinese forces would not break their promise. 
  We can reach a basic conclusion form all of this: Neither 
the Chinese nor the Russians had better push the nuclear button, 
but the nuclear trump card has not lost its deterrant role. 
  In a modern war primarily fought on the ground, the Russian 
"trump card" would obviously be the "king of the land battles," 
the tank. The Russians not only have more tanks than the 
United States, totalling almost 50,000, but they are 
leading-edge tanks. The area where a war between China and 
Russia could break out just happens to be the wide open spaces 
of the Northeast plains. This is where the tanks could really 
show their stuff. In number or quality of tanks, China is number 
three in the world, after Russia and the United States. 
However, in the next five years, it will be very difficult to 
surpass the Russians. Therefore, the very acute question facing 
the Chinese military is what can we use to hold back this iron 
wave of the Russian forces? 
  The reason the Russian attack is described using the term 
"iron wave" is that after World War II, concentration of tanks 
to break through defenses and for high-speed penetration has 
been the universally adopted method of attack of all countries. 
The military forces of the former Soviet Union have almost 
redefined the use of concentrations of tanks to an art. Their 
famous campaign theory of "great depth, wide front" and the 
various campaign and tactical principles related to this are all 
based on the use of concentrations of tanks. Even though the 
survivability of tanks is seriously challenged in a ground war 
under modern conditions, under conditions of coordinated combat 
of all forces, there is still nothing which can replace the 
breakthrough capability of concentrations of tanks. Also, for a 
fairly long time, the Russian military has been unable to 
gradually move to primarily aerial breakthrough as have the 
Americans. They primarily rely on the family of tanks left over 
from the former Soviet Union to fight primarily a ground 
assault. 
  With this precondition, it is not difficult to imagine that 
when the Russian forces launch a sudden attack into China, the 
Chinese defense forces stationed in hilly and flat regions will 
be facing a high-speed attack by hundreds and thousands of 
tanks. Furthermore, prior to this tank assault, they will have 
to withstand 40 to 60 minutes of aerial, missile, and collective 
artillery bombardment. The entire battlefield will be a wall of 
fire, everything will be torn up, and tanks and armored vehicles 
as thick as ants lined up in combat formation will come rumbling 
forward in a cloud of dust. There could also be swarms of 
helicopters covering the sky. This is what the Russian attack 
would look like, and it is not an exaggeration. 
  Naturally, how to resist attacks by concentrations of tanks 
is not a new problem for the Chinese military. 
  From the late 1960's to the 1980's, the Chinese forces have 
been doing research taking the forces of the former Soviet Union 
as their primary adversary. They have conducted a great deal of 
research and many exercises for battles against their primary 
breakthrough methods of concentrations of tanks. They have made 
fairly thorough preparations for actual combat and combat zone 
constructions, especially research in multiple force resistance 
of an enemy attack by concentrations of tanks under conditions 
of inferior equipment. It can be said that it has been very 
effective. Under the guiding philosophy of "dig holes deep, 
store grain everywhere, never seek hegemony," in the 1960's and 
1970's the Chinese forces constructed large amounts of permanent 
defensive fortifications so they would always be ready to "fight 
an early war, fight a large war, fight a nuclear war" along the 
axis of possible Soviet invasions. These fortifications are 
already there to be used to resist an army of Russian tanks. 
  Some people believe that when an infantry division can hold 
off a tank division, then a stable defensive structure can be 
constructed, with strong fores not being too strong and weak 
forces not being too weak, so both sides will be equal on the 
battlefield. This view is not unreasonable, and actually the 
Chinese forces already have this type of capability; it is just 
that it is not just a pure infantry division fighting (in actual 
combat, there is also no such thing as an attack by a pure tank 
division), but is a joint forces coordinated combat. 
  What then are the present and future technical and tactical 
means with which the Chinese forces can hold off an attack by 
concentrations of tanks? 
  For offensive weapons, the various types of anti-tank 
missiles are the most effective and the most threatening 
"killer." Currently, the Chinese forces not only have anti-tank 
missile detachments universally assigned throughout their 
infantry forces, but the Army Air Forces also have 
air-to-surface anti-tank missiles. Second, the Chinese forces 
have sufficient numbers of tanks and armored combat vehicles 
which are less than first rate, and quite a few which are first 
rate. In a defensive war, tanks and armored vehicles positioned 
in hidden locations will pose a threat to advancing enemy tanks 
which is second only to anti-tank missiles because tank to tank 
effectiveness is one to one. Third are helicopters and 
attack aircraft. Normally, the most effective weapons against 
tanks are aerial weapons which attack the tops of the tanks 
which offer a large target and a high hit rate. Also, the armor 
is weaker on top. However, without air superiority, it is 
difficult to bring these weapons into play and China does not 
have helicopters and attack aircraft in the numbers and quality 
of the two previous types of anti-tank weapons. Fourth is to 
bring the various types of anti-tank artillery into play. In 
addition to the heavy suppression guns, the artillery pieces 
which can be used directly against tanks are the 85-mm gun, the 
82-mm recoilless rifle and the 105-mm recoilless rifle. Fifth 
is the infantry one-man rocket launcher. In close-range combat, 
the one-man rocket launcher is a great threat to tanks, non only 
are there large numbers of these weapons, but they are easily 
carried and can often deal a fatal blow from a blind spot 
outside of the tank's vision. 
  Large mine fields made up of various types of anti-tank 
mines are primary defensive weapons and tactics which restrict 
the movement of enemy tanks. The Chinese forces currently 
possess all types of anti-tank mines. They also have high-speed 
mine laying methods such as rocket mine laying and aerial mine 
laying. Methods used in conjunction with mine field construction 
include such obstacles as anti-tank trenches, dragon's teeth, 
and abatis. Along the primary defensive axes, a mixed obstacle 
area is usually set up which is more than 50 meters wide and 
more than 200 meters deep. On plains, defensive battles at the 
regimental scale and higher, a large scale anti-tank network of 
defensive positions are usually constructed and combined with 
the obstacle zone to form a single area 2,000 to 3,000 meters 
wide and 1,500 to 2,000 meters deep. In the positions, there is 
a criss cross pattern of trenches with mine fields scattered 
throughout. In addition, these are various types of fixed 
obstacles, forming a complex variable network defensive system. 
This provides ideal concealment, mobility and firing positions 
for the various anti-tank weapons. When tanks enter them, it is 
very difficult for them to move, it is difficult for them to 
protect their flanks, and it is difficult to protect against 
attacks from every direction. This type of network defensive 
system also makes it possible for individual soldiers to attack 
tanks. Because the mobility of the tanks is limited, and 
because they have to keep moving laterally and turning, the 
infantry forces scampering through all the tunnels can use 
magnetic mines, demolition and explosive charges against the 
tanks, and can even conduct an assault against the tanks, making 
it impossible for the tanks to defend themselves. 
  As for tactics, the Chinese forces will ordinarily intercept 
advancing enemy tanks along the primary axis of attack by 
conducting long-range, intermediate-range, and close-range 
firepower blockades. When the tanks have advanced to within 40 
kilometers and are massing, the attached defensive artillery 
groups and army airborne units will conduct firepower harassment 
against the tanks. When the tanks have entered the 3,000 meter 
sector and deployed, the anti-tank missiles and direct-aim 
artillery pieces will begin firing. At the same time, 
suppression guns will conduct a firepower assault, trying to 
disrupt the tank formation. When the tanks have advanced to 
within 1,000 meters and have begun to fire on the defensive 
positions, the intermediate- and close-range anti-tank firepower 
will switch over to firing at the second echelon tank forces. 
At this time, the infantry forces and the other troops in the 
positions will be concealed, and when the tanks charge up to the 
obstacle zone 500 meters from the positions and the enemy 
suppression fire is extended to areas inside the defensive 
areas, the various close-range anti-tank weapons will all be 
thrown into the battle. 
  To prevent the enemy from changing direction, the defensive 
units will usually have under their command a strong reserve 
consisting of tanks, armored combat vehicles, helicopter 
gunships, and missile detachments that can carry out high-speed 
blocking actions against the enemy axis of attack. 
  It must be strongly emphasized that because the trend toward 
"aerializing" modern ground combat has already begun, and 
because the firepower assault mode of army air forces plus 
concentrations of tanks has already been formed, the stability 
of infantry ground defenses are determined by their ability to 
defend against aerial attack, and the individual soldier's air 
defense weapons and positional air defense weapons are crucial 
equipment. However, this just happens to be a current weakness 
of the Chinese ground forces. 
<H5>  The Idea of an Aggressive Defense Must Be Carried Out </H5>
  If Russia throws one tank division and two mechanized 
infantry divisions into combat in the first stage of its 
strategic attack, its surface assault strength would be around 
500 combat vehicles and 30,000 combat personnel. It would be 
unimaginable to rely purely on a frontal defense against a 
high-speed mobile combat force with such strong firepower as 
this. 
  The so-called aggressive defense refers to the need to 
conduct a strong assault on the enemy flanks, rear, or second 
echelon forces at the same time as the frontal defense to 
quickly break up the enemy's assault. When possible, we must 
surround and wipe out enemy forces that have broken through. 
This is what is known as a "defensive attack." 
  Therefore, while the Chinese forces are carrying out a 
frontal defense against the Russians, they should prepare to 
launch a counterattack on the attacking Russian tanks and 
mechanized infantry forces. This mission is usually the 
responsibility of the campaign reserves under the control of the 
group army. There is a fairly wide choice of directions and 
methods of campaign counterattack. Based on the deployment of 
the Russian forces and the conditions at the time, the three 
following situations at least must be considered. 
  First, conduct a flank attack on the attacking enemy, wiping 
out its first echelon units. The Chinese campaign reserves will 
be mainly composed of tanks and mechanized infantry forces. 
When the Russian forces are assaulting frontal defenses, the 
Chinese campaign reserves will began flanking actions against 
them. When the Chinese suppression firepower is bombarding the 
Russian second echelon forces, the reserve forces should launch 
a flanking assault on the Russian forces when the assault of 
Russian first echelon units has been slowed or stopped. In this 
manner, even if they are unable to completely wipe out the 
Russian first echelon units, they will completely break up the 
Russian's first assault. The advantages of this method are that 
it breaks down the morale of the enemy, it is easy to 
accomplish, and chances of success are higher. 
  Second, conduct fairly large scale attacks on the Russian 
rear forces so that the first and second echelons that have 
broken through can be surrounded and wiped out. This method 
requires twice as many reserves, and tanks act as the primary 
forces for the penetration attack, followed by mechanized 
infantry forces. It is possible to have this method evolve into 
a strategic counterattack, when the situation permits, using one 
to three divisions of rapid- reaction forces to launch an 
assault on positions deep within the Russian Far East Military 
Region, aiming at the command center of the Far East Military 
Region. This would mean that the fires of war had reached 
Russian soil. If it is possible to make the attacking Russian 
forces retreat quickly, abandoning their earliest strategic 
objectives, it is also possible that it would cause the Russian 
forces to form an attack on an even larger scale. 
  Third, conduct an attack on the Russian rear supply 
facilities. Large scale tank battles require large amounts of 
fuel. To provide services for the distant combat of the 
attacking forces, the Russian forces would need to set up at 
least three field pipelines and one to two mobile supply routes. 
These would be the lifeline of the attack forces. Should this 
be cut off by the Chinese forces, the attack would be paralyzed. 
In an attack on the Russian rear supply routes, the Chinese 
could use a large number of forces and methods. Air forces, 
missile units, tank and armored assault forces, and campaign 
artillery groups could all be used. This would be a tremendous 
threat to the Russians. 
  In addition to the forms described above, depending on the 
terrain conditions of the combat zone, the Chinese forces could 
also make an issue of the assault defensive system, deploying in 
advance sufficient forces on either side of the primary axes of 
the Russian assault to form pocket defenses. In accomplishing 
this, the key problem is how to conceal this from the Russian 
reconnaissance and monitoring systems and how to mislead the 
Russians. 
  In sum, there are a number of topics the Chinese can study 
concerning how to deal with large Russian tank forces. However, 
as their equipment and technical measures become more and more 
modernized, the Chinese forces will become even more confident 
of success. 
<H5>  VI. CAN THE THREE GORGES PROJECT BE PROTECTED? </H5>
  "The 900 miles of the Three Gorges, 900 twists and turns, 
9,000 boats, 990,000 nets, 90,000 new homes, 90,000,000 mu of 
orchards, and 900,000 new residents sing beneath the bright 
sunny skies." The boats float upon the waters in the Three 
Gorges reservoir, loaded with tangerines, apples, vegetables, 
and pharmaceuticals. There has been another bountiful harvest 
around the Three Gorges reservoir. 
  My friends, when you hear this song, do you think about some 
of the events that came up while the idea of the Three Gorges 
was discussed? 
<H5>  Forty Billion Cubic Meters of Water Hanging Over Their Heads </H5>
  Fourteen different "Feasibility Studies of the Three Gorges 
Project," -- stacked on top of each other they would be one 
meter high. When the People's Congress approved these reports, 
the vote was not unanimous. At that time the report only 
mentioned that "of 412 experts, 402 have signed this report. 
Nine experts are in opposition to this report and have not 
signed it. These nine experts who did not sign the report had 
sufficient reason for their reservations. They could bring out 
pile after pile of detailed reports to make the experts who did 
sign the report feel that the pen they signed with was heavy 
indeed. There was one reason that was commonly held and which 
carried a great deal of weight: They would not be responsible 
for hanging the "Sword of Damocles" -- made up of 40 billion 
cubic meters of water -- over the heads of the tens of millions 
of people downstream on the Chang Jiang. 
  Back in September of 1969, when the Deputy Chairman of the 
Hubei Provincial Revolutionary Committee, Zhang Tixue, once more 
proposed the Three Gorges Project to Chairman Mao, Chairman Mao 
pointed out, "We are not now thinking about the Three Gorges, we 
are getting ready for war." He asked Zhang Tixue, "Would you be 
afraid to have 20 billion cubic meters of water hanging over 
your head?" 
  Does this statement mean that Chairman Mao was opposed to 
the 
Three Gorges? In 1956 he wrote in a poem, "building a rock wall 
will block the river in the west, cutting off the rain water 
from the mountains, turning it into a lake. The goddess should 
remain in good health, and the world will be amazed." The 
construction of the Three Gorges Reservoir to bring prosperity 
to all of the descendents of the Yellow Emperor was his lifetime 
ambition. 
  Similarly, several experts did not sign the feasibility 
report, but this was not to oppose the building of the 
reservoir. From 1959 until the report on the construction of 
the Three Gorges had been reviewed and passed by the National 
People's Congress, a span of 30 years, research and testing of 
air defense for the Three Gorges project continued unabated. 
  It would make sense that military experts would have the 
best 
reasons to cast dissenting votes. However, professor Yin 
Zhishu, deputy chairman for science and technology of the 
General Staff Engineer Command did sign the report. He also 
continued scientific research and testing for air defense of the 
Three Gorges Project. He said that he signed the report because 
Sandouping was selected as the site for the dam, and if the 
original site, Nanjinguan, had been selected, he would have 
refused to sign. He said, "It was extremely fortunate that 
Sandouping was selected. From Liantuo to Nanjinguan there are 
20 kilometers of narrow gorges and there are three 90 degree 
turns; this greatly reduces the peak flow at the dam. When the 
reservoir is at its maximum water level of 175 meters, if the 
dam should collapse and the water in the reservoir be released, 
the maximum water level at Shashi would be 45.75 meters, 1.25 
meters below the top of the levee." However, this view of his 
caused him to be criticized by others in the military. "This is 
risk-taking. Do you really think that an enemy would only bomb 
your Three Gorges and would not bomb your levees?" 
  This is true. At his home the night before he signed the 
report, several of his old comrades-in-arms kept repeating what 
had happened in the past. 
  During the 100 years from 1849 to 1949 there had been seven 
major floods on the Chang Jiang, averaging one every 14 years! 
  There were especially large floods in 1860 and 1870. There 
were major breaks in the levies of the Xinjiang, inundating more 
than 30 counties and resulting in several million deaths. 
  In the major flood in 1931, in the area of the middle 
reaches 
of the river, 50.9 million mu were covered and 145,000 people 
died. Hankou was flooded for an entire month. Boats sailed in 
the streets of the city, and the Beijing to Hankou railroad was 
washed out. 
  In the major flood in 1935, in a single night in the middle 
and lower reaches of the Hanjiang, 30,000 people were drowned. 
Also, 30,000 people were drowned in the middle and lower 
reaches of the Lijiang. 
  The most unforgettable flood was in the summer of 1949 when 
their units were being led south through Hebei and Hunan and 
came up against a major flood in the Chang Jiang. This flood 
was comparable to the flood in 1931 when more than 140,000 
people drowned. 
  The purpose of the reservoir was to eliminate flooding 
disasters, but building the reservoir could possibly cause a 
flooding disaster. 
  It is true that there are two sides to everything, one 
favorable and one unfavorable. The Three Gorges Project will 
be, after all, a world class major reservoir covering l9 
counties and cities in two provinces. From Sun Yatsen to Mao 
Zedong, from the Nationalists to the Communists, from American 
Hydraulic Engineering expert Safanqi [5646 0416 1142] to all the 
decedents of the Yellow Emperor in China, who has not dreamed of 
damming up the Three Gorges? Who has not dreamed of holding 
back the Chang Jiang to create prosperity for the people? 
  In choosing between disadvantages and advantages, the 
representatives of the National People's Congress saw that the 
advantages outweighed the disadvantages and finally passed the 
resolution (to build the Three Gorges Project). The thing is, 
when they passed this resolution, they placed a tremendous 
responsibility on the shoulders of the Chinese military to 
protect the Three Gorges Project. This responsibility concerned 
the safety of several hundred million fellow countrymen. It 
involved the overall growth of the nation. It was every bit as 
critical as fighting a local war! 
  The threat of future wars did not keep work from beginning 
on 
the Three Gorges Project. 
  Neither did the beginning of work on the Three Gorges 
Project 
reduce the possibility of war. 
  The heavy responsibility of defending the Three Gorges 
during 
wartime naturally fell upon the shoulders of our soldiers. 
  Can the Three Gorges Project be preserved in the event of a 
future war? 
<H5>  Where Lies the Danger in the Three Gorges Project? </H5>
  Once work begins on the Three Gorges Project, it will 
necessarily become a major strategic project in any future war. 
Therefore, a series of defensive measures for the Three Gorges 
Project will all have to be considered in terms of strategic 
importance. Because the Three Gorges Project is located in the 
interior, and since it is a fixed military strategic target 
which is easily attacked and difficult to defend, defenses will 
have to be passive. Therefore, the establishment an infallible 
defensive system is a very complicated problem of system 
engineering. 
  The decision to finally begin work on the Three Gorges 
illustrates that the Chinese have sufficient confidence and 
determination in its defense. The military is at least 70 to 80 
percent confident. Otherwise, they would be playing games with 
the lives of several million people. 
  How a defensive system for the Three Gorges Project is to be 
established has naturally become a key state secret. We cannot 
describe its specifics, but from the public statements of a 
number of military experts concerning research reports, we can 
make a few approximations and guesses. 
  When will the period of danger begin? 
  The Three Gorges Project will last into the next century. It 
will not be completed until the year 2008. This is a span of 15 
years, but no one can say for sure if China will be involved in 
a war in the next 15 years. No one can say what kind of changes 
will occur in the world military struggle during these 15 years. 
China recently announced that the flow of water would begin to 
be cut off in 1997. That is to say, the period of danger will 
begin in 1997. Cutting off the flow will not cause the water 
level upstream to reach the maximum height of 175 meters, but 
after the flow has been cut off, the water level will be 
sufficient to constitute a threat downstream. Therefore, the 
various defensive deployments should be basically completed in 
1997 to deal with any situation that might develop. 
<H5>  What Kind of Attack Might Be Launched Against the Three </H5>
Gorges? 
  There are many different methods that could be use to attack 
the Three Gorges, but an analysis of the results of an attack 
and the conditions under which the assault would be launched 
shows that there are four major possible methods. 
  Strategic Nuclear Warhead: This could be launched directly 
form the enemy's own soil, and a direct attack by a single 
warhead could achieve the objective of destroying the dam. If 
MIRV warheads were used, not only would the probability of a 
direct hit be greater, but the capability of breaking through 
defenses would be greater. It would be easily accomplished. 
The risk of this method is that it would be subject to 
international pressure and nuclear retaliation by China. 
  Conventional Missiles: These are launched with better 
mobility, are easy to prepare, have less effect, and usually 
require a number of missiles to make direct hits to accomplish 
the objective of breaking through defenses. 
  Aerial Bombardment: This is the use of long-range bomber 
groups to conduct a bombing assault on the Three Gorges Dam. 
This would be a reasonable move in a major war. The hit rate 
would be much higher than for a bridge or building. Naturally, 
in the use of air forces, the major difficulty would be solving 
the problem of air defense. Unlike the first two methods, 
bombers would be facing attacks by aerial combat and surface 
firepower. 
  Demolition: This is using crack special forces detachments 
to 
perform destructive demolition on the Three Gorges Dam. Since 
World War II, this has been a method easily imagined by military 
strategists. The most outstanding advantage to this method is 
that it is covert, sudden, and highly reliable. The 
disadvantages are that it would be an extremely complex mission 
to organize, it would take a fairly long time to conduct 
simulation training, and the technical requirements would be 
very high. 
  From current military developments in countries around the 
world and their strategic relationships with China, the 
countries that are capable of using the methods of attack 
described above and that constitute a threat to the Three Gorges 
Project are the United States, Japan, Russia, and India. This 
is to say that these countries are the ones the Three Gorges 
Project must be protected against and that special deployments 
against the attack capabilities of these nations must be 
conducted. If we can defend against attacks from these four 
nations, then it would be an easy task to defend against other 
nations. 
<H5>  The First Sky Network: Anti-Missile Missile Defense System </H5>
  The objective of future local wars will not be the Three 
Gorges. The Three Gorges will, however, be a primary target in 
future regional wars. 
  Since the Three Gorges Project will be a major strategic 
target, its strategic defensive deployment must be placed within 
the national strategic defense system, and it must not be an 
independent defense system. 
  The significance of this is that this network will not only 
protect the Three Gorges but will also cover major cities along 
the Chang Jiang such as Chengdu, Wuhan, Zhenzhou, Nanchang, 
Nanjing, and Shanghai, as well as such strategic centers as 
Sichuan, Yunnan, Guizhou, Hunan, Henan, Anhui, Zhejiang, 
Jiangxi, Fujian, and Guangdong -- a large portion of China. 
  The primary mission of this network will be to intercept 
outside the atmosphere ballistic missiles coming from all 
directions. Its deployment will not require a special 
adjustment. This is because the deployment of China's 
anti-missile missiles is a mixture of fixed launch points and 
mobile launch points. They are ground based or sea launched. 
The Second Artillery and the naval submarine forces are 
responsible for launching anti-missile missiles. There are 
currently two major weapons which they use. 
  The first is the CZ-AI anti-missile missile. It is much 
smaller than the Changzheng-I and the Changzheng-II, with which 
people are familiar. It is also much less expensive, but can be 
used for interceptions inside and outside the atmosphere. 
Flight time is less than that of the Galosh missile. It has 
cruise capability and is equipped with a rocket engine capable 
of multiple start-ups and shut downs. After launch, the engine 
is shut down, and the missile glides while awaiting further 
guidance instructions. Then the engine is restarted for powered 
intercept. 
  Second is the CZ-B-01 anti-missile missile, which began 
being 
deployed in the 1990's. This is a terminal intercept missile 
based on modifications to the SZ-12 surface-to-air missile. The 
missile is equipped with a new high-speed two-aspect target 
tracking radar. It has supersonic intercept speeds and can 
reach its target within five minutes. It is claimed that the 
missile can destroy all types of ICBMs, including the U.S. MX 
missile. 
  The keys to how well this sky network will operate are the 
reaction speed and precision of the system. To improve the 
combat capabilities of this system, the Chinese are developing 
better radars, planning to set up a large combat command phased 
array radar in the area of the Nanling Mountains, and will set 
up three phased array control radars in Taian in Shandong (where 
the three provinces of Zhejiang, Fujian, and Jiangxi come 
together), in the Huangling Mountains, and in the Xichang area 
of Sichuan. This system will be capable of monitoring and 
tracking Trident missiles launched from U.S. submarines in the 
Pacific. To improve radar surviveability, they will also 
actively develop mobile phased array radars. 
<H5>  The Second Sky Network: Three-Dimensional Intercepts Within </H5>
the Atmosphere 
  In certain ways, the second "Sky Network" is the key to the 
defense system. One reason for this is China's current 
relatively superior capability for interceptions within the 
atmosphere, and China's technology and equipment could easily 
meet strategic requirements. On the other hand, there are many 
possible means of enemy attack within the atmosphere, and 
defense is more difficult. Therefore, protection of air space 
within the atmosphere is an extremely critical link. 
  Defense systems for inside the atmosphere are divided into 
high, medium, and low altitude defenses. High altitude refers 
to air space over 2,000 meters above the earth. Medium refers 
to altitudes between 500 and 2,000 meters, and low refers to 
below 500 meters. The forces primarily responsible for this 
defense mission are the Second Artillery, the Air Force, the Air 
Force Surface Air Defense Forces, and the Army Air Defense 
Forces. The primary weapons are surface-to-air missiles, F-7, 
F-8, and Su-27 combat aircraft, one-man anti-aircraft missiles, 
and various types of anti-aircraft artillery and machine guns. 
  We can imagine that there will be a relatively large number 
and a complex mix of men and weapons composing the second Sky 
Network, so a special deployment will be required. The basic 
principles of this deployment will be a sequentially dispersed 
deployment of the following forces, listed in order of proximity 
to the Three Gorges Dam: ground forces air defense units, Air 
Force air defense units, Second Artillery units, and Air Force 
aerial combat units. Their missions will be as follows: The 
Second Artillery will be primarily responsible for high altitude 
defense. Medium and low altitude defense will be the 
responsibility of the Air Force and Army air defense units. 
  It must be stressed that militaries throughout the world are 
paying more and more attention to the role of surface-to-air 
intercept missiles. The experience of the Gulf War was that 
advanced intercept missiles are the most effective air defense. 
The technical level of the surface-to-air missiles with which 
Chinese units are now equipped cannot yet meet defensive 
requirements. 
  Exactly what kind of missiles will be used? Military experts 
have conducted conscientious research and testing, and from the 
standpoints of economics, effectiveness, and feasibility, they 
believe that they will opt for the Soviet Galosh intercept 
missile. This is a modification of the "Gelifeng" [2706 6849 
0023] intercept missile. It uses a two or three stage solid (or 
liquid) fuel rocket with greater power and higher rate of 
intercept. It is capable of high altitude intercepts, and it 
has a much higher precision than rocket artillery. 
  Beginning in 1964, four of these defensive systems were 
deployed around the perimeter of the Soviet Union. Each 
defensive system was divided into two groups, and each group had 
eight intercept missile launchers (for a total of 64 launchers), 
one large tracking radar, and two intercept missile guidance 
radars. Two of these were dismantled in 1982, and by 1988, 
because the "Sentinel" intercept missile system has been shut 
down, the Galosh is the only anti-missile system in the world 
with active capabilities. 
  This sort of system in the area of the Three Gorges would 
not 
be much different than the one in Moscow. It would be formed of 
two defensive systems, one each on the north and south banks. 
Each system would be composed of three launch groups and each 
launch group would have nine launchers, for a total of 54 
launchers. This is sufficient for a missile defense barrier in 
the area of the dam. However, as a wartime strategic defense 
system, it still has some serious shortcomings, primarily the 
following three: 
<H5>  The Nerve Center of the Sky Network: the Shenzhou </H5>
C[.sup]3[/]I System 
[page 51 of original missing] 
...land-based non-nuclear intercept missiles including 70 
exosphere re-entry interceptors (ERIS) and 30 upper atmosphere 
defense interceptors (HEDI) using Changzheng missile launch 
silos. 
  2. Monitoring and Tracking: In addition to using current 
early warning satellites and early warning radar, terminal 
imaging radar and three surface transmission surveillance and 
tracking radars will be deployed. 
  3. Combat Management (C[.sup]3[/]I): This will be composed 
of target early warning centers, combat control centers and 
communications centers with early warning satellites, 
communications satellites, and early warning radars. 
<H5>  The Defense System Must Be Built in Stages </H5>
  The overall defense system can be built in six stages as 
work 
progresses on the Three Gorges dam. 
  The first step will be taken in 1994. This will be the 
deployment of land-based long-range intercept missiles in 
conjunction with current early warning sensors. This can be 
accomplished with current technological capabilities, and will 
provide a certain priority defense and will also be able to deal 
with accidental launches, third country attacks, and terrorist 
attempts. 
  The second step will be taken in 1996. Without violating the 
ABM treaty, a new generation of air surveillance systems will be 
deployed to improve early warning detection and identification 
capabilities against a missile attack and to lay a foundation 
for future defense systems to handle larger scale and more 
complex attacks. At the same time, a certain number of air 
force and air defense units will be deployed. 
  The third step will be taken in 1998. A system will be 
deployed to protect national command authorities against a 
missile attack (to include a submarine launched missile attack). 
It will include the use of short range interceptors and ought 
to employ a multiple capability surface-to-air missile system 
which can be used against ballistic missiles, cruise missiles, 
and bombers. Improved versions of the Shenzhou and Changzheng 
anti-missile missiles are candidates for this stage. 
  The fourth step will be taken in the year 2000. In this 
stage, the scale of the defense system will be expanded and will 
include additional anti-missile missile launch sites, additional 
numbers of interceptors, and improved sensors that will be able 
to handle countermeasures. All air force and air defense units 
will be in position. 
  The fifth step will be taken in the year 2004. It will 
consist of the addition of space-based interceptors to conduct 
boost stage and post-boost stage intercepts. 
  In the year 2008, when the Three Gorges project will be 
completed, the sixth step will be taken. This will be the 
addition of space-based and land-based directed energy weapons. 
  While deploying the air defense system, in addition to armed 
security units to protect the dam, it will also be necessary to 
deploy two or three regiments of army special forces to deal 
with any intrusion by groups of enemy agents. These steps will 
basically meet the requirements of a three-dimensional defense. 
<H5>  No Defense Is Perfect </H5>
  Imagine, in a certain month of a certain year, war finally 
breaks out. 
  On the first day, missiles swarm like bees. Our 
C[.sup]3[/]I system is totally activated and the intercept 
rate is 99 percent. The missiles become casualties of war, 
exploding in the atmosphere. 
  The next day, the war suddenly cools down, and electronic 
pulse blips appear on a number of radar screens. 
  On the third day, a long-range missile attacks the dam. It 
is recognized by almost none of the surveillance systems. Why 
did the C[.sup]3[/]I system become blocked? 
  Computers determine that the C[.sup]3[/]I system was 
damaged. 
  The reserve system is turned on. It will not operate. 
  The emergency system is activated. It will not operate 
either. 
  None of the three sets of C[.sup]3[/]I reserve equipment 
will operate. Why is this? 
  This is what could possibly happen in future local wars. 
Even now, a number of military powers already possess means and 
capabilities to deal with three- dimensional defense systems. 
They all fall into the following categories of high science and 
technology. 
  1. Direct laser radiation from a satellite to damage all air 
defense electronic equipment. 
  The former Soviet Union began research on laser weapons in 
the early 1960's, and it had a huge development plan. In the 
1970's, it spent nine times as much as the United States on high 
energy laser weapons, totalling as much as $10 billion. After 
the 1980's, it was spending three to four times as much as the 
United States. As for the scope of the Soviet laser weapons 
development plan, the Americans sighed, "to match the scale of 
the Soviet laser weapons plan, the United States would have to 
spend about $1 billion per year." 
  The United States has already set up more than eight large 
development plants and test sites as well as 15 large research 
centers. There are more than 10,000 scientists, engineers, and 
technicians conducting laser weapons research operations at 
almost 30 facilities. Most of their work is concentrated at the 
missile test center in Texas. In addition, they have 
established high power infrared laser experimental stations in 
Florida, the northern and central Appalachians, Mount Ranier, 
Death Valley in California, the Alaskan Peninsula, and at Keboke 
[4430 0130 0344], 100 kilometers south of the Brooks Range. 
These are responsible for developing and testing various types 
of directed energy weapons as well as related research and 
testing. 
  Japan also has a group of outstanding scientists who are 
conducting research on laser weapons. For example, a physics 
professor at the leading Sendai Institute of Physics is working 
on a particle beam weapon and another professor is working on it 
with him. Both are famous scientists well known in the Western 
scientific community. They are conducting high energy 
industrial laser research and have made great accomplishments in 
using lasers to cut and weld metals. In 1968, physicist Okada 
Kimisa [Gangtian Junzuo 1511 3944 0689 0146] made and operated 
the world's first hydrogen fluoride laser. This laser and the 
similar deuterium fluoride laser can both be used as laser 
weapons, especially space-based laser weapons. In 1970, 
physicist Fumi Taro [Shi Tailang 0670 1132 6745] and other 
scientists presented a report on gas kinematic carbon dioxide 
laser weapon research, with progress in this area of research 
almost equal to that of the United States. 
  In the early 1980's, a U.S. reconnaissance satellite 
detected 
that the former Soviet Union was building a directed energy 
weapon at Sary Shagan, and the United States believed that it 
was a type of iodine laser. In addition, a gas kinematics 
carbon dioxide laser had already been put into use at Luoyiqike 
[5012 0122 7871 0344]. The United States believes that the 
laser in Sary Shagan has already destroyed a number of reentry 
missile warheads. Also, the former Soviet Union has also 
developed land-based lasers for air defense missions. It is 
widely believed in the West that the former Soviet Union already 
possesses the ability and technology to manufacture space 
weapons. On 13 October 1985, Secretary of Defense Weinberger 
stated in a speech to the World Affairs Commission in 
Philadelphia that "the Soviets currently possess land-based 
laser weapons that can jam our satellites. By the end of the 
1980's, they may possess prototypes of land-based laser weapons 
that can shoot down ballistic missiles. In the early 1990's, 
the Soviets will begin experimenting with their use as part of a 
large scale deployment system. The Soviets place top priority 
on airborne lasers, primarily for use in anti-satellite warfare, 
protection of major space facilities, and dealing with incoming 
cruise missiles. It is estimated that they will begin small 
scale deployment in the 1990's. 
  According to an article in Japan's READER'S DIGEST, the 
United States continues to do research on gas kinematics lasers, 
discharge lasers, chemical lasers, eximer lasers, X-ray lasers, 
gamma ray lasers, and argon ion lasers. The types of lasers 
being researched by the United States and the former Soviet 
Union are about the same. However, U.S. officials believe that 
it is possible that their lasers are somewhat better than those 
of the former Soviet Union. The former Soviet Union possesses 
several pioneer lasers, and their operational level is very 
high. The X-ray laser is an example. The Soviets discovered 
during thermonuclear atmospheric testing back in 1958 that the 
X-rays produced by thermonuclear blasts can render ICBMs 
ineffective. This was the basis which later led to the 
development of X-ray lasers. In 1972, Soviet scientists 
published papers on the principles of X-ray and gamma ray 
lasers. It was not until 1980, however, that the United States 
first achieved an X-ray laser from a nuclear explosion. The 
Soviets have done a great deal of work on X-ray optics and on 
non-nuclear aspects. They have manufactured large pulse lasers 
which use conventional explosive blasts to be the energy source 
to produce pulse lasers. It is estimated that this type of 
laser could be placed into use in the 1990's. 
  Russia believes that the United States has installed a high 
power high energy laser near the Kennedy Space Center. This 
could be used for anti-missile or anti-satellite missions. To 
achieve its needs, the United States is paying special attention 
to the development of airborne lasers. In the 1990's, the 
United States could begin limited deployment of these on the 
space shuttle for anti-satellite and anti-cruise missile 
missions and to protect airborne equipment. 
  The United States estimates that the Soviets may have 
conducted experiments on laser generators and their killing 
mechanism on their "SALUD-5" space station to develop 
space-based laser weapons. The Soviets may very possibly test 
space laser weapons in the early 1990's. These may have power 
rated in the megaWatts with ranges of as much as 100 to 1,000 
km. The former Soviet Union has on a number of occasions 
conducted laser target firing tests, shooting down missiles in 
flight. An U.S. laser expert believes that the best data on the 
damage to target meterials and mechanisms of lasers are found in 
Soviet articles. 
  Naturally, just developing a laser is not enough to make a 
laser weapon. A series of other technologies are also required, 
such as a small, effective, and strong power source, as well as 
modern microelectronics technology, digital signals processing, 
and digital communications technology. The Japanese have made 
marked progress in all of these aspects. For example, Japan 
claims that for its magnetic train, it has already developed a 
rocket driven magnetic flux kinematic generator that within a 
short time will be capable of developing 15 megaWatts of 
electricity. This type of small, light, mobile power source can 
supply lasers and other beam weapons, but the West does not yet 
have them. Only Japan does. Used in satellites, this 
technology could bring the realization of space-based laser 
weapons one step closer. 
  In sum, the space technology of some superpowers is capable 
of firing laser weapons from satellites at targets on the 
earth's surface or satellites orbiting in space. 
  2. Particle beam weapons on satellites to cause 
C[.sup]3[/]I radar surveillance and tracking systems to fail. 
  The United States also began developing particle beam 
weapons 
in the 1960's. In the early 1970's, it had further defined this 
research and development plan, and from reports in the past few 
years, it has invested as much as $3 billion in particle beam 
weapons research. It is currently estimated that the current 
amount far exceeds this figure. There are approximately 2,000 
or more top physicists working in 350 labs conducting research 
on particle beam weapons. 
  Beginning in 1967, the former Soviet Union has been 
conducting particle beam experiments at its nuclear test site 
at Semipalatinsk. According to reports, the Yefuliemofu [0673 
1133 0441 5459 1133] Institute in Leningrad spent two million 
rubles to construct the "ANGELA-5" [1344 0766 2139] reactor 
pile, which may be concerned with solving the problem of a power 
source for particle beam weapons. A large accelerator was 
constructed at Saluowa [5646 5012 3907] in Gorky for use in the 
development of particle beam weapons. Particle beam targeting 
tests have been conducted there. The electron beam bombardment 
of ICBM reentry vehicles and high energy explosion and solid 
matter experiments conducted in the laboratory at Leningrad 
University illustrate that new progress has been made in 
research on the distortion mechanism of particle beams. As of 
1988, the former Soviet Union had conducted eight electron beam 
transmission tests on its space vehicles. The former Soviet 
Union also joined with France in conducting electron beam 
radiation experiments from high altitude space survey rockets at 
altitudes of 100, 110, and 130 km. The beams were transmitted 
several dozen km. A small group of scientists led by professor 
Bafulofusiji [1572 1133 3157 1133 2448 1015] are currently 
intensifying their research on proton beam weapons. They 
recently tested a plasma beam generator, providing an even 
better material basis for particle beam weapons research. 
  Through this research and testing, the former Soviet Union 
has explored the feasibility of particle beam space weapons. It 
has also made marked advances in its research on particle 
sources and particle flows. According to estimates, it will 
still be quite some time before the former Soviet Union has 
particle beam weapons capable of destroying missile boosters or 
missile warheads, though it is working on this. However, it is 
possible that they will have tested in the 1990's a prototype 
particle beam weapon to be used to destroy electronic equipment 
on satellites. 
  3. Attacks on spaced-based systems by satellite high-energy 
microwave weapons. 
  Actually, the Japanese have been interested in the 
destructiveness of high energy microwave weapons for a long 
time. They began developing super high-energy microwave 
radiation tubes in the 1970's. Furthermore, they have already 
conducted thorough secret research on how to make weapons from 
high power microwaves and on the killing mechanism of microwave 
beams. The Japanese began developing microwave weapons earlier 
than the United States. Also, they have a large-scale research 
plan for high power microwave radiation tubes. According to 
reports, they are further along than the United States in 
research on strong microwave generation and transmission and on 
its interaction with matter. The microwave generator Japan 
tested in 1970 produced microwave pulse power in the 1000 
megaWatt range, with efficiency as high as 30 percent. In 1983, 
they tested one in the millimeter wave (30 to 300 kHz) frequency 
range, and the radiation tube generated pulse power of up to 100 
megaWatts. Such success in millimeter wave radiation tube 
research makes further progress possible in microwave weapons 
research. The Japanese government believes that the former 
Soviet Union has made similar progress in radio frequency 
technology, and that before very long, Russia may develop a 
prototype of a short-range microwave weapon. If the Japanese 
microwave weapon does not soon enter the practical use stage, 
they may fall behind the Russians. 
  The report on "Soviet Military Strength" published in 1984 
by 
the U.S. Department of Defense also held that Soviet "radio 
frequency technology is currently in a stage where it can begin 
developing close-range microwave weapons prototypes. The 
weapons systems of many Western nations provide little defense 
against such weapons. They could not only destroy critical 
electronic elements, but could also cause disorientation or even 
physical damage to humans." The United States also estimates 
that in the 1990's Russia could test land-based microwave 
weapons that could destroy satellites. If the United States 
does not quickly conduct practical tests of this type of weapon, 
it could lose superiority in the field. 
  We can see from an analysis of these situations that the 
United States, Japan, and Russia all have the capability to use 
microwave weapons against our sky-based systems for destructive 
experimental attacks that could be conducted secretly. 
<H5>  We Must Establish a Foothold in Earth Orbit </H5>
  We can see that the greatest weakness of a three dimensional 
defense lies outside the atmosphere in space and that the most 
effective method of using defensive missiles is for intercepts. 
Unfortunately, although China's space technology is second only 
to the United States and Russia, it does not have sufficient 
capabilities to establish a stable foothold in earth orbit. 
  Compared to the situation in the United States and Russia, 
the state of development in China is extremely critical and 
urgent. 
  Russia is a satellite superpower. The former Soviet Union 
conducted an average of 70 to 100 launches every year, with from 
one to several satellites per launch. They have launched eight 
satellites with a single rocket. They have more satellites than 
any other country, and it is estimated that as of 1982, of all 
of the the 2,915 space vehicles launched by the various nations 
of the world, 1,780, or 61 percent, belonged to the Soviet Union 
(33 percent belonged to the United States). Of these Soviet 
satellites, 73 percent were for military use. The Russians have 
more satellites than any other nation, but their satellites do 
not last as long as U.S. satellites. The Russians are using 
numbers against quality, and while continuing to maintain their 
numbers, are constantly improving their quality. For example, 
in the five years from 1979 to 1984, the life expectancy of 
Soviet photoreconnaisance satellites increased by 50 percent to 
the 30 to 50 day level. 
  The Russians are putting a great deal of emphasis on 
building 
up the reconnaissance and surveillance capabilities of space 
systems. They are also paying a great deal of attention to the 
combat applications of military satellites. Their 
photoreconnaissance satellites constantly keep a close watch on 
military conflicts throughout the world and related events. For 
example, after the United States invaded Grenada, the former 
Soviet Union immediately launched the Universe-1504 satellite, 
which passed over the airspace of that country every day 
performing reconnaissance and surveillance. During the armed 
conflict in Salvador, the Universe-1471 and Universe-1496 
satellites were assigned to fly over that country to conduct 
reconnaissance and surveillance missions. The former Soviet 
Union also launched a number of satellites for surveillance of 
the situations in Lebanon, Chad, the South Atlantic, and Iran. 
Although the former Soviet Union must also pay attention to the 
construction of communications satellites, it does not place the 
same reliance on communications satellites as the United States 
in its communications with allies in Europe, Africa, the Middle 
East, and other areas of the world. At least 70 percent of the 
overseas communications of the United States is carried by 
satellites. While the former Soviet Union was trying to develop 
satellite communications, its military leaders still possessed 
various surface communications channels directly to their units. 
Therefore, even if their communications were destroyed, their 
communications abilities would undergo minimal damage. 
  The former Soviet Union began conducting anti-satellite 
research in 1964. In the beginning they used maneuvering and 
docking techniques with the Universe satellites and manned 
spacecraft for preliminary anti-satellite design. In October 
1968, they began anti-satellite flight testing. By the end of 
1971, they had conducted seven tests. Through this testing, 
they had an initial understanding of the technology of 
approaching, recognizing, and destroying enemy satellites. To 
preveng a deleterious effect on concurrent summit talks that 
were focussed on signing a SALT treaty, the former Soviet Union 
halted its test launches of interceptor satellites after its 
launch of Universe-461 on 2 December 1971. 
  In the fourth year of the SALT agreement, 1976, which was 
also the year before the period of the agreement was over and a 
year in which the follow up SALT negotiations were stalled and 
making no progress, the former Soviet Union began once again to 
develop and test killer satellites. By the end of 1982, it had 
conducted 11 new anti-satellite tests. Through this testing, 
the Soviet Union, on the basis of its experience in its overall 
success and failure, constructed the only actual anti-satellite 
weapon system in the world at that time. 
  There are basically two types of anti-satellite satellites 
that have been tested by the former Soviet Union. One type is 
the same-orbit anti-satellite satellite. Between 1968 and 1971, 
the former Soviet Union used 55-9 rockets to launch an 
anti-satellite satellite equipped with radar detection 
equipment. This was one of the same-orbit type. This type of 
satellite is sent into the same orbit as the target satellite. 
On its second orbit, it begins to accelerate, and when it nears 
the target satellite, the command system sends an order and the 
warhead portion explodes, sending out large amounts of fragments 
and destroying the target. According to U.S. analysts, five of 
seven tests of this type of weapon were successful. Its 
designed purpose is to attack U.S. near-earth orbiting 
satellites such as the KH-11 "Big Bird" photoreconnaisance 
satellite. The second type of killer satellite is the 
transorbital zooming satellite. Because the first method of 
intercept requires the satellite to orbit twice to achieve 
intercept, it is a chasing attack method, which wastes time. 
The former Soviet Union also tried having the satellite killer 
use transorbital methods on its initial orbit to zoom up to the 
target orbit and achieve intercept on the first attempt. 
According to some evaluations, in the seven tests between 1976 
and 1977, three of seven such tests were successful. 
  These two types of intercept combat are single target 
methods. Tests of multiple launchings against multiple targets 
and single launches against multiple targets have not been 
conducted. Furthermore, the former Soviet Union's current 
anti-satellite satellites are primarily geared for low orbits. 
They do not yet have satellites capable of striking high orbit 
satellites. Because of this, they currently do not pose a 
threat to U.S. early warning and communications satellites in 
high orbit. 
  The Galosh anti-missile system also has an anti-satellite 
capability. After the anti-satellite missile has been launched 
toward the orbit of the enemy satellite, it pursues the 
satellite in this orbit. When it nears the satellite, the 
nuclear warhead automatically explodes, producing a shock wave, 
thermal radiation, and electromagnetic pulse, which can destroy 
the satellite. The aiming and tracking subsystem of this system 
is radar, which can detect a target more easily than the U.S. 
heat-seeking method. However, the Soviet anti-satellite 
missiles can be launched within one hour of an F-15 fighter 
taking off and reach their targets 10 minutes later. 
  The surface-to-air missiles that the former Soviet Union 
currently possesses, such as the SA-12, not only have a certain 
anti-missile capability, but they also have a limited 
capability to intercept satellites orbiting near the United 
States. In addition, the former Soviet Union may use the 
capabilities of electronic stations it is currently developing 
to jam or deceive enemy satellites, or it may use jamming and 
destruction of enemy satellite ground stations to achieve the 
equivalent result of destroying enemy satellites. The former 
Soviet Union has claimed a number of times that it can store 
"space mines" in a certain orbit, and upon command these space 
mines can be moved near enemy satellites and exploded to destroy 
them. 
  The basic methods to fill in these shortcomings in the Three 
Gorges Project defense system are to accelerate the development 
of space technology and improve space capabilities. Currently, 
we also need to adopt a number of other supplemental methods to 
deal with critical situations which may occur in the near future 
(around 10 to 20 years). 
  First we can adopt two of the simplest anti-satellite 
methods. 
  First is the "shotgun approach": 
  This would be using our satellites to scatter steel balls 
along the orbit of U.S. combat satellites in the direction 
opposite that of the satellite's rotation. If a 30 gram steel 
ball were travelling at 15 km per second, it would pierce 15 cm 
into the shell of the U.S. satellite's steel shell. This method 
would not cost much, but would be fairly effective. 
  Second is the smearing approach: 
  This would to be to spray dust at the reflective mirror of a 
U.S. or Japanese satellite, causing the mirror to be lopsided so 
that laser weapons could not be focussed. This measure is also 
fairly simple, but care must be taken to avoid attack by the 
enemy satellite during approach. 
  Secondarily, we could use two methods which are not cheap 
but 
are most effective -- those of space-based interceptors. 
  First, the "small bomblet" program: 
  These are a type of smart bomb only weighing only 1.5 to 2.5 
kg. Each of these "small bomblets" could cost $100,000 
(including the cost to put them into orbit). To increase the 
intercept rate, the number of bomblets would have to be 100 
times the number enemy missiles, which would mean one million 
bomblets, for a total cost of $10 billion. 
  Second, "small honeybee method": 
  This would be deploying 10,000 to 12,000 inexpensive light 
intercept missiles in orbit. Signals would be sent to them by 
three geosynchronous communications satellites. Whenever any of 
these destructive implements is positioned over our own 
territory, the communications satellite would automatically stop 
sending a signal, and at this time the destructive implement 
would automatically enter a critical state. It could 
independently launch at incoming missiles. This type of light 
destructive implement could be launched into orbit with the Shen 
IV carrier rocket, launching 100 at a time. Every destructive 
implement would cost $1 million. If these were only to protect 
against accidental launches, deploying 100 in orbit would be 
enough. 
  In sum, if the Chinese are bold enough to construct the 
Three 
Gorges dam, they have the capability to protect the security of 
the dam. 
<H5>  VII: CROSSING THE YALU ONCE MORE </H5>
  Of all the many hot spots around China, the Korean peninsula 
cannot be regarded as anything but the hottest of them all. 
Because of the geopolitical relationship, China is forced to 
expend a great deal of effort to try to stabilize the situation 
there to prevent the fires of war from burning to its own back 
door. Without doubt the establishment of diplomatic relations 
between China and South Korea was a major step by China to 
achieve strategic stability. Although it angered North Korea, 
from the consideration of long-term interests, the advantages 
outweighed the disadvantages. Experienced observers are all 
able to see that South Korea does represent a threat to China. 
Should South Korea invade the North, the Chinese would still 
support North Korea. This is something that could very possibly 
happen. 
<H5>  The South Korean "G7 Project" </H5>
  The level of science and technology in South Korea is only 
equivalent to 9.8 percent that of the United States and 12 
percent of that of Japan. It ranks 38th in the world in basic 
sciences. Looking at the drastically changing situation, if 
South Korea does not lay a scientific and technical foundation 
toward becoming a developed country in the next year or two, and 
if it fails to ensure its own independent technology within the 
next five or six years, then in the 21st century it will be 
looked down upon as being subservient to developed nations. To 
meet these requirements, the South Koreans have proposed the 
goal of becoming a developed nation by the year 2000 -- the "G7 
Project." 
  The goal of the G7 Project is to raise South Korea's science 
and technology level to the advanced levels of the seven western 
nations by the 21st century. This project has 14 primary 
technological targets including super-integrated circuit 
transistors, wide area communications network technology, 
electric cars, artificial intelligence computers, sensing 
technology, new medicines and agricultural chemicals, leading 
edge production equipment, new energy sources, biological 
engineering, new materials, high-definition televisions, new 
generation reactor piles, new generation transport equipment and 
parts, and environmental protection. This project will formally 
begin in May of this year and will last for 10 years. This 
project will cost more than 4.75 trillion wan. 
  To accomplish the goals of this project, the South Koreans 
have adopted a policy of "four domestic lines and four foreign 
circles." 
  The "four domestic lines" are: l) Increase the size of the 
teaching staffs at scientific and technical colleges and 
universities and set up branch colleges and universities; 2) 
Revise college and university systems, increasing the numbers of 
students recruited into scientific and technical colleges and 
universities; 3) Allow some university students to study for 
their doctorates to develop talent as early as possible; and 4) 
Establish additional scientific and technical high schools 
(there are currently 10). All of these are interconnected, and 
by the 21st century, South Korea should become an educated 
society with 150,000 scientists, of which 10 percent are to be 
world class. 
  The four foreign circles are to strengthen scientific and 
technical foreign relations, recruiting 2,000 scientists to come 
to Korea to work, and to cooperate in science and technology 
with foreign nations. 
  In the U.S. circle, there is drafting a "Patents and Secrets 
Protection Agreement," establishing a "U.S.-Korean Scientific 
and Technical Consortium," and forging a common "Strategic 
Defense Plan" with the United States. Only by combining U.S. 
science and technology with Korean production technology will 
they be able to put a stop to Japan's "technology monopoly." 
  In the Japanese circle, on the basis of a science and 
technology cooperation agreement signed in 1988, South Korea and 
Japan will jointly select and conduct common research projects, 
and they will continue to prod Japan to transfer high technology. 
  In the West European circle, South Korea hopes to enhance 
common research in projects selected through the Council of 
Defense Ministers and the Committee on Scientific and 
Technological Cooperation of the major nations in West Europe 
--England, France, Germany, and Italy. 
  In the former Soviet Union circle, on the basis of a 
scientific and technical agreement signed with the former Soviet 
Union, it is stipulated that in the next five years, South Korea 
will conduct joint research with the former Soviets on 48 
leading-edge technology projects. It will also invite between 
200 and 400 ranking Soviet scientists to take part in the "G7 
Project," and it will invite 20 Soviet scientists to come to 
South Korean universities and research components to lecture. 
After the dismemberment of the Soviet Union, the Russian 
Federation has promised to continue to honor this agreement for 
scientific cooperation. 
  The "G7 Project" is like an atomic explosion on the Korean 
Peninsula. 
  A "cooperation is survival, separatism is death" campaign 
for 
technological cooperation has appeared in Korea. 
  The Korean Gold Star and Sam Sung corporations have decided 
to exchange the 3,500 patents they possess unconditionally and 
without compensation. They will keep no secrets from each other 
and will work together to deal with pressures from foreign 
enterprises. 
  This year, the three major Korean shipbuilding companies, 
the 
Modern Heavy Industries Company, the Dayu [1129 1342] 
Shipbuilding Company, and Sam Song Heavy Industries abandoned 
their estrangement and competitive struggles and joined forces 
in a bid for five supertankers for the Saudi Arabian National 
Shipping Company, in competition against Japanese and European 
Shipbuilders. 
  The United States and Japan have continued to provide 
technology for almost 4,000 items for South Korea. They worked 
together in the development of almost 1,000 production 
technologies to increase international competition. 
  China did not become part of South Korea's technology 
circles, but on 24 August it announced the establishment of 
diplomatic relations with South Korea. There are two 
explanations in diplomatic circles concerning the establishment 
of diplomatic relations between China and South Korea. 
  One is that due to the high cost of labor at home, the South 
Koreans were attracted by cheap labor in China. South Korean 
exports to Europe, the United States, and Japan are not doing 
well, and China is a market with a tremendous future. 
  The second explanation is that the establishment of 
diplomatic relations between China and South Korea changes the 
strategic picture in Asia. Asia will become a new economic 
block with China as the hub. This economic block, which is 
connected to the Korean Peninsula, Hong Kong, and Taiwan, will 
serve to constrain Japan to a certain degree. Japan's DAILY 
NEWS also believes that "because of the establishment of 
diplomatic relations between South Korea and China, the next 
strategic structure in East Asia has already been formed, and it 
is a triangle formed with China, Japan, and Korea at the 
corners. This new triangular structure, with the addition of 
the Southeast Asian nations, which have made amazing progress, 
will form a four-sided structure, becoming the basic layout of 
Asia as it races toward the 21st century." 
<H5>  North Korea's "Century Paradise" Plan </H5>
  At the same time South Korea was announcing the development 
of the "G7" project, the North Koreans proposed the 
establishment of a Korean type of socialist century paradise, 
calling it the "Century Paradise" plan. 
  Generalized in the simplest terms, the specific content of 
this Century Paradise plan is to "realize the dream of all 
Koreans eating rice, having meat in their soup, having good 
clothes and living in good houses." 
  To achieve this plan, the assembly made three separate 
domestic policy decisions. The first was to strengthen 
socialist propaganda. The second was to make changes in state 
leadership, and the third was to revise the party charter. 
  Concerning the question of socialism, in the words of the 
assembly communique, "a series of events currently occurring on 
the world stage are eddies along the journey of mankind toward 
the new democratic order. Therefore, we should have an 
optimistic view of the current world situation. Even if others 
should give us boundless treasures, we would not abandon 
socialism and chose another path. Socialism is more dear to us 
than life." 
  The communique also stated that "Korean Socialism is the 
responsibility of the people themselves, according to their 
actual situations, to guide their own strengths establish the 
most outstanding socialism. Korean Socialism does not mimic any 
other extant form or experience and does not depend on the 
strength of others. Rather, it will solve new problems of 
theory and practice after the establishment of the socialist 
order according to its own methods. It is an independent 
socialism." 
  The communique further stated that "improving the food, 
clothing, and lodging of the people is the plan for socialist 
and Communist construction which will have to be accomplished 
under conditions of ever-intensifying plotting by the enemy and 
even more complex situations. Carrying out this plan will 
better display the superiority of the Korean type of socialism 
where all are happy and live as equals, and it will realize the 
dream of the century of all Koreans being able to "eat rice, 
have meat in their soup, wear good clothes, and have good homes." 
  The lifestyle of the Korean style of Socialism is all of the 
people of the country closely united around the party and the 
leaders to form a large revolutionary family, all living 
together a life of collectivism. All people must be highly 
organized and perform in an orderly manner, all as one, living 
and working in accordance with the revolutionary requirements. 
They must oppose ease and comfort, laxness, luxury, and 
splittism. From the clothes they wear to the hats they wear, 
they must conform to the requirements of the revolutionary era. 
They must pay attention to discipline, have a sense of 
propriety, and be noble-minded yet simple. 
  They have conducted large-scale changes in administrative 
arrangements of party and government leaders. The premier and 
vice-premiers have been changed, and an old premier who had left 
office before his term was completed was asked to serve again. 
They also have placed some persons with a real understanding of 
economics into important positions. 
  They have carried out some fairly major changes in the Party 
Charter. For example, they have removed the word "Marxist," 
giving prominence to overall ideology. They have given 
"National Defense" a chapter of its own and have written into 
the Charter that "the people are to be armed, all forces are to 
have cadres, and the armed forces are to be modernized." 
  We can see from this that this is a major move by North 
Korea 
directed at South Korea. 
  To achieve this paradise of the century, North Korea has 
become bold and asked the outside world for economic 
cooperation. They are cooperating with the United Nations 
Development Planning Office and are jointly establishing their 
own first international bank with the Ruby Group in Hong Kong. 
It is especially worth noting that they even before China had 
announced the special economic zone in Jilin's Hunchun area, 
they established a free economic trade zone in the Mengjin and 
Xianfeng areas in the north with an area of 621 square km. They 
also announced that Mengjin, Xianfeng, and Qingjin were free 
trade ports and that they hoped to negotiate with China 
questions concerning the development of the Tumen River delta. 
  In December 1991, the premiers of North and South Korea 
signed the "North and South Korea Agreement of Understanding, 
Mutual Nonaggression, and Trade" for joint development of 
resources, peoples' development, exchange of materials and 
investment cooperation. They established joint investment 
factories. They hoped that the director of the World Peace 
League would go to the North and invest there. 
  The socialist and capitalist camps on the Korean Peninsula 
have begun a competition and struggle not involving guns. 
<H5>  Cracks in the Formation </H5>
  In the international competition in science and technology, 
there are two opposing blocs. The first bloc is formed 
primarily of the United States, Japan, and Western Europe. This 
bloc has an obvious superiority in the fields of science and 
technology. The "second bloc" is composed of a number of major 
third world nations such as the "Four Dragons": Asia, China, 
India, and Brazil. They have invested large amounts of manpower 
and material into science and technology to improve their level 
of science and technology as well as overall national strength, 
and they have achieved startling accomplishments. The former 
Soviet Union has a good scientific research foundation and lots 
of talent, but due to many years of political unrest and its 
dissolution, there has been an outflowing of its talent. It has 
had a stagnant economy, and its competitiveness in science and 
technology has been seriously weakened. It is currently in the 
midst of changes and adjustments. 
  Because of this, the scientific and technical struggle going 
on in the Korean Peninsula is more precisely a battle between 
two major blocs than a competition between two major camps. 
  However, these blocs are not completely solid, and in the 
south of the peninsula, some cracks have occurred in the first 
bloc. 
  The United States and Japan are currently economic 
superpowers. However, because the Japanese do not have the role 
of "policeman to the world," as the United States does, for 
several decades they have concentrated on economic development. 
In less than 10 years, the Japanese economy has grown to a 
point where it constitutes a threat to the economy of the United 
States. 
  According to statistics, in 1951 Japan's gross national 
product was one-twentieth that of the United States, and in 1978 
Japan's nominal gross national product was $971.7 billion and 
that of the United States was $2.25 trillion. In the world's 
nominal gross product for 1988, the United States represented 
24.4 percent with $4.88 trillion, and Japan represented 14.3 
percent with $2.86 trillion. The Japanese nominal gross 
national product was 59 percent of that of the United States. 
Through the struggle for South Korea's G7 project, in less than 
10 years, its gross national product will basically approach 
that of the United States. In early 1989, the average per 
capita income in Japan was more than $23,000, about $5,000 more 
than that of the United States. Japan's foreign reserves were 
$89.26 billion in May of 1989, which was 3.4 times those of the 
United States. Japanese investment was $60.4 billion in 1985, 
and by 1989 its overseas investment was $250 billion. 
Furthermore, it has become the world's largest creditor nation. 
The speed with which the Japanese economy grew and the size of 
the assault has startled and frightened the United States. 
  Therefore, a struggle over the first place in the world 
economy has developed within the United States and Japan bloc. 
Japan is no longer content with the space in its small island 
nation of only three million plus square kilometers. The United 
States similarly cannot allow a small island nation to outdo it. 
  The earliest struggle is an economic war. The fuse that 
ignites the war is the sale of Japanese automobiles in the 
United States. Not only have the Japanese cars taken over the 
U.S. market, but under the Japanese automobile assault, a number 
of U.S. automobile plants have folded. Even the largest, 
General Motors, has gone into bankruptcy, with 150,000 people 
losing their jobs. Facing this situation, the U.S. Senate has 
proposed to the president a bill to boycott Japanese goods, 
prohibiting the import of Japanese automobiles to slow down the 
Japanese economy. 
  The night before the U.S. President was to sign this bill, 
the Prime Minister of Japan flew to the United States and 
visited the White House, where he engaged in a number of secret 
negotiations with the president. The content of these talks 
were never made public. However, after the talks, the United 
States never announced the Senate's bill, and the Japanese 
exported no more cars to the United States. They join together 
and combine to do even greater business. 
<H5>  Imagine: A Bloody "Peaceful Korean Reunification" </H5>
  The fifth session of the North and South Korean talks on 
"peaceful reunification" are currently being conducted in 
Pyongyang. In the previous sessions of talks, the two sides 
reached a unanimous agreement on their hopes and determination 
for peaceful reunification that was publicly announced to the 
world. However, there still exist great differences over the 
post- reunification name of the country, political personnel 
arrangements, military manning, and the position of the Korean 
Workers Party. 
  The North Koreans want to use the name "Korean Peoples' 
Republic," while the South Koreans want to use the name of 
"Korea." As for political personnel arrangements and military 
manning, the North Koreans demand equal representation, while 
the South Koreans demand a ratio based on economic strength. 
Both sides agree that the capital should be decided through a 
vote by the people. As for the position of the Korean Workers 
Party, both sides agree that this party should be removed from 
power and that North and South Korean parties should be equals. 
However, as for how Communist Party members should be handled, 
the North Koreans demand that the party cadres all be placed 
into leading government components at various levels, while the 
South Koreans resolutely oppose this. 
  Because the North Korean "Socialist Paradise" plan has 
continued to proceed very slowly and the South Korean "G7" 
project has seen some preliminary results, the North Koreans 
have been placed at a disadvantage in the talks. 
  While people are still guessing at the outcome of the fifth 
round of talks, good news comes out of Pyongyang concerning 
"peaceful reunification." Next, the South Korean military, 
including planes and tanks, march in a very orderly manner into 
North Korea, without a shot fired at the border. The Peoples 
Army commanders at the front lines have received an order signed 
by their leader, and at the same time they have heard the good 
news broadcast from Pyongyang Radio on "peaceful reunification" 
and welcoming the South Korean compatriots' return to the 
motherland. 
  However, shortly after crossing the border, the South Korean 
units very quickly detain the commanders of front-line units at 
the regimental level and above. 
  Very quickly, the units receive the internal news that 
leaders and top governmental personnel have been detained. 
  Pyongyang finally transmits the sound of rifle and artillery 
fire. 
  Then, a large number of units engage in armed fighting with 
the South Korean units. However, because the front-line defense 
positions have been broken through and the South Korean military 
is not using the same weapons it used 40 years ago, unable to 
hold their ground, the defenders take to their heels. 
  The so-called "peaceful reunification" is nothing more than 
a 
military coup. It is a plot cooked up by the United States and 
Japan for the South Koreans to swallow the armed forces of North 
Korea. They take advantage of the opportunity afforded by the 
negotiations for a group of agents composed of South Koreans and 
Americans to capture by surprise high-ranking North Korean 
generals and government officials and force them to sign orders 
for the front- line units. 
  When the Peoples' Army becomes aware of what has happened, 
it 
conducts a brave armed struggle against the invading South 
Korean forces. 
  The world's major newspapers and radio and television 
stations all announce the same news: Civil war has broken out in 
Korea. 
  The United States and Japan use this opportunity to once 
more 
manipulate the United Nations into deciding to send U.N. "World 
Peacekeeping Forces" to Korea. The so-called U.N. Peacekeeping 
Forces are actually composed of military units of the United 
States and Japan. The United States directly uses three 
mechanized infantry divisions, one motorized infantry division, 
one armored division, and one airborne division, totalling 
104,000 men. In addition there are the 40,000 men in military 
units stationed in South Korea and the 65,000 men in units 
stationed in Japan, for a grand total of 210,000 men. At the 
same time, the Seventh Fleet is sent from the Western to the 
Eastern Pacific. Japan sends in two motorized infantry 
divisions, the Seventh Tank Division, one naval self-defense 
force fleet, and one air army, totalling 100,000 men. 
  These joint forces of 300,000 men together with the 600,000 
men in the South Korean army come pressing into North Korea. 
Their final objective is to take North Korea by military force 
and then expand to the northern border with China. This help 
toward "Korean Unification" is just the first step in the U.S. 
and Japanese plan for world hegemony. 
  The total size of the North Korean army was originally 
840,000 men. However, in the past several years, to concentrate 
even more finances on the "Century Paradise," there have been 
two reductions in force, totalling 340,000 men and leaving only 
500,000 men. Furthermore, the 200,000 man front-line units have 
basically lost their combat effectiveness. Thus, the 
300,000-man people's army in the interior is no match for the 
united forces of the United States, Japan, and South Korea. 
  In less than one month, the North Korean units retreat 
toward 
the border with China, and some units even cross over into China. 
  It goes without saying that, regarding the civilians, anyone 
who is a member of the Korean Workers' Party and cadres at all 
levels have basically all retreated with the military units to 
the Tonghua Special District and the Yanji Korean Autonomous 
Prefecture in Jilin Province in China. 
<H5>  Old Scores Are Not Yet Settled: Crossing the Yalu Again </H5>
  The North Korean Peoples' Army and government officials from 
various levels that have retreated to the north form a 
provisional government of North Korea, representing the 
government in unified leadership over the Peoples' Army. 
  The provisional government makes an urgent and emergency 
request for armed support from the People's Republic of China. 
  The Chinese government is placed in a dilemna because of 
this. It could send troops, but China is currently 
concentrating its forces for economic development, and it has 
established diplomatic relations with South Korea. Because of 
the trade agreements, it is trying to relax tensions with the 
United States and Japan. It could not send troops, but North 
Korea is an old friend and a close neighbor. Back in the 1950's 
when the People's Republic of China had just been founded and 
was very poor, it helped North Korea defeat U.S. imperialism at 
the cost of hundreds of thousands of men. Now that China is 
rich, it cannot forget its old friends. In other words, with 
almost two million North Koreans pouring into China, the only 
reasonable thing to do would be to help them get back home. 
  There would be no alternative but to resolutely send troops 
and help Korea resist the United States once again. There are 
four reasons for this. First, China and North Korea are old 
friends who rely on each other. Second, the objective of the 
United States and Japan in jointly invading North Korea is not 
only to take over the Korean Peninsula but also is world 
hegemony. If we were to sit and watch, the next step would be 
even more difficult to deal with. Third, whether or not the 
United States crossed over, several hundred North Korean 
refugees swarming across the Tumen River would have a tremendous 
affect on economic development in the area. At a time when 
China had just entered into a critical period of cooperative 
development with Taiwan, such a loss could possibly be even 
greater than that of supporting the Koreans. 
  The final reason is that there is an unsettled debt from the 
1950's. 
  That is the debt of the Fifth Campaign to Resist the United 
States and Aid Korea of the 1950's. 
  After the Volunteer Army entered Korea, beginning on 25 
October 1950, it conducted counterattacks and strategic 
counterassaults against the "United Nations Forces" led by the 
United States and against the South Korean forces. In seven and 
one-half months, it conducted five campaigns, pushing the U.S. 
forces from the Yalu to the 38th parallel and smashing the 
assault launched by the "United Nations Forces" and South Korean 
forces against the Democratic Peoples' Republic of Korea, 
winning a tremendous victory in the first stage of the Campaign 
to Resist the United States and Aid Korea. 
  The first campaign pushed the U.S. forces south of the 
Ch'ongch'on-gang. 
On 19 October 1950, after MacArthur led the U.S. forces to take 
Pyongyang, they became swollen with arrogance, and 130,000 men 
advanced up the eastern and western routes toward the northern 
border of Korea. 
  The original plan and deployment for the Volunteer Army to 
enter Korea to fight was to first, when the enemy had advanced 
to Tokch'on and Yongwan, organize an east-west line of defense. 
In the early period it would only fight a defensive campaign to 
stabilize the situation. It would join forces with the Peoples' 
Army for a counterattack after being supplied with new weapons 
and equipment. Because the U.S. advance was very quick, they 
occupied areas the Volunteer Army had planned to occupy. 
Therefore, the original defensive deployment plan could not be 
carried out. On 21 October, Peng Dehuai met with Kim Il-song in 
a cave in the north and studied the situation, discussing combat 
questions. 
  The Volunteer Army conducted its first campaign along two 
lines in the east and west, beginning on 25 October and ending 
on 06 November. This campaign delivered a devastating assault 
on the South Korean 6th Division, the 1st Division 12th 
Battalion, and the U.S. 1st Cavalry 8th Battalion. It was also 
a damaging blow to other U.S. and South Korean forces, killing 
more than 15,000 men and pushing them back to the south of the 
Ch'ongch'on-gang and completely destroying MacArthur's plan to 
have control of all of Korea before Thanksgiving. The Volunteer 
Army won an early victory. 
  The second campaign pushed the U.S. forces to the 38th 
parallel. 
  After the first campaign, MacArthur felt that there were not 
very many Chinese in the fighting and that it was merely a 
symbolic force. He still continued to conduct his plan to "wipe 
out all resisting forces in North Korea." MacArthur actively 
redeployed, getting reinforcements from South Korea and Japan, 
preparing to launch a new attack, and attempting to wipe out the 
Chinese Volunteer Army and the North Korean Peoples' Army. Peng 
Dehuai, in accordance with the strategic mission given to him by 
Mao Zedong, held a meeting of the Military Commission of the 
Chinese Communist Volunteers on 13 November. At the meeting a 
plan was decided upon that would attempt to lure the enemy deep 
into the defensive area and to concentrate a superior force to 
wipe out the enemy. The eastern front would lure the enemy to 
the area of Changjinho while the western front would lure the 
enemy north of Ch'ongch'on-gang and north of a line from Kujang 
to Yongwon, first wiping out the forces on the flanks and then 
expanding the combat successes. 
  The Volunteer Army 38th Army was deployed to "lure in and 
beat out," and on the evening of 25 November, it began advancing 
on two fronts toward the South Korean Army 7th Division. 
  There was another counterattack along the eastern front, and 
by the first 10 days of December, the U.S. 8th Army had been 
beaten back by the heavy assaults of the Volunteer Army from 
north of the Ch'ongch'on-gang to south of the 38th parallel. 
From 12 to 24 December, all of the invading forces on the 
eastern and western fronts had been driven out of the territory 
north of the 38th parallel. The attack MacArthur launched to 
bring the fighting in Korea to an end by Christmas not only was 
unable to hold North Korea but was driven back 260 kilometers. 
MacArthur had underestimated the combat capability of the 
Chinese Volunteer Army and had overestimated his own forces. He 
split up his forces in a reckless advance and lost his cool. 
This is why he lost. 
  The third campaign was to drive the U.S. forces south of 
Seoul. 
  Following the second campaign, the United States massed 11 
divisions and three brigades from five armies. It set up layer 
after layer of defenses at the 38th parallel to stop the 
Volunteer Army and the Peoples' Army from continuing to advance 
southward and to gain a chance to rest and prepare a new 
assault. The first defense line of the U.S. deployment was west 
of the southern bank of the Imjin-gang southwest of Munsan, 
stretching to the 38th parallel and then along the 38th parallel 
to the East China Sea. They primarily used defense works 
already there that were held by the South Korean army. The 
second line of defense extended west from Koyang northwest of 
Seoul through Uijongbu, Kap'yong, and Ch'unch'on to the banks of 
the East China Sea and was manned by U.S. and British forces. 
There were no in-depth second line mobile defenses. 
  The Volunteer Army proposed a stable advance plan, deciding 
to seek opportunities north and east of Seoul to wipe out the 
enemy and deal him a new blow, thus worsening his sense of 
defeat. They primarily attacked the front- line defenses and 
the South Koreans, isolating the U.S. and British forces in the 
Seoul area. 
  The third campaign of the Volunteer Army was the first 
large-scale attack against enemy prepared defenses since 
entering Korea. It was conducted in ice and snow, with supply 
difficulties and with hurried preparations. After seven days 
and nights of constant assault, the Volunteer Army had advanced 
80 to 100 km and killed more than 19,000 enemy troops. 
  The fourth campaign was to resist the U.S. counterassault. 
  After the third campaign, the Volunteer Army's five 
divisions 
and one detachment of Peoples' Army forces set up defenses from 
Suwon to Hoengsong and north of P'yongch'ang to provide cover 
for the main force in the areas of Koyang, Uijongbu, Kap'yong, 
Yonch'on, Kimhwa, and Kumsong. On 15 January, to salvage the 
situation, Ridgeway took advantage of a moment when the 
Volunteer Army was exhausted, having difficulty with supplies, 
and restructuring. He launched a probing attack along the 
western front with a portion of his forces. At the same time, he 
quickly brought veterans from the United States to Korea in 
preparation for a counterattack, attempting to push the 
Volunteer Army back across the 38th parallel and re-take Seoul. 
By fierce resistance on the western front and counterattacks 
from the eastern front, the Volunteer Army held back the U.S. 
assault. 
  This campaign was fought while the Volunteer Army had not 
yet 
reorganized or been resupplied but was instead rushed into a 
defensive position. However, all of the officers and men 
manifested the outstanding spirit of bravery and perseverance, 
fearing neither sacrifice nor fatigue, and fought continuously. 
They fought back the fierce U.S. assault. The Volunteer Army 
actively held its defenses and conducted counterattacks and 
guerrilla defense, killing large numbers of U.S. and South 
Korean soldiers. They also made a planned shift to the north, 
and the entire campaign, from 27 January when the Volunteer Army 
switched over to defensive fighting until 21 April, lasted for 
85 days. A total of 78,000 men were killed, wounded, or 
captured, and the average daily advance was less than 1.5 
kilometers, thus winning time and providing cover for the combat 
reserve 19th Corps and 3rd Corps to advance and assemble and 
creating advantageous conditions for the next campaign. 
  The fifth campaign forced the U.S. forces to switch over to 
a 
strategic defense. 
  On 11 April 1951, President Truman ordered MacArther removed 
from his position as commander of the U.N. forces and replaced 
him with Ridgeway. He also named James Van Fleet commander of 
the 8th Army. During early and mid-April, after the U.S. forces 
had advanced to the 38th parallel, because of heavy casualties 
and extreme fatigue, they switched over to a defensive posture 
when they discovered that the Volunteer Army strategic reserves 
had arrived at the front. 
  To allow the Volunteer Army to reorganize, the Central 
Military Commission decided to adopt a policy of rotating 
combat. They selected groups of units from inside China to go 
to Korea and ordered the 19th Corp and 3rd Corp into Korea 
immediately. In the middle of April, at the orders of the 
Central Military Commission, Peng Dehuai determined that the 
primary mission of the fifth campaign targeting the defensive 
deployment of U.S. forces was to be an all-out assault on enemy 
forces in the area west of the Pukhan-gang and north of Seoul. 
The assembled forces along the western front conducted the 
major assault, cut the enemy forces in two, and rounded the two 
flanks to encircle and wipe out the enemy. 
  The assault on the west flank pressed toward Seoul. 
  The counterattack on the eastern front dealt a heavy blow to 
the South Korean forces. 
  By 21 April, the Volunteer Army had fought continuously for 
a 
number of days and had used up all of its rations and 
ammunition. Furthermore, the rainy season was approaching, and 
several rivers behind them would make combat and the transport 
of supplies difficult. Therefore, they stopped their assault 
and on the 23rd began to move to the north. At the same time 
they requested that the Central Military Commission approve this 
action. Mao Zedong cabled a reply to Peng Dehuai approving the 
retreat and reorganization. He also instructed that, regarding 
where they should lay up, as long as the enemy was ready to 
attack, the further to the north the better, provided they did 
not cross the line between P'yongch'ang and Yonch'on. 
  After the Volunteer Army and the Peoples' Army began 
retreating to the north, the U.S. forces immediately gave chase 
with a "special task force" of 13 divisions from four armies, 
sending motorized infantry, artillery, and tanks along the 
highways to pursue our retreating forces. The Volunteer Army 
was unprepared for this rapid pursuit by the enemy and was 
unable to give itself effective cover when switching over to 
defensive combat. Also, due to excessive casualties, unit 
actions were limited, and some units were caught in a passive 
situation while switching over to defense. On the 24th, the 
180th Division of the 62nd Army received orders from the Corps 
to provide cover for the transport north of the casualties 
southwest of Ch'unch'on. They became encircled by enemy 
artillery and were wrapped up. 
  This is an old grudge of the 180th Division of the 62nd 
Army. 
Although the fifth campaign was very successful overall, and 
despite the thorough victory of the Campaign to Resist the 
United States and Aid Korea, this "division's grudge" is a black 
mark in the history. 
<H5>  What Will Replace Small Caliber Infantry Rifles? </H5>
  During the Korean War in the 1950s, small caliber infantry 
rifles were used to counter the enemy's air power and artillery. 
What weapons will be used in the next Korean War? 
  During the last Korean War, the fighting at Kamryong had to 
be the cruelest and fiercest of the war. From 14 October 
through 25 November 1954, through 43 days and nights of fierce 
fighting and over an area of 3.7 square kilometers occupied by 
two companies, the U.S. military poured in over 1.9 million 
artillery shells and 5,000 bombs, destroying fortifications on 
two mountain tops and lowering those peaks by two meters. This 
was the fiercest and most unusual battle fought in a small area 
in the history of warfare. However, during this battle, the 
weapons used by the two sides were, apart from the U.S. 
military's aircraft, artillery pieces, and incendiary shells, 
the Volunteer Army's machine guns, infantry rifles, bangalores, 
and hand grenades. 
  However, in the next war, the weapons of the previous war 
will not be in evidence. 
  When the time comes, U.S. E-3 Watchtower early warning 
aircraft, F-117, F-15, and F-16 fighters, French Mirage 2000 
fighters, EA-6B electronic warfare aircraft, and Nighthawk 
F-117A stealth aircraft will be airborne. There will also be 
carpet-bombing B-52 bombers and B-2 "stealth" bombers, which are 
superior to the B-52. These aircraft will not be dropping 
conventional bombs filled with TNT. They will be carrying 
nuclear-tipped bombs, air-to-air missiles, and air-to-surface 
missiles. For example, the YF-22 fighter can engage in aerial 
refueling, and in a 10-hour period it can complete six sorties. 
It only requires an 18-minute interval between take-offs for 
refueling and rearming, and its cruising speed is between 1.4 
and 1.8 mach. To reduce its radar profile, the YF-23 [as 
published] does not have weapons racks on its underside -- all 
of its weapons are carried within the aircraft. It carries 
advanced radar-guided intermediate-range air-to-air missiles, 
Sidewinder infrared-guided air-to-air missiles, and a 20-mm 
cannon. The aircraft uses stealth technology and can perform 
360 degree rolls, 45 degree angled flight, and vertical climbs. 
China and North Korea will oppose this aircraft with the F-8, 
F-10, and Su-27 fighters, as well as A-5 attack aircraft. 
  On the ground, satchel charges will not be used to destroy 
fortifications. U.S., Japanese, and South Korean M-1A1 and 
M-1A2 advanced tanks will contend with Chinese T-80s and T-85s. 
Blackhawk helicopters, anti-tank missiles, and anti-tank rocket 
launchers will also be involved in these tank battles. These 
nemeses of the tank will make armored combat even more difficult. 
  The U.S. and Japanese infantry will use Apache and Comanche 
helicopters against our infantry and will be equipped with 
highly accurate individual weapons that fire at rates of 1,000 
rounds per minute. They will be equipped with one-man missiles 
to use against tanks and aircraft. They can mount helicopters 
at any time under any conditions and reach any designated point. 
They can also conduct the most effective mobile combat against 
enemy tanks, aircraft and ground units while in motion. 
  In the next war in Korea, the satellites of both sides may 
join in. 
  The fighting at sea will be even more complex. The Seventh 
Fleet, the Japanese 88th fleet, and China's special task force 
will be the primary forces in this naval battle. The Seventh 
Fleet possesses the most advanced carriers and the most advanced 
ship-borne aircraft. Although the 88th Fleet does not have an 
aircraft carrier, its fleet coordinated combat capabilities are 
first in the world. Although China's task force is young, 
because it will include advanced missile escorts, a submarine 
fleet, and outstanding officers and men, as well as a large 
number of aircraft flying out of the Jiaodong Peninsula that can 
effectively coordinate in combat with the fleet, it is hard to 
say what the outcome would be. 
<H5>  Would It Be Better To Cross the River or the Sea? </H5>
  This question has been raised: If Chinese forces went to 
Korea again, would they take the same route as before? 
  Chinese military experts believe that if in the next war in 
Korea a major force of 400,000 U.N. troops and 400,000 South 
Korea troops press toward the Korean-Chinese border, it would be 
best to send troops across the sea and not across the Yalu. 
  Why do they say this? 
  There are advantages and disadvantages to crossing the 
river. 
The advantage is that we could rely on China's substantial rear 
support. 
  That is to say, if we do not cross the river from north to 
south, then we would lose the advantage of being able to rely on 
the large rear supplies of the Chinese forces. 
  However, the disadvantages of crossing the river are even 
more obvious. If we try to launch a push across the board, we 
could not do it, and if we tried to penetrate with a large 
force, we would not be able to penetrate. If we used small 
units, then even if they did penetrate, they would not be able 
to gain a foothold. 
  If we sent troops across the sea, we could avoid the enemy's 
strengths and attack his weaknesses, stabbing a dagger directly 
into the enemy's heart. Combining with the units on the 
northern front, we could form a pincer attack, cutting off and 
encircling the enemy, fighting a war of annihilation. 
  If we are to cut the Korean peninsula in two, where would we 
cut it? There are two different possible plans. 
  The first is to begin at the 38th parallel. The advantage of 
beginning here is that after the landing, it would be possible 
to take advantage of the reinforced existing defensive 
fortifications along the South Korean border front to 
effectively solidify a landing position and prevent an attack by 
the enemy from the south. This would accomplish the objective 
of isolating and surrounding the enemy. However, the 
disadvantage of beginning here is that the landing battle would 
be very fierce, and after the landing the rear supply lines 
would be too far away. Therefore, we would be taking on too 
much to handle and would be wrapped up by the enemy. 
  The second place to land is along a line from Sinanju to 
Namp'o. The disadvantage of this plan is that after the 
landing, there would be no existing fortifications to use, and 
we would have to rely completely on the landing units themselves 
to gain a foothold. However, the advantage of this plan is that 
it is nearer to the Chinese mainland. At the same time, the 
landing combat would be easier to fight, because this area is a 
fine example of the territory around Pyongyang. The masses 
would provide a good foundation. When U.S. forces arrive, they 
may not gain a firm foothold. Therefore, if we were able to 
land here and carry out a rescue plan, using special forces 
units to rescue the North Korean government leaders, it would be 
possible to call on the North Korean people to organize new 
groups of units as quickly as possible, especially those crack 
troops that have already retired. If they and the masses 
remaining in North Korea are all organized, they can fight a 
peoples' war. In this manner, the Korean military line of "arm 
all the people, have cadre throughout the military, and 
modernize the entire military" will play a critical role at the 
critical moment. All people are soldiers, and in a very short 
time they can organize at least 100,000 new Korean militia 
forces. 
  The final selection is for the latter plan. In this war, 
China's Special Police Force will play an unexpected role. This 
is because the United States and Japan will never have dreamed 
that the Chinese would adopt such ferocious tactics. As a 
result, they will very quickly rescue the North Korean leaders 
who under house arrest. They will activate the North Korean 
combat readiness radio and television stations, and the leaders 
will give televised speeches to the people. All of the people 
will be soldiers and will very quickly organize a new militia. 
  Coordinating with the North Korean People's Army, the 
landing 
follow-up units in the second and third echelons will land 
without problems. 
  Coordinating with the North Korean Peoples' Army, the 
Chinese 
and Korean forces will achieve the strategic combat policy to 
"defend against the south, attack in the north". 
  The united forces of the United States, Japan, and South 
Korea that will have already rushed up to the Yalu will see the 
fire in their own backyard and will quickly send troops to the 
rear. Thus, the original northern fortress will not exist. 
This will make it possible for the Chinese units aiding Korea 
to move to the south. 
  Finally, one million men from the units in China's northeast 
military region, the 200,000 men of the Korean Peoples' Army 
forces that have already moved into northeast China, and another 
800,000 new Korean forces formed from the Korean refugees will 
form a force of two million men moving from the north to the 
south on the Korean Peninsula, with the Chinese and Koreans 
wrapping up the Americans. 
  The battle to encircle and wipe out the enemy will be 
carried 
out on the ground and in the air in the region of Myohyangsan, 
Nangrimsan, and Kwanmosan. At the same time, on the Yellow Sea, 
a startling sea and air battle will occur. 
  These are not the encirclement and counter-encirclement 
human 
sea tactics of the 1950's, and it will not be like the Gulf War. 
This is a combination of high technology and low technology; a 
three-dimensional war with both modernized weapons and 
conventional weapons used side by side. The various countries 
will all use the most modern weapons. The United States will 
use the fourth generation fighters and tanks it used and 
improved during the Gulf War. Japan will bring out many weapons 
it has not revealed before. China will also use the weapons it 
has updated over the past several years as well as its newest 
weapons. Some will be experimental weapons that have not yet 
been used to equip the units. However, most of the Korean 
forces will still be basically equipped with conventional 
infantry weapons. 
  How should such a war be fought? Are we up to the task? 
<H5>  How Should the War Be Fought, How Will We Complete the </H5>
Encirclement? 
  The war will be an unusually strange one, an unusually 
difficult one, and an unusually cruel one. This is because it 
will have the three following characteristics: 
  First, this will be an especially strange war. 
  Just as some have asked, how is it possible to match up 
modern missiles and infantry rifles, AWACs and hand radios, or 
satellite weapons and air raid bunkers? How can the latter 
elements be used? 
  However, facts demonstrate that this hypothesis is wrong. If 
we say that such things are of no use in desert regions and wide 
open spaces like the Persian Gulf, nonetheless, in mountain 
forest regions or in high mountains and valleys, it is a 
different story. The Korean Peoples' Army and the Chinese PLA 
will miraculously bottle up an 800,000-man modernized motorized 
infantry in this region. Although they might not be able to 
wipe out this force, they will have stopped it. The Korean 
people under the guiding philosophy of arming all of the people 
will dig many air defense tunnels. Furthermore, these will be 
able to withstand atom bomb attacks and will play a major role. 
Inside these tunnels there will be stored various types of 
weapons, equipment, and food. The U.S., Japanese, and South 
Korean forces will be caught by surprise, and there will be 
another Vietnam-type war here. 
  Second, this war will not be over in a very short time but 
will be fought with difficulty. 
  Both sides may spend several months see-sawing back and 
forth, or the war may last even longer. Neither side will be 
able to defeat the other side easily. The U.S., Japanese, and 
Korean forces will want a quick end to the war, but they will 
not be able to use many of their weapons. Their missiles cannot 
just blow up rocks in the mountains and fish in the river. The 
Chinese Navy will have a rough time of it in the naval battle. 
However, once the Chinese military has a firm foothold in the 
Pyongyang area, the Navy task force will immediately retreat 
back to its bases. Here, the U.S. and Japanese naval 
superiority will be lost, because we have anti-missile ballistic 
defense systems and advanced coastal defense systems. We also 
have a good of science and technology. "The second bloc" is 
composed of a number of major C[.sup]3[/]1 system. Unless 
they want to directly declare war on China, they will not dare 
to come cause trouble. 
  Naturally, this war will also be unusually cruel. This is 
because U.S. bombs can blow off the top of a mountain and the 
missiles of the U.S. forces can drill into caves. The price 
paid by the Korean and Chinese militaries will be great. But 
there will be too many mountain tops, too many caves, and too 
many people. The United States will not be able to use its 
bombs to level all of the mountains on most of the Korean 
Peninsula. To recover the caves one by one and to regain the 
mountain tops one by one will require hand-to-hand fighting. 
Once the Americans leave their aircraft and tanks, they are 
really paper tigers. In many places, the United States will not 
be able to use its tanks. The U.S. Army relies on helicopters 
for basic mobility. However, the one-man anti-aircraft missiles 
of the Korean and Chinese militaries are sufficient. Because of 
this, the U.S. Army will lose almost as many men in helicopters, 
going down with their helicopters, as the Koreans will lose in 
the caves. 
  Do we have the capability of doing this? Can the wishes of 
the generals be realized? 
<H5>  A Strange Force on the Sea </H5>
  When the war is raging in Korea and both sides are engaged 
in 
close hand-to-hand combat, the early warning systems of both 
sides will suddenly see a strange force on the sea. It will be 
a huge armada flying no country's flag. They will be coming out 
of the north toward the east coast of Korea. They will be 
heading toward the combat zone. 
  Who are they? 
  They are not the Americans, the Japanese, the Chinese, nor 
the Koreans. 
  Could it be the French? No! 
  Could it be the English? No! 
  It appears to be the Russians. Only they have a fleet this 
large. Only they have such an advanced fleet. 
  But they have in the past very clearly expressed their 
neutrality on the Korean question. 
  Then why are they coming? 
  They are either coming to put out the fire or to beat 
someone 
back. 
  But could they put out the fire? With three large nations 
fighting, they could not. 
  Then they have come to beat someone back. 
  Who have they come to beat back? If they have come to help 
the North Koreans and Chinese, then the Chinese and Koreans 
might very quickly send the United States and Japan home, or at 
least back to South Korea. 
  If they have come to help the United States and Japan, then 
the Chinese and Koreans are finished. 
  Everyone is just waiting and watching.... 
<H5>  VIII: THOROUGHLY RESOLVE THE PROBLEM OF THE SOUTH CHINA SEA </H5>
ISLANDS 
  If one were to ask what is the main place where the Chinese 
military faces a local conflict, the answer would be the South 
China Sea. 
  For China, the resolution of the South China Sea Islands 
problem is a "major national affair" of increasing urgency. 
  In February 1992, after the announcement of China's 
"Territorial Waters Law," the various ASEAN nations and Vietnam 
all bought advanced fighter aircraft such as the F-16 and 
Mirage-2000 and quickly built up their naval air forces. They 
also accelerated their offshore petroleum exploration and 
military deployments on the seas and islands they already 
occupy. They are well prepared to fight China to the end in the 
South China Sea and swear to protect their interests. 
  Recently, Vietnam asked to join ASEAN. Vietnamese leaders 
visited the ASEAN nations to further enhance cooperation. There 
is a trend toward Vietnam uniting with ASEAN against China. As 
the situation develops, there is the possibility that other 
nations such as Japan or the United States will become involved 
in the South China Sea to protect their major shipping lanes and 
strategic interests in the South Pacific. 
  To prevent the South China Sea conflict from escalating, the 
Chinese government has already made concessions and worked hard 
with all parties. 
  At the end of 1989, Premier Li Peng visited Malaysia and 
proposed using friendly means to hold negotiations on 
differences existing between the nations concerned. Until this 
happens, it would be best to table this question. 
  In June and July of 1991, while Chairman Yang Shangkun was 
visiting Indonesia, he stressed the use of peaceful means to 
resolve the dispute and advocated joint development of the 
islands. 
  During those same months, a spokesman from the Chinese 
Foreign Ministry, Wu Jianmin, described at a press conference 
the stand of the Chinese government on the question of the 
Nansha Islands, advocating setting the dispute aside and jointly 
developing the Nansha Islands. Up until the Eighth National 
Peoples' Congress this year, the Chinese government continued to 
reiterate its stand calling for negotiations to resolve the 
dispute and peaceful joint development. 
  However, experienced observers note that the Chinese 
government's current stand is to sacrifice economic interests in 
exchange for sovereignty and territorial integrity, and it is 
seeking the rights and interests of a peaceful environment along 
its periphery. 
  What China means by its proposed "joint development" is that 
while recognizing that the Nansha Islands are Chinese territory, 
the various nations concerned could jointly share in the ocean 
resources of the Nansha waters. This is just like the fable of 
Kong Rong giving the larger pear to his younger brother; it is 
an obvious concession. There is still a certain degree of 
difficulty in resolving the dispute and protecting sovereignty, 
and there are many complicated factors. 
  First, China does not like war. If there is a one percent 
chance of peace, it would rather work 100 percent toward peace 
and have a worldwide reputation of being a powerful nation that 
does not force its will on smaller nations. 
  Second, China is now trying to take advantage of favorable 
circumstances and is working all-out for economic development. 
If war breaks out in the South China Sea, it will interfere 
with the speed of development. 
  Third, Chinese leaders who are well versed in military 
tactics know very well that "the first ploy is planning, next 
are diplomatic efforts, next is the use of force, and next is 
attacking cities. Attacking cities is only done as a last 
resort. Therefore, good military strategists can defeat the 
forces of others without combat and take cities without long 
sieges. They can destroy countries without prolonged fighting." 
Although the Nansha Islands are Chinese territory, to use 
military force is not in her best interests, and it would not be 
a good strategy to go on a long expedition. 
  Fourth, Chinese naval and air power are the weakest of its 
military forces. They are not sufficient to recover lost 
territory with military might. From the military standpoint 
this is the most important factor. This is also the fundamental 
reason that Vietnam and the ASEAN countries have dared to set 
foot on the Nansha Islands. 
<H5>  Is There Any Hope for a Peaceful Resolution of the Conflict? </H5>
  The next century will be one of struggle over control of the 
oceans. This is commonly recognized by the strategists of all 
nations. Scientists believe that not only do the oceans cover 
70 percent of the surface of the earth, but also their abundant 
resources are far greater than those of the land. Although land 
resources are being constantly diminished and will soon be 
exhausted, it can be stated that in the next century, whoever 
controls the oceans will control the world. Therefore, over the 
past several years, not only have a number of major countries 
begun to expand their influence on the oceans, even some 
developing countries have shifted the focus of their strategy to 
the oceans, making the establishment of a quality naval force of 
primary strategic importance. China is no exception. 
  Why is this so? 
  From 1973 to 1982 the United Nations convened the Third Law 
of the Seas Conference. After heated debate, the conference 
finally passed the "United Nations Law of the Seas Treaty." The 
passing of this "Treaty" has caused the world-wide struggle over 
the seas to become more intense. On the basis of Themistocles' 
famous saying of 2500 years ago -- "whoever controls the oceans 
controls everything" -- all are planning on three properties: 
  According to the "Treaty," the extent of territorial waters 
of coastal nations cannot exceed 12 nautical miles (one nautical 
mile is 1.852 km). This extends the distance of territorial 
waters over what had previously existed. This is the first 
property. This has caused people to reconsider the value of 
islands in the ocean. 
  The second property is the "maritime exclusive economic 
zones" -- no more than 200 nautical miles beginning at the 
territorial waters reference line. The coastal nations enjoy 
sovereign rights over all natural resources in their exclusive 
economic zones with rights to economic development and 
exploration. They also have the right to build and use 
artificial islands, facilities, and structures, as well 
jurisdiction over ocean sciences research, environmental 
protection, and man-made facilities. 
  The third property is the continental shelf. The continental 
shelf refers to the natural extension of territorial lands 
outside of territorial waters and all the way to the underwater 
areas and sea bed along the rim of the continental shelf. 
Normally, this does not extend more than 200 nautical miles 
from the territorial waters line, but in any envent it is not to 
exceed 350 nautical miles. Coastal nations have sovereign 
rights to mineral and bilogical resources within this scope. 
  The forebears of the Chinese people did not fail to leave us 
these three properties. According to the stipulations of the 
"Treaty," China can demarkate a maritime exclusive economic zone 
and continental shelf of 3 million square km -- our territorial 
sea. However, we do not no what fraudulent claims our neihbors 
will secretly make. 
  The deepest causes of the Nansha Islands problem derive from 
these properties and this struggle over maritime resources. For 
Vietnam and the ASEAN countries, the Nansha Islands problem 
concerns their own development and tremendous economic profits. 
However, for China it signifies much more. 
  China has only 2,808 square meters of ocean per capita -- 
eight percent of what Japan has! 
  China's territorial lands to territorial waters ratio is 
10:3, while for Vietnam it is 1:2, and for the Philippines and 
Indonesia it is as much as 1:10. 
  It has been revealed by experts that the oil and gas 
reserves 
under the South China Sea are about 35 billion tons, with most 
of the three major basins on the China continental shelf. The 
extracted value of this would be several tens of billions of 
dollars. This undoubtedly has a tremendous attraction for all 
countries involved in the dispute over the Nansha Islands. 
  However, according to estimates by the Japanese Institute of 
Energy Economics, future petroleum requirements in the Pacific 
region will increase at the rate of 2.4 percent per year until 
the year 2000. This will reach 4.88 billion tons. Therefore, a 
number of international observers believe that the South China 
Sea has the greatest possibility of becoming the second Persian 
Gulf, whether because of the oil under the ocean or an outbreak 
of war. 
  The announcement of the Chinese "Territorial Waters Law" and 
the contract between China and the United States for joint 
exploration of oil and gas resources in the Nansha Islands are 
two practical and important steps by the Chinese government on 
the problem of the Nansha Islands. It not only once more 
expressed the determination of the Chinese government to protect 
its territorial sovereignty, but at the same time it also 
signals that the Chinese government may adopt measures and 
methods other than a peaceful resolution of the dispute. 
  In April of this year, deputy chairman of the Central 
Military Commission General Liu Huaqing, in the company of 
political commissar of the East Sea Fleet Admiral Lian Yaoqian, 
reviewed the East Sea Fleet and requested that the officers and 
men increase their vigilance to be ready for war. He also 
requested that they increase their awareness to protect the blue 
national territory, establishing new merit for China's Four 
Modernizations. 
  For every move by China, Vietnam and the ASEAN countries 
immediately react in kind. This is especially true of Vietnam. 
On the one hand, Vietnam "protested" through diplomatic 
channels, and on the other hand it used various tools to enhance 
its antagonistic propaganda toward China, attacking China by 
name as "invading Vietnamese territory," "worsening the tense 
situation in the area," and being the worst threat "in the 
Nansha Area." At the same time, Vietnam believes that China may 
take "further action" concerning the Nansha Islands. Because of 
this, the Vietnamese military has increased its combat readiness 
activities directed against China in the Nansha Islands. 
  In May 1992, The Vietnamese Army Chief-of-Staff and Navy 
Commander convened a military meeting in Ho Chi Min City to 
reevaluate China's naval and air force strengths and formulate a 
new combat plan for naval and air support in the Nansha Islands 
waters. 
  According to the spirit of collectivism in Ho Chi Min City, 
the Vietnamese Air Force has, beginning in early June, conducted 
a number of exercises to support combat in the Nansha Islands 
organized with China as the adversary. They have restored Su-22 
reconnaissance activity over the Nansha Islands and Zhejiang 
province -- activity that had been stopped for a year. 
  The Vietnamese Navy has also tightened control over the 
Nansha waters, expanding its patrolled zone from three to five 
nautical miles from the islands and reefs it occupies to 10 
nautical miles. It also has stepped up actions to pursue and 
drive out Chinese fishing boats. 
  The stands of the ASEAN countries involved in the Nansha 
Island dispute are very much the same as the Vietnamese policy. 
In July 1991, the ASEAN countries convened a "Discussion 
Conference on the Nansha Islands Question" in Indonesia. Its 
basic theme was the "south pole model," advocated by Malaysia 
and the Philippines, for the joint development of resources in 
the South China Sea. This would be the freezing of sovereignty 
and sharing of resources. Thus, the South China Seas face the 
danger of becoming "International Waters." 
<H5>  The Nansha Islands Issue Should Not Be Dragged Out </H5>
  Due to the serious disputes and sharp military opposition 
over the sovereignty question, there are still great obstacles 
to the peaceful "recognition of sovereignty and joint 
development" of the Nansha Islands hoped for by the Chinese 
government. The possibility of military conflict or war still 
exists. 
  For China, the most important matter is when and how to 
resolve the question. 
  How much longer will the Chinese government be able to put 
the Nansha Islands problem aside? According to the "statute of 
limitations" in international law, when one country occupies the 
land of another for a fairly long time and effectively rules 
this territory without any interference, then after a number of 
years it can legally take over ownership. The length of time 
for this varies; normally it is considered to be 50 years. 
  The final time limit for the Nansha Islands is the year 
2020. 
However, from current developmental trends, the question of the 
Nansha Islands is becoming more and more an "international" 
question, with the nations involved in the dispute accelerating 
its internationalization. Should it become an "international" 
question, China would no longer have sufficient grounds to use 
military force to recover the islands. Militarily, it could be 
faced with a "multinational force" under the name of the United 
Nations. At such a time, there would be a change in the nature 
of the strategic situation that would be disadvantageous to 
China. 
  Therefore, the 1990's are the key time for resolving the 
Nansha Islands question. Once they are over, China may have 
lost a historical opportunity. 
  China may use any one of the following three methods: 
  One is peaceful diplomatic methods. The effectiveness of 
this method is determined by the extent to which the nations 
involved are willing to make concessions on the question of 
principles and interests. Currently, it looks as if this would 
be fairly difficult. Another is the use of armed force to 
recover the islands. This method looks simple, but it is 
actually very complicated. Furthermore, after the islands are 
recovered, troops will have to be stationed there for a long 
time to hold them. Otherwise, after the major force moves back 
north, the other countries will come back again. 
  Another method is to use military might to apply diplomatic 
pressure, forcing the other side to make concessions. The 
disadvantage to this is that it could lead to a new "cold war" 
in Southeast Asia. 
  From current developmental trends, all of these three 
methods 
fall into the realm of possible choices. According to foreign 
speculation, "the possibility that the Chinese military will use 
force is becoming more and more obvious." 
<H5>  Obstacles to the Use of Military Force </H5>
  "If the Chinese want to retake the islands of the South 
China 
Sea, they would gobble them up like a hungry tiger." This is 
how military experts describe what would happen in a war in the 
South China Seas. 
  From a tactical model at the China Navy Institute of 
Strategic Studies, we can clearly see that the previous 
description by military experts is not a major exaggeration. If 
the Chinese Navy launches an assault on the Nansha Islands, it 
will still be faced with a number of thorny problems. According 
to an analysis of the basic factors of "timing, geography, and 
populace," the Chinese could be at a distinct disadvantage. 
  Timing. Because the Chinese Navy has not yet finished its 
modernization process, it has not yet achieved the level of 
equipment that it should have. In particular, it does not have 
its first aircraft carrier. Therefore, now is not the best time 
to solve the problem of the Nansha Islands. 
  Geography. Although the Nansha Islands are Chinese 
territory, 
they are far from the mainland and are surrounded by Vietnam, 
the Philippines, Malaysia, Brunei, and Indonesia. It is more 
than 1,000 km from China to the Nansha Islands, but from the 
Philippines or Malaysia it is only a little over 100 km. This is 
without a doubt a "tiring journey" for the Chinese Navy, and its 
combat lines and rear support lines would be very long. If a 
task force were organized and sent to the Nansha Islands, it 
would take more than 100 vessels just to support the combat 
ships. This would mean that one-third of the fleet's attack 
force would be used for support. 
  Populace. On resolving the question of the Nansha Islands, 
China is in opposition to "alliances" about to be formed. If 
Taiwan were to take China's side, the situation would be 
optimistic. If China and Taiwan are unable to maintain a 
consistent line regarding foreign nations, then there is no way 
China could have the advantage of the "populace." The United 
States could directly or indirectly become involved in Nansha 
Islands affairs. In this case, the situation could be even more 
disadvantageous for China. 
  We can see from this how urgent and complex the Nansha 
Islands question is for China's Naval leaders. However, the new 
generation of leaders, filled with a strong spirit of 
nationalism, will never abandon their efforts to bring about the 
return of the Nansha Islands to the bosom of the motherland. 
<H5>  Comparison of Forces Currently in the Nansha Islands </H5>
  If we were to say that now is the time to resolve the 
question of the Nansha Islands, our greatest advantage would lie 
in the ratio of military forces. 
  All of the nations involved in the dispute over the Nansha 
Islands are small military powers. In military force alone they 
are no match for China. Even if they were to join forces they 
might not be any match for China. According to the most recent 
statistics, the military status of the five nations involved in 
the dispute over the Nansha Island not including China and 
Taiwan is as follows: 
  The Phillipines: 
  Active duty military: 147,500 men. 
  Army: 65,000 men, forming six regional headquarters, six 
infantry divisions, one light armored brigade, one independent 
infantry brigade, one headquarters brigade, one commando 
brigade, three engineering brigades, four artillery brigades, 
one construction brigade, one special services brigade, and one 
presidential security unit. They are equipped with 28 light 
tanks, 45 infantry tanks, 245 armored transports, 32 suppression 
guns, and several recoilless rifles. The security forces have 
43,500 men, forming 13 regional headquarters and 225 local 
companies. 
  Navy: 23,000 men, equipped with three escorts, 41 patrol 
boats, 28 amphibious ships, six support ships, one naval air 
squadron with six aircraft and 12 helicopters. There are also 
9,500 marines comprising four brigades (10 battalions) and 
equipped with 85 armored transports and 85 field pieces, and a 
coast guard with 2,000 men equipped with 65 patrol boats. 
  Air force: 16,000 men composing one ground-attack fighter 
squadron, one armed helicopter gunship wing, three rebel 
suppression squadrons, one transport helicopter squadron, one 
air command aircraft, five transport squadrons, one 
communications aircraft squadron, and three training squadrons. 
They are equipped with more than 50 combat aircraft, more than 
60 armed helicopters, more than 70 transport aircraft, two 
communications aircraft, 51 trainers, and 20 air-to-air 
missiles. In addition, the Philippines also have a 48,000-man 
reserve and a 45,000-man national defense force. Currently, 50 
percent of their ships and 70 percent of their marines are 
deployed in Nansha waters. 
  Malaysia: 
  Active military: 114,500 men, including 90,000 in the army. 
They comprise one army, four divisions, one anti-riot security 
command, and nine infantry brigades (36 infantry battalions, 
four armored regiments, five field artillery regiments, two 
anti-aircraft regiments, and five engineer regiments). They 
also have one special services regiment (three battalions). 
They are equipped with 26 light tanks, 394 armored 
reconnaissance vehicles, 619 armored transports, more than 200 
suppression guns, 150 recoilless rifles, 118 anti-aircraft guns, 
and several rocket launchers and anti-tank weapons. 
  Navy: 12,500 men, comprising two naval headquarters and 
equipped with one escort ship, eight missile launches, 29 patrol 
boats, five minesweepers, two LSTs, 33 landing craft, and three 
support vessels. The naval air force has six helicopters. 
  Air Force: 12,000 men comprising two headquarters, three 
ground-attack fighter squadrons, one fighter squadron, one 
reconnaissance squadron, four transport squadrons, four 
helicopter squadrons, four trainer squadrons, and one airfield 
security squadron. They are equipped with 58 combat aircraft, 
38 transports, 60 helicopters, and 75 trainers. Not long ago, 
Malaysia imported 12 Tordado fighter bombers and 12 Dagger air 
defense systems from England, as well as 20 light artillery 
pieces. 
  Malaysia also has 47,600 men in its reserves and 200,000 men 
in paramilitary units. They are primarily police field units, 
water patrol police units, local security units, border 
reconnaissance units, and peoples' volunteers. 
  Brunei: 
  Active military: 4,000 men, including 250 female soldiers. 
  The army is made up of 3,200 men, comprising two infantry 
brigades, one armored reconnaissance squadron, one air defense 
missile company, one engineering squadron, and one 
communications squadron. They are equipped with 16 light tanks, 
24 armored transport vehicles, and 12 ground-to-air missile 
launchers. 
  The navy is made up of 500 men comprising one river boat 
squadron and one special combat squadron. They are equipped 
with three missile launches, three patrol boats, and three 
landing craft. 
  The air force is formed of 300 men comprising one riot 
suppression squadron and one helicopter squadron. They are 
equipped with six armed helicopter gunships, 12 helicopters, and 
four trainers. 
  Brunei also has 2,800 men in paramilitary units, including 
1,900 men in police units and 900 in Gurkha reserves. 
  Indonesia: 
  Active duty forces include 285,000 men, the reserves 800,000 
men, and paramilitary units 415,000 (including 300,000 in 
militia). 
  The army is made up of 215,000 men comprising one strategic 
reserve unit command and 10 district headquarters. Subordinate 
to the strategic reserve headquarters there are two infantry 
division headquarters, one armored cavalry brigade, three 
infantry brigades, three airborne brigades, two field artillery 
regiments, one anti-aircraft artillery regiment, two engineering 
battalions, four independent airborne battalions, eight 
independent air defense battalions, nine independent engineering 
battalions, one Army Air Corps squadron, one helicopter 
squadron, and four special forces detachments. They are 
equipped with 141 light tanks, 114 armored reconnaissance 
vehicles, 420 armored transport vehicles, more than 200 
suppression guns, 310 anti-aircraft guns, 92 different models of 
aircraft and helicopters, 21 landing craft, 14 transport ships, 
and more than 20 ground-to-air missiles. 
  The navy has 43,000 men comprising an eastern and western 
headquarters and equipped with two submarines, 15 escorts, 29 
patrol boats of different types, two mine sweepers, 15 
amphibious craft, and 20 support ships. There are 12,000 men in 
the marines, comprising two infantry regiments and one combat 
support regiment. They are equipped with 30 light tanks, 40 
infantry tanks, 57 armored transport vehicles, 40 towed guns, 
and 20 rockets and anti-aircraft guns. There are 1,000 men in 
the Naval Air Force equipped with 15 combat aircraft, nine armed 
helicopter gunships, nine anti-submarine aircraft, 15 
reconnaissance aircraft, and 24 other aircraft and helicopters. 
  The air force has 27,000 men comprising an eastern and 
western Air Force Combat Headquarters, two ground-attack fighter 
squadrons, one fighter squadron, one rebellion suppression 
aircraft squadron, one ocean reconnaissance aircraft squadron, 
four transport squadrons, three helicopter squadrons, and four 
trainer squadrons. They are equipped with 70 combat aircraft, 
60 transport aircraft, and 39 helicopters. They also have five 
battalions of rapid response forces. Not long ago, the 
Indonesians purchased four F-16 fighters, eight ground-attack 
fighters, 55 surface-to-air missile systems, four escorts, and 
ten air-to-ship missiles from the United States, England, and 
France. Currently, 55 percent of the Indonesian fleet and 45 
percent of its air force are deployed in the Nansha Islands. 
  Vietnam: 
  Active duty military: 1.252 million men. 
  The army has 1.11 million men (about to be reduced by 50 
percent). They are organized into 14 armies, 65 infantry 
divisions, 10 armored brigades, one support special forces unit, 
10 field artillery brigades, eight engineering divisions, 10 to 
16 economic construction divisions, and 20 independent 
engineering brigades. They are equipped with 2,210 tanks, 2,700 
armored combat vehicles, 1,000 suppression guns, more than 3,000 
anti-aircraft guns, and a certain number of anti-tank missiles 
and surface-to-air missiles. 
  The navy has 40,000 men (including 27,000 men in the 
marines). They are equipped with seven escorts, eight missile 
launches, 21 torpedo boats, 33 patrol boats, five mine sweepers, 
and seven landing craft. 
  There are 12,000 men in the air force. They are organized 
into four air divisions, one ground-attack fighter regiment, six 
interceptor regiments, three transport regiments, one helicopter 
division, and three training regiments. They are equipped with 
250 combat aircraft, 30 combat helicopter gunships, 135 
transport aircraft, 170 helicopters, 53 trainers, and a certain 
number of air-to-air missiles. 
  The air defense army has 100,000 men. They are organized 
into 14 air defense divisions (with subordinate surface-to-air 
missile regiments, anti-aircraft brigades, and radar brigades). 
They are equipped with 66 surface-to-air missile facilities, 
1,000 anti-aircraft guns, and 100 radars. 
  After normal relations were restored between China and 
Vietnam, Vietnam moved the center of gravity of its troop 
deployments to the south. Three armies making up 60 percent of 
the total forces are deployed along the coast to achieve their 
dream of being an "maritime superpower." 
  We can see from the data above that none of these countries 
has the capability to take on China. Even if the naval and air 
power of all five countries were combined, it would clearly 
still be too little. They would not even be strong enough to 
take on Taiwan. Therefore, from a purely military analysis, it 
would be a fairly easy task to drive the occupying forces from 
these islands. One moderately-sized task force wold be enough. 
However, the problem would be how to hold onto the recovered 
territory. This is the most practical problem. 
<H5>  The Magic Weapon For Defeating the Enemy </H5>
  In the fall of 1992, a long-range combat exercise with the 
Nansha Islands as the background had just concluded at a certain 
military base in South China. The military researchers were 
secretly called to a nondescript meeting room. There was a 
heated discussion over the local war the Chinese military might 
conduct in the Nansha Islands. The meeting focussed on 
resolving the major problems of principles over guiding 
philosophy and combat policy of the Chinese forces fighting in 
the Nansha Islands. These have formed a basis for policy by 
the highest commanding agencies. 
  The meeting believed that in a war in the Nansha Islands, 
they would have to achieve the best possible results under the 
worst conditions. They would have to use a combination of 
fighting and intimidation to quickly bring a quick conclusion to 
the first stage, which would be to drive out those occupying the 
islands. To do this, a war in the Nansha Islands would have to 
comply with the following principles. 
  Principle of surprise: All war preparations would have to 
be done in a way that would allow the attack to be a surprise, 
catching the opponents unaware as much as possible under the 
conditions of existing equipment and technology so it would be 
impossible for them to organize a timely counterattack. At the 
same time, after taking the islands, make preparations for 
holding them for a prolonged period of time. 
  Principle of focused attacks: It will be necessary to 
concentrate forces to first attack the Vietnamese forces, 
containing the Vietnamese air forces as much as possible to 
prevent the Vietnamese from reinforcing their troops in the 
Nansha Islands. The focus of the attack on the ocean should be 
against the Indonesian submarines and escorts. If it is 
possible to effectively overcome the Vietnamese air forces and 
the Indonesian Navy, we will maintain the initiative throughout 
the fighting. When necessary, we could also consider high speed 
surprise "surgical strikes" focused on the countries themselves, 
concentrating on destroying their military bases in order to get 
them to "comply." 
  Principle of three dimensional warfare: We must organize a 
task force of naval and air power for both offensive and 
defensive fighting which can effectively handle attacks from the 
air or ocean during the long trip, so it could arrive at the 
combat zone without any major problems. Since we are weak in 
shipborne aircraft, we could use the Xisha and Dongsha bases to 
be responsible for the primary air support missions. The 
marines and the naval air forces would be the primary task 
forces for attacking enemy-occupied islands and reefs, and the 
missile units and air force long-range bomber forces would 
become the key elements for conducting firepower assaults on the 
enemy. At the same time, during the process of the fighting, it 
would always be necessary to make full use of camouflage, 
deception, and early warning support measures. 
  Principle of enhanced rear services support: Prior to the 
fighting, it will be necessary to mobilize sufficient support 
vessels to join the task force. The Xisha and Dongsha Islands 
could become intermediate transhipment stations for transport 
services. Because the supply line would be more than 1,000 km, 
it will be especially important to use a large amount of 
anti-submarine and air defense forces in order to prevent the 
supply line from be disrupted. Consideration must be given to 
using a three dimensional supply route of naval and air forces. 
Therefore, the Air Force must place a large amount of its 
transport forces into service. In the combat stage of holding 
the recovered islands, an uninterrupted supply should be 
considered for building up the Nansha Islands from far off, 
using methods of simultaneously developing, solidifying, and 
constructing, to gradually turn the South China Sea into a 
permanent ocean route. 
  Principle of rapid fighting, rapid stabilization, and 
strict controls: In order to prevent the situation from 
expanding and the fighting from escalating, especially to avoid 
Japanese or U.S. involvement, after the surprise attack has been 
successful, we should quickly stabilize the defenses on the 
Nansha Islands to form a three dimensional defensive system. 
Then, every effort should be made to disengage from the enemy, 
announcing an end to the fighting. In this manner, it will be 
possible to concentrate our best forces to establish a permanent 
ocean channel. 
<H5>  How Should the War Be Launched? </H5>
  Without an aircraft carrier, what type of fighting and what 
steps might the Chinese forces use to accomplish their 
expedition to the Nansha Islands? According to the idea used 
for numerous long-range training flights by the South China Sea 
air forces combined with the combat sequence, it is possible to 
come up with a general outline of the fighting. 
  Composition of the task force: At the heart of the task 
force will naturally be the missile escorts which have the 
greatest defense penetration capabilities. From a comparison of 
military forces in the Nansha Islands, it would take at least 
five to eight of these, with 10 to 15 escort ships, 15 to 20 
submarines, 15 to 20 sub chasers, 20 to 30 patrol boats, three 
to five landing ships, 30 to 50 supply support vessels and, 50 
to 100 missile launches. It would take at least a week to 
assemble a task force of this size. 
  Carry out an effective naval blockade: While preparing to 
form the task force, at least 10 to 15 submarines and three to 
five long-range bomber squadrons should conduct a blockade of 
the Nansha Island waters to prevent to the greatest extent 
possible any reinforcement of the islands and reefs and to make 
defense preparations difficult. 
  Intermediate range missiles should constitute a threat to 
enemy vessels in the Nansha Island waters. Electronic 
countermeasures units should carry out continuous jamming to 
confuse the enemy, making it possible for the task force to 
assemble and advance undetected. Whether or not an effective 
three dimensional blockade can be enforced over the Nansha 
Islands is a key link determining whether or not the element of 
surprise can be brought to bear in the fighting. This process 
may continue until the task force has deployed to certain 
waters,or even until the landing combat has begun. 
  The naval blockade will not be a tight blockade all around 
the Nansha Islands, but will be a blockade of the major ship 
channels and main axes, not only establishing a blockade of the 
channels between Vietnam, the Philippines and Indonesia, and the 
Nansha Islands, but also necessary assaults against their land 
bases. Along secondary directions, a certain number of mines 
will normally achieve the objective. 
  The key to establishing a naval blockade is that it relies 
on advanced surveillance and monitoring technology. The primary 
means are the use of satellites, radar, and reconnaissance 
aircraft to form a multiple layer surveillance network which can 
provide real-time guidance to submarines and bomber aircraft to 
stop enemy transport. If this stage of the combat is 
successfully organized, it is very possible that no heavy 
fighting will be necessary, that the enemy may be forced to 
accept conditions or make concessions, avoiding the final 
outbreak of war. 
  Smoothly organize the advance: For a huge task force to 
smoothly arrive at a combat zone more than 1,000 km away is no 
easy task. Even if the naval blockade wins the necessary time 
for the advance and distracts the enemy's attention to a great 
degree, along the extended advance route there is no way to 
ensure the task force will not be attacked from many directions. 
Therefore, for the Chinese task force, the fighting begins with 
the advance. 
  "Advance and fight at the same time" is a concept that must 
be established by the task force commander. During the advance, 
the primary tasks of the task force will be anti-submarine and 
air defenses. Worst estimates are that the enemy could use four 
or five submarines and 200 combat aircraft. For the enemy, 
these assault forces would mostly be used during the advance of 
the Chinese task force. Although this would not be a clear 
naval and air superiority for the enemy, it would constitute a 
fairly large threat to the advancing task force. 
  Task forces are usually divided into the spearhead, main 
force, and rear guard stretched out over dozens of nautical 
miles with heavily exposed flanks which are easily attacked, and 
without an aircraft carrier, air defense would be even weaker. 
In order to deal with this, the task force advance must use a 
number of support methods. 
  First is enhanced firepower for the blockade of the Nansha 
Islands, suppressing as much of the enemy naval and air forces 
in the Nansha Islands as possible. 
  Second is the air force fighter bombers should provide air 
cover for the fleet, maintaining control of the skies as much as 
possible during the advance. Third, the task force must have and 
use enhanced anti-submarine and air defense capabilities. 
  From the firepower currently available to a task force, it 
is still possible that it could handle enemy attacks from the 
air and the sea. 
  Luda class missile [words indistinct] are equipped with two 
launchers for SS-N-2 anti-ship missiles, two twin 130-mm ship 
guns, eight 37-mm and eight 25-mm anti-aircraft guns, and two 
multiple rocket type depth charge launchers with rails which can 
hold 50 large depth charges. It has fairly strong 
anti-submarine defense capabilities. 
  The Jianghu class missile escort: It is equipped with two 
twin dual mounted SS-N-2 anti-ship missile launchers, four 
100-mm and 12 37-mm anti-aircraft guns, two rocket type depth 
charge launchers and two anti-aircraft missile launchers. This 
vessel has better air defense capabilities than cruisers. 
  The Hainan class sub chaser: This is equipped with two dual 
57-mm and two dual 25-mm guns, two rocket type mine launchers, 
four mine rocket guns, and mine launchers. This vessel is 
primarily used against submarines, but has a certain amount of 
air defense and ocean assault capabilities. 
  The Haidao class missile launch: This is equipped with 
four SS-N-4 anti-ship missiles and two dual 57-mm guns. In 
addition, the T-43 class mine sweepers, the Kronshtadt class 
patrol boats, the Huangfeng class and Hekou class missile 
launches, and the Shanghai class II model gunboats all have a 
certain degree of anti-submarine capabilities. 
  We can see from this that during the advance, the most 
reliable way to insure the advance is effective task force air 
defense and anti-submarine firepower. 
  It is worth noting that during the fighting, the ASEAN 
countries might receive advanced U.S. or Western fighters and 
missiles, and even though these may not be many in number, they 
could be a sizeable threat. Therefore, organizing the advance 
might not be without snags. If losses can be kept within 20 
percent during the advance, this would be a major achievement. 
  Launching an all-out landing campaign: An effective 
blockade and a successful advance will greatly reduce the 
intensity of landing combat. Therefore, the blockade itself 
must surround and assault the enemy forces holding the islands 
so they are isolated and without support. At the same time, 
when the task force advances to the specified zone, the enemy 
support vessels will have no time to worry about the defenses 
holding the islands. These vessels may make sacrificial defense 
against the task force, circling the force or may abandon the 
fighting and go home. In this manner, the task left to the 
landing combat will primarily be wiping out the stragglers left 
on the islands. 
  As for the tactics to be used in the landing, what should 
be used is to "surround larger forces and pursue smaller 
forces." This is to surround and wipe out the islands and reefs 
primarily defended by the Vietnamese, allowing the forces on the 
other smaller islands and reefs to escape, "leaving them an 
avenue" to escape so they will withdraw quickly. 
  Prior to the landing combat, the air forces and naval air 
forces and the task force guns should conduct a firepower 
assault on the defensive fortifications and enemy personnel on 
the islands for 40 to 60 minutes. The marines will await the 
opportunity to penetrate through breaches in enemy defenses into 
the interior of the islands to critical positions, executing 
separation and assault, waiting for the frontal landing units to 
enter the fighting when the enemy defense system is basically 
demolished. The overall battle to retake the islands and reefs 
is estimated to take no more than two days. Naturally, this 
will primarily be determined by the effectiveness of the 
blockade and success of the advance and not by the landing 
combat itself. 
  Holding onto the Nansha Islands is a big question mark. 
Just as in our earlier analysis, a naval blockade and a 
successful advance and landing combat would be necessary. These 
three stages may well all be successful for China, and we may 
even be optimistic for success. However, recovery of the lost 
territory is only half of the Nansha problem. The other half is 
whether we hold onto them after we recover them. Because the 
task force will not be able to remain at the Nansha Islands for 
a long period of time, and it would not be practical to deploy 
large numbers of troops to defend the various islands and reefs 
of the Nansha Islands, and the Nansha Islands are located in a 
"pocket" formed by the other countries concerned with the Nansha 
Question, so this all presents a difficult problem for holding 
onto the Nansha Islands. 
  As for the ASEAN countries, they may strategically fight a 
protracted seesaw battle with China. This would be that when 
China's task force goes south, the troops would leave the 
islands, and not fight the task force head on, but when the task 
force returned back north, they would come back. With China's 
current naval and air power, it would not be able to deal with 
such a situation. 
  The only hope for turning this question mark into an 
exclamation mark is China's aircraft carrier! 

